


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft

























































Home|Contact Us|Newsroom|Investor Relations|WebFolio|WT365|WTIA Cash Reporting|Collective Funds













Forgot User ID | Reset Password

Need Online Access?























 Wilmington Trust offices in Florida are currently closed due to Hurricane Matthew.   






Go to...
WEALTH ADVISORY SERVICES
WEALTH ADVISORY SOLUTIONS
CORPORATE & INSTITUTIONAL
CORPORATE & INSTITUTIONAL GLOBAL PRESENCE
RESEARCH & INSIGHTS
ABOUT US
NEWSROOM
INVESTOR RELATIONS
WebFolio
WT365












Services
Planning & Trusts 
    Estate Planning& Strategic    Wealth Transfer
    Philanthropic Planning
    Business Succession    Planning
    Executive Benefit Planning
    Insurance Planning
    Trustee Services


 
    Personal Trust    Administration
    Personal Trusts in    Delaware
Investment Management
Family Governance & Education 
Private Banking 
Family Office 
 


Solutions For You
Families and Individuals
    Philanthropic Planning
Business Owners
    Business Capital
    Personal Capital
    Legacy Capital
Professional Advisors
    Delaware Trusts
    Directed Trusts


 
Corporate Executives
    Retirement planning
    Concentrated stock    and options strategies







The Markets We Serve
Capital MarketsAgency Services
    Default & Bankruptcy
    Restructuring
    Large and Complex Trusts
    Corporate Debt    & High Yield
    Global Loan Agency
    Mergers and Acquisitions
    Project Finance
    Public Finance and    Agency


 
    Education Finance    Services
    Escrows
    Global Capital Markets    Custody
Capital MarketsStructured Finance
    Equipment &    Transportation Finance
    Asset-Backed Securities &    Mortgage-Backed    Securities


 
    Capital Markets Insurance
    Insurance Collateral    Solutions
Institutional Custody/Administrative Services
Special PurposeVehicle Administration
Entity Management
Retirement Services
Investment Management
 


Global Presence
United States
United Kingdom
Italy
Ireland
Germany







Individual Investor
Core Investment Tenets
Investment Process
    Plan
    Implement
    Monitor
Client Experience
Our Team


Institutional Investor
About WTIA
Core Investment Tenets
    Risk Has Been Redefined
Strategic Intelligence
All-in-one Solutions Platform
Your Tactical Portfolio
The Client Experience
Our Team
 

















CONTACT US
General Service
1-800-982-4620

Mon-Fri 8 AM - 5 PM ET

View all
Visit M&T Bank







Loading



































ABS & MBS Structured Services & Transactions | Wilmington Trust

Corporate & Institutional

Home>
Corporate & Institutional>
Capital Markets Structured Finance>
Asset-Backed Securities (ABS) & Mortgage-Backed Securities (MBS)

the markets we serve
global presence
print    share

Capital MarketsAgency Services
Capital Markets Structured Finance

Equipment & Transportation Finance
Asset-Backed Securities & Mortgage-Backed Securities
Capital Markets Insurance
Insurance Collateral Solutions


Institutional Custody & Administrative Services
Special Purpose Vehicle Administration
Entity Management
Retirement Services
Investment Management


Asset-Backed Securities (ABS) & Mortgage-Backed Securities (MBS)
When you oversee ABS or MBS deals you'll likely need more than a capable trustee.  Turn to Wilmington Trust's range of structured services that can help you with deals involving Residential Mortgage-Backed Securities (RMBS) and Commercial Mortgage-Backed Securities (CMBS).
Years of experience serving in a wide range of roles
Wilmington Trust is often considered the trustee of choice for securitizations. We've partnered with issuers since the beginning of the collateralized mortgage securities market.  Along with our years of experience in this market and ability to serve in a broad range of roles, Wilmington Trust has a long history of working with Delaware Statutory Trusts.

Expertise includes facilitation of virtually all securitizations:

Residential Mortgage-Backed Securities (RMBS)
Commercial Mortgage-Backed Securities (CMBS)
Asset-Backed Securities (ABS)
Mortgage-Backed Securities (MBS)

Services and capabilities include:

Backup servicing
Document custodian
Owner/Issuer trustee
Administrator
Indenture trustee
Tax preparation and financial reporting
Resident trustee for Delaware entities
Support for issuing securities in a wide-range of jurisdictions, both domestic and offshore
Provision of independent directors and officers
Paying agent/certificate registrar

Speak to Wilmington Trust's team today about how we can serve in a broad range of roles and bring unique experience to each of your ABS/MBS deals.

These services are provided by Wilmington Trust, N.A.











Pat Evans 
Vice President
302-636-6104Email Pat



Roseline Maney 
Administrative Vice President
302-636-6170Email Roseline






Contact an Expert


Related Insights
Backup Servicing Solutions
Learn more about our range of capabilities
Read article (PDF)














Help  |  Site Map  |  Privacy / Security  |  Terms of Use  |  Careers  |  Locations  |  Wilmington Trust Investment Advisors  |  Wilmington Funds  |  WTRIS  |  M&T Bank  |  Press Releases  |  Login





Need help, visit our Contact Us page.

© 2017 Wilmington Trust Corporation and its affiliates. All rights reserved.

Wilmington Trust is a registered service mark. Wilmington Trust Corporation is a wholly owned subsidiary of M&T Bank Corporation. Wilmington Trust Company, operating in Delaware only, Wilmington Trust, N.A.,  M&T Bank and certain other affiliates, provide various fiduciary and non-fiduciary services, including trustee, custodial, agency, investment management and other services. International corporate and institutional services are offered through Wilmington Trust Corporation's international affiliates. Loans, credit cards, retail and business deposits, and other business and personal banking services and products are offered by M&T Bank, member FDIC.

Wilmington Trust Investment Advisors, Inc., a subsidiary of M&T Bank, is a SEC-registered investment adviser providing investment management services to Wilmington Trust and M&T Bank's affiliates and clients.
 Investment and Insurance Products 
 Are NOT Deposits 
 Are NOT FDIC-Insured 
 Are NOT Insured By Any Federal Government Agency 
 Have NO Bank Guarantee 
 May Go Down In Value
 


Brokerage services and insurance products are offered by M&T Securities, Inc. (member FINRA/SIPC), not by M&T Bank, Wilmington Trust Company, or Wilmington Trust, N.A. 

Private Banking is the marketing name for an offering of M&T Bank deposit and loan products and services.


M&T Bank, Member FDIC and Equal Housing Lender NMLS #381076 












J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, EMC Mortgage, LLC, Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I, LLC, Structured Asset Mortgage Investments II, Inc., SACO I, Inc., and J.P. Morgan Acceptance Corporation I (Release No. LR-22533; November 16, 2012)
















Home | Previous Page






























U.S. SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Litigation Release No. 22533 / November 16, 2012
Securities and Exchange Commission v. J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, EMC Mortgage, LLC, Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I, LLC, Structured Asset Mortgage Investments II, Inc., SACO I, Inc., and J.P. Morgan Acceptance Corporation I, Civil Action No. 1:12-cv-01872 (RLW) (D.D.C. filed Nov. 16, 2012)
SEC CHARGES J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES LLC WITH MISLEADING INVESTORS
IN RMBS OFFERINGS

In coordination with the federal-state Residential Mortgage-Backed Securities Working Group, the Securities and Exchange Commission today charged J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and affiliated entities with misleading investors in offerings of residential mortgage-backed securities (RMBS).  The firm agreed to a settlement in which it will pay $296.9 million.  The SEC plans to distribute the money to harmed investors.
The SEC alleges that JP Morgan misstated information about the delinquency status of mortgage loans that provided collateral for an RMBS offering in which it was the underwriter.  JP Morgan received fees of more than $2.7 million, and investors sustained losses of at least $37 million on undisclosed delinquent loans.  JP Morgan also is charged for Bear Stearns' failure to disclose its practice of obtaining and keeping cash settlements from mortgage loan originators on problem loans that Bear Stearns had sold into RMBS trusts.  The proceeds from this bulk settlement practice were at least $137.8 million.
According to the SEC's complaint against JP Morgan filed in federal court in Washington D.C., federal regulations under the securities laws require the disclosure of delinquency information related to assets that provide collateral for an asset-backed securities offering.  Information about the delinquency status of mortgage loans in an RMBS transaction is important to investors because those loans are the primary source of funds by which investors can earn interest and obtain repayment of their principal.
The SEC alleges that in the prospectus supplement for the $1.8 billion RMBS offering that occurred in December 2006, JP Morgan made materially false and misleading statements about the loans that provided collateral for the transaction.  The firm represented that only four loans (.04 percent of the total loans collateralizing the transaction) were delinquent by 30 to 59 days, and that those four were the only loans that had had an instance of delinquency of 30 or more days in the 12 months prior to the "cut-off date" for the transaction.  However, at the time JP Morgan made these representations, the firm actually had information showing that more than 620 loans (above 7 percent of the total loans collateralizing the transaction) were, and had been, 30 to 59 days delinquent, and the four loans represented as being 30 to 59 days delinquent were in fact 60 to 89 days delinquent.
The SEC's complaint also alleges that Bear Stearns' bulk settlements covered loans collateralizing 156 different RMBS transactions issued from 2005 to 2007.  Loan originators were usually required by contract to buy back loans that suffered early payment defaults or had other defects.  However, Bear Stearns frequently negotiated discounted cash settlements with these loan originators in lieu of a buy-back on loans that were owned by the RMBS trusts.  The firm - both before and after the merger with JP Morgan - then kept most of the bulk settlement proceeds.   The firm failed to disclose the practice to investors who owned the loans.  Bear Stearns repurchased only about 13 percent of these defective bulk settlement loans from the trusts, compared to a nearly 100 percent repurchase rate when loan originators agreed to buy back the defective loans.  For most loans covered by bulk settlements, the firm collected money from originators without paying anything to the trusts.
JP Morgan and J.P. Morgan Acceptance Corporation I settled the SEC's charges by consenting to pay disgorgement of $39,900,000, prejudgment interest of $10,600,000, and a penalty of $24,000,000 for the delinquency misstatements, which the SEC will seek to distribute to harmed investors in the transaction through a Fair Fund.  JP Morgan; EMC Mortgage, LLC; Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I, LLC; Structured Asset Mortgage Investments II, Inc.; and SACO I, Inc. agreed to pay disgorgement of $137,800,000, prejudgment interest of $24,265,536, and a penalty of $60,350,000 for the bulk settlement practice misconduct, and the SEC will seek to distribute these funds to harmed investors through a separate Fair Fund.  JP Morgan and each of the other defendants consented, without admitting or denying the allegations, to the entry of a final judgment permanently enjoining them from violating Section 17(a)(2) and (3) of the Securities Act of 1933.  The settlement is subject to court approval.


 
http://www.sec.gov/litigation/litreleases/2012/lr22533.htm




Home | Previous Page
Modified: 11/16/2012








Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I LLC                                                                               - New York                                          , NY         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



NY



New York



Investment Advice



Investment Advice



                            Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I LLC
                                    



 





















B 


Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I LLC                                                                              
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



383 MADISON AVE NEW YORK, NY 10179
Get Directions



(212) 272-2000
 





Business Info



 Founded 2007
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $2,431,894.00
 Employee Count 8
 Industries Investment Advice
 Contacts James Cayne                                                                                                             







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Since 2007 the company has been providing Investment Advice. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







B

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.




















Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I Llc, As Depositor, And Wilmington Trust Company, As Owner Trustee Trust Agreement Dated As Of January 1, 2005 Home Equity Loan-backed Certificates, Series 2005-a - Trust Agreement - Free Search.
















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Trust Agreement     > BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC, as Depositor, and WILMINGTON TRUST COMPANY, as Owner Trustee TRUST AGREEMENT Dated as of January 1, 2005 Home Equity Loan-Backed Certificates, Series 2005-A

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents











SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>

















Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I Llc, As Depositor, And Wilmington Trust Company, As Owner Trustee Trust Agreement Dated As Of January 1, 2005 Home Equity Loan-backed Certificates, Series 2005-a
Trust Agreement



You are currently viewing:
 This Trust Agreement involves Backed Securities Group | BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC | Home Mortgage Loan Monitoring Group | Irwin Home Equity Corporation | Irwin Union Bank | Wells Fargo Bank, NA | Wilmington Trust Company. RealDealDocs™ contains millions of easily searchable legal documents and clauses from top law firms. Search for free - click here.  
                  



Title: BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC, as Depositor, and WILMINGTON TRUST COMPANY, as Owner Trustee TRUST AGREEMENT Dated as of January 1, 2005 Home Equity Loan-Backed Certificates, Series 2005-A Governing Law: Delaware      Date: 2/7/2005 









Preview

Edit & Save 

Related Documents 



50 of the Top 250 law firms use our Products every day








EXECUTION COPY
BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED
SECURITIES I LLC,
as Depositor,



and



WILMINGTON TRUST COMPANY,
as Owner Trustee


TRUST AGREEMENT


Dated as of January 1, 2005





Home Equity Loan-Backed Certificates,
Series 2005-A
TABLE OF
CONTENTS
 



Page





ARTICLE I DEFINITIONS
1






1.01     
Definitions
1






1.02      Other
Definitional Provisions
1





ARTICLE II ORGANIZATION
2






2.01      Name
2






2.02     
Office
2






2.03      Purposes and
Powers
2






2.04      Appointment
of Owner Trustee
3






2.05      Initial
Capital Contribution of Trust Estate
3






2.06      Declaration
of Trust
3






2.07      Title to
Trust Property
4






2.08      Situs of
Trust
4






2.09     
Representations and Warranties of the Depositor
4






2.10      Payment of
Trust Fees
5






2.11      Covenants and
Restrictions on Conduct of Business
5





ARTICLE III THE CERTIFICATES
6






3.01      Initial
Ownership
6






3.02      The Initial
Certificate
6






3.03     
Authentication of Certificate
7






3.04      Registration
of and Limitations on Transfer and Exchange of Certificate
7






3.05      Mutilated,
Destroyed, Lost or Stolen Certificate
10






3.06      Persons
Deemed Certificateholders
10






3.07      Maintenance
of Office or Agency
10






3.08      Certificate
Paying Agent
11






3.09      Access to
List of Certificateholders' Names and Addresses
12






3.10      Tax
Treatment
12






3.11      Federal
Income Tax Allocations
13






3.12     
Subordination
13





ARTICLE IV AUTHORITY AND DUTIES OF
OWNER TRUSTEE
13






4.01      General
Authority
13






4.02      General
Duties
13






4.03      Action upon
Instruction
14






4.04      No Duties
Except as Specified under Specified Documents or in
Instructions
14






4.05     
Restrictions
15






4.06      Prior Notice
to Certificateholders with Respect to Certain Matters
15






4.07      Action by
Certificateholders with Respect to Certain Matters
16






4.08      Action with
Respect to Bankruptcy
16






4.09      Restrictions
on Certificateholders' Power
17






4.10      Doing
Business in Other Jurisdictions
17






4.11      Majority
Control
17





ARTICLE V APPLICATION OF TRUST
ESTATE
18






5.01     
Distributions
18






5.02      Method of
Payment
18






5.03      Signature on
Returns







5.04      Statements to
Certificateholders
18






5.05      Tax
Reporting; Tax Elections
19





ARTICLE VI CONCERNING THE OWNER
TRUSTEE
19






6.01      Acceptance of
Trusts and Duties
19






6.02      Furnishing of
Documents
21






6.03     
Representations and Warranties
21






6.04      Reliance;
Advice of Counsel
22






6.05      Not Acting in
Individual Capacity
22






6.06      Owner Trustee
Not Liable for Certificates or Related Documents
22






6.07      Owner Trustee
May Own Certificates and Notes
23





ARTICLE VII COMPENSATION OF OWNER
TRUSTEE
23






7.01      Owner
Trustee's Fees and Expense
23






7.02     
Indemnification
23





ARTICLE VIII TERMINATION OF TRUST
AGREEMENT
24






8.01      Termination
of Trust Agreement
24





ARTICLE IX SUCCESSOR OWNER TRUSTEES
AND ADDITIONAL OWNER TRUSTEES
25






9.01      Eligibility
Requirements for Owner Trustee
25






9.02      Replacement
of Owner Trustee
25






9.03      Successor
Owner Trustee
26






9.04      Merger or
Consolidation of Owner Trustee
27






9.05      Appointment
of Co-Trustee or Separate Trustee
27





ARTICLE X MISCELLANEOUS
28






10.01     
Amendments
28






10.02      No Legal
Title to Trust Estate
29






10.03      Limitations
on Rights of Others
29






10.04     
Notices
29






10.05      Severability
of Provisions
30






10.06     
Counterparts
30






10.07      Successors
and Assigns
30






10.08      No
Petition
30






10.09      No
Recourse
30






10.10     
Headings
30






10.11      Governing
Law
31






10.12     
Integration
31






10.13      Certificates
Nonassessable
31







Exhibit
A          Form
of Certificate
A-1




Exhibit
B          Certificate
of Trust of Irwin Whole Loan Home
                    
     Equity Trust 2005-A

B-1




Exhibit
C           Form
of Rule 144A Investment Representation
C-1




Exhibit
D           Form
of Investor Representation Letter
D-1




Exhibit
E           Form
of Transferor Representation Letter
E-1




Exhibit
F          
Certificate of Non-Foreign Status
F-1




Exhibit
G           Form
of ERISA Representation Letter
G-1




Exhibit
H           Form
of Representation Letter
H-1



          
This Trust Agreement, dated as of January 1, 2005 (as amended from
time to time, the “Agreement”), is between Bear Stearns
Asset Backed Securities I LLC, a Delaware limited liability
company, as Depositor (the “Depositor”), and Wilmington
Trust Company, a Delaware banking corporation, as trustee (the
“Owner Trustee”).
WlTNESSETH:
          In
consideration of the mutual agreements herein contained, the
Depositor and the Owner Trustee hereby agree as follows:
          
WHEREAS, the Depositor and the Owner Trustee desire to form a
Delaware statutory trust;
          NOW,
THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual agreements herein
contained, the parties hereto agree as follows:
ARTICLE I

DEFINITIONS
          
1.01 Definitions . For all purposes of this Agreement,
except as otherwise expressly provided herein or unless the context
otherwise requires, capitalized terms used herein that are not
otherwise defined shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in
Appendix A to the indenture dated as of January 1, 2005 (the
"Indenture"), between Irwin Whole Loan Home Equity Trust 2005-A, as
issuer, and Wells Fargo Bank, N.A., as indenture trustee. All other
capitalized terms used herein shall have the meanings specified
herein. All references herein to "this Agreement" shall be
references to this Agreement as defined in the preamble
hereto.
          
1.02 Other Definitional Provisions .
          
          
           (a)
All terms defined in this Agreement shall have the defined meanings
when used in any certificate or other document made or delivered
pursuant hereto unless otherwise defined therein.
          
          
           (b) As
used in this Agreement and in any certificate or other document
made or delivered pursuant hereto or thereto, accounting terms not
defined in this Agreement or in any such certificate or other
document, and accounting terms partly defined in this Agreement or
in any such certificate or other document to the extent not
defined, shall have the respective meanings given to them under
generally accepted accounting principles. To the extent that the
definitions of accounting terms in this Agreement or in any such
certificate or other document are inconsistent with the meanings of
such terms under generally accepted accounting principles, the
definitions contained in this Agreement or in any such certificate
or other document shall control.
          
          
           (c)
The words "hereof," "herein," "hereunder" and words of similar
import when used in this Agreement shall refer to this Agreement as
a whole and not to any particular provision of this Agreement;
Section and Exhibit references contained in this Agreement are
references to Sections and Exhibits in or to this Agreement unless
otherwise specified; "or" includes "and/or"; and the term
"including" and all variations thereof means "including without
limitation".
          
          
           (d)
The definitions contained in this Agreement are applicable to the
singular as well as the plural forms of such terms and to the
masculine as well as to the feminine and neuter genders of such
terms.
          
          
           (e)
Any agreement, instrument or statute defined or referred to herein
or in any instrument or certificate delivered in connection
herewith means such agreement, instrument or statute as from time
to time amended, modified or supplemented and includes (in the case
of agreements or instruments) references to all attachments thereto
and instruments incorporated therein; references to a Person are
also to its permitted successors and assigns.
ARTICLE II

ORGANIZATION
          
2.01 Name . The trust created hereby (the
“Trust”) shall be known as “Irwin Whole Loan Home
Equity Trust 2005-A”, in which name the Owner Trustee may
conduct the business of the Trust, make and execute contracts and
other instruments on behalf of the Trust and sue and be
sued.
          2.02
Office . The office of the Trust shall be in care of the
Owner Trustee at the Corporate Trust Office of the Owner Trustee or
at such other address in Delaware as the Owner Trustee may
designate by written notice to the Certificateholders and the
Indenture Trustee.
          
2.03 Purposes and Powers . The purpose of the Trust is to
engage in the following activities:
          
          
           (a) to
issue the Notes pursuant to the Indenture and the Certificates
pursuant to this Agreement and to sell the Notes and the
Certificates;
          
          
           (b) to
purchase the Mortgage Loans and to pay the organizational, start-up
and transactional expenses of the Trust;
          
          
           (c) to
assign, grant, transfer, pledge and convey the Mortgage Loans
pursuant to the Indenture and to hold, manage and distribute to the
Certificateholders pursuant to Section 5.01 any portion of the
Mortgage Loans released from the Lien of, and remitted to the Trust
pursuant to, the Indenture;
          
          
           (d) to
enter into and perform its obligations under the Basic Documents to
which it is to be a party;
          
          
           (e) to
engage in those activities, including entering into agreements,
that are necessary, suitable or convenient to accomplish the
foregoing or are incidental thereto or connected therewith,
including to accept additional contributions of equity that are not
subject to the Lien of the Indenture; and
          
          
           (f)
subject to compliance with the Basic Documents, to engage in such
other activities as may be required in connection with conservation
of the Trust Estate and the making of distributions to the
Certificateholders and the Noteholders.
The Trust is hereby authorized to engage in the
foregoing activities. The Trust shall not (i) engage in any
activity other than in connection with the foregoing or other than
as required or authorized by the terms of this Agreement or the
other Basic Documents while any Note is outstanding without the
consent of the Indenture Trustee or (ii) elect to be treated for
federal income tax purposes as a corporation under Treasury
Regulations Section 301.7701-3(c).
          2.04
Appointment of Owner Trustee . The Depositor hereby appoints
the Owner Trustee as trustee of the Trust effective as of the date
hereof, to have all rights, powers and duties set forth
herein.
          2.05
Initial Capital Contribution of Trust Estate . In
consideration of the delivery by the Owner Trustee, on behalf of
the Trust, of the Securities to the Depositor or its designee, upon
the order of the Depositor, the Depositor, as of the Closing Date
and concurrently with the execution and delivery hereof, does
hereby sell, transfer, assign, set over and otherwise convey to the
Trust, without recourse, but subject to the other terms and
provisions of this Agreement, all of the right, title and interest
of the Depositor in and to the Trust Estate. The foregoing sale,
transfer, assignment, set over and conveyance does not, and is not
intended to, result in a creation or an assumption by the Trust of
any obligation of the Depositor or any other Person in connection
with the Trust Estate or under any agreement or instrument relating
thereto, except as specifically set forth herein.
          The
Owner Trustee, on behalf of the Trust, acknowledges the conveyance
to the Trust by the Depositor, as of the Closing Date, of the Trust
Estate, including all right, title and interest of the Depositor in
and to the Trust Estate. Concurrently with such conveyance and in
exchange therefor, the Trust has pledged the Trust Estate to the
Indenture Trustee and has executed the Certificates and the Notes
and caused them to be duly authenticated and delivered to or upon
the order of the Depositor.
          2.06
Declaration of Trust . The Owner Trustee hereby declares
that it shall hold the Trust Estate in trust upon and subject to
the conditions set forth herein for the use and benefit of the
Certificateholders, subject to the obligations of the Trust under
the Basic Documents. It is the intention of the parties hereto that
the Trust constitute a statutory trust under the Statutory Trust
Statute and that this Agreement constitute the governing instrument
of such statutory trust. Effective as of the date hereof, the Owner
Trustee shall have all rights, powers and duties set forth herein
and in the Statutory Trust Statute with respect to accomplishing
the purposes of the Trust. Neither the Depositor nor any
Certificateholder shall have any personal liability for any
liability or obligation of the Trust, other than the
indemnification obligation provided in Section 7.02
herein.
          2.07
Title to Trust Property . Legal title to the Trust Estate
shall be vested at all times in the Trust as a separate legal
entity except where applicable law in any jurisdiction requires
title to any part of the Trust Estate to be vested in a trustee or
trustees, in which case title shall be deemed to be vested in the
Owner Trustee, a co-trustee or a separate trustee, as the case may
be.
          2.08
Situs of Trust . The Trust will be located and administered
in the State of Delaware. All bank accounts maintained by the Owner
Trustee on behalf of the Trust shall be located in the States of
Delaware, New York or Minnesota. The Trust shall not have any
employees in any State other than Delaware; provided, that nothing
herein shall restrict or prohibit the Owner Trustee from having
employees within or without the State of Delaware or taking actions
outside the State of Delaware in order to comply with Section 2.03.
Payments will be received by the Trust only in Delaware, New York
or Minnesota, and payments will be made by the Trust only from
Delaware, New York or Minnesota. The only office of the Trust will
be at the Corporate Trust Office of the Owner Trustee in
Delaware.
          2.09
Representations and Warranties of the Depositor . The
Depositor hereby represents and warrants to the Owner Trustee
that:
          
          
           (a)
The Depositor is duly organized and validly existing as a limited
liability company in good standing under the laws of the State of
Delaware, with power and authority to own its properties and to
conduct its business as such properties are currently owned and
such business is presently conducted.
          
          
           (b)
The Depositor is duly qualified to do business as a limited
liability company in good standing and has obtained all necessary
licenses and approvals in all jurisdictions in which the ownership
or lease of its property or the conduct of its business shall
require such qualifications and in which the failure to so qualify
would have a material adverse effect on the business, properties,
assets or condition (financial or otherwise) of the Depositor and
the ability of the Depositor to perform under this
Agreement.
          
          
           (c)
The Depositor has full power and authority to execute and deliver
this Agreement and to carry out its terms; the Depositor has full
power and authority to sell and assign the property to be sold and
assigned to and deposited with the Trust as part of the Trust and
the Depositor has duly authorized such sale and assignment and
deposit to the Trust by all necessary corporate action; and the
execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement have been
duly authorized by the Depositor by all necessary limited liability
company action.
          
          
           (d)
The consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement
and the fulfillment of the terms hereof do not conflict with,
result in any breach of any terms or provisions of, or constitute
(with or without notice or lapse of time) a default under, the
certificate of formation or limited liability company agreement of
the Depositor, or any indenture, agreement or other instrument to
which the Depositor is a party or by which it is bound; nor result
in the creation or imposition of any Lien upon any of its
properties pursuant to the terms of any such indenture, agreement
or other instrument (other than pursuant to the Basic Documents);
nor violate any law or, to the best of the Depositor's knowledge,
any order, rule or regulation applicable to the Depositor of any
court or of any federal or state regulatory body, administrative
agency or other governmental instrumentality having jurisdiction
over the Depositor or its properties.
          2.10
Payment of Trust Fees . The Owner Trustee shall pay or cause
to be paid out of the Trust Estate any fees and expenses of the
Trust (other than the Owner Trustee’s fees and expenses
pursuant to Section 7.01).
          
2.11 Covenants and Restrictions on Conduct of Business
.
          
          
           (a)
The Trust shall abide by the following restrictions:
          
          
          
           (i)
other than as contemplated by the Basic Documents and related
documentation, the Trust shall not incur any
indebtedness;
          
          
          
           (ii)
other than as contemplated by the Basic Documents and related
documentation, the Trust shall not engage in any dissolution,
liquidation, consolidation, merger or sale of assets;
          
          
          
           (iii)
the Trust shall not engage in any business activity in which it is
not currently engaged other than as contemplated by the Basic
Documents and related documentation; and
          
          
          
           (iv)
the Trust shall not form, or cause to be formed, any subsidiaries
and shall not own or acquire any asset other than as contemplated
by the Basic Documents and related documentation.
          
          
           (b)
The Trust shall:
          
          
          
           (i) To
the extent maintained, keep its books and records separate from any
other person or entity;
          
          
          
           (ii)
maintain its office and bank accounts separate from any other
person or entity;
          
          
          
           (iii)
not commingle its assets with those of any other person or
entity;
          
          
          
           (iv)
conduct its own business in its own name and use business forms
under its own name and not that of any Certificateholder or any
Affiliate;
          
          
          
           (v)
other than as contemplated by Section 7.01, the Basic Documents and
related documentation, pay its own liabilities and expenses only
out of its own funds;
          
          
          
           (vi)
observe all formalities required under the Statutory Trust
Act;
          
          
          
           (vii)
not guarantee or become obligated for the debts of any other person
or entity;
          
          
          
           (viii)
not hold out its credit as being available to satisfy the
obligation of any other person or entity;
          
          
          
           (ix)
not acquire the obligations or securities of its Certificateholders
or its Affiliates;
          
          
          
           (x)
other than as contemplated by the Basic Documents and related
documentation, not make loans to any other person or entity or buy
or hold evidence of indebtedness issued by any other person or
entity;
          
          
          
           (xi)
other than as contemplated by the Basic Documents and related
documentation, not pledge its assets for the benefit of any other
person or entity;
          
          
          
           (xii)
hold itself out as a separate entity from each Certificateholder
and not conduct any business in the name of any
Certificateholder;
          
          
          
           (xiii)
correct any known misunderstanding regarding its separate
identity;
          
          
          
           (xiv)
not identify itself as a division of any other person or entity;
and
          
          
          
           (xv)
except as required or specifically provided in the Trust Agreement,
the Trust will conduct business with the Certificateholders or any
Affiliate thereof on an arm's-length basis.
          
          
           (c) So
long as the Notes or any other amounts owed under the Indenture
remain outstanding, the Trust shall not amend this Section 2.11
without the prior written consent of each Rating Agency, in
addition to the requirements under Section 10.01.
ARTICLE III

THE CERTIFICATES
          
3.01 Initial Ownership . Upon the formation of the Trust and
prior to the issuance of the Certificates, the Depositor shall be
the sole Certificateholder of each Class of Certificates for all
purposes of this Agreement.
          
3.02 The Initial Certificate . The Certificates shall be
issued in minimum denominations of a Percentage Interest of 5.0000%
and integral multiples of 5.0000% in excess thereof.
          The
Certificates shall be executed on behalf of the Trust by manual or
facsimile signature of an authorized officer of the Owner Trustee
and authenticated in the manner provided in Section 3.03. Any
Certificate bearing the manual or facsimile signatures of
individuals who were, at the time when such signatures shall have
been affixed, authorized to sign on behalf of the Trust, shall be
validly issued and entitled to the benefit of this Agreement,
notwithstanding that such individuals or any of them shall have
ceased to be so authorized prior to the authentication and delivery
of such Certificate or did not hold such offices at the date of
authentication and delivery of such Certificate. A Person or a
transferee shall become a Certificateholder and shall be entitled
to the rights and subject to the obligations of a Certificateholder
hereunder, upon such Person’s or transferee’s
acceptance of a Certificate duly registered in such Person’s
or transferee’s name, pursuant to and upon satisfaction of
the conditions set forth in Section 3.04.
          3.03
Authentication of Certificate . Concurrently with the
acquisition of the Mortgage Loans by the Trust, the Owner Trustee
or the Certificate Paying Agent shall cause the Certificates in an
initial aggregate Percentage Interest of 100.00% to be executed on
behalf of the Trust, authenticated and delivered to or upon the
written order of the Depositor, signed by its chairman of the
board, its president or any vice president, without further
corporate action by the Depositor, in authorized denominations. No
Certificate shall entitle its holder to any benefit under this
Agreement or be valid for any purpose unless there shall appear on
such Certificate a certificate of authentication substantially in
the form set forth in Exhibit A, executed by the Owner Trustee or
the Certificate Paying Agent, by manual signature; and such
authentication shall constitute conclusive evidence that such
Certificate shall have been duly authenticated and delivered
hereunder. All Certificates shall be dated the date of their
authentication.
          3.04
Registration of and Limitations on Transfer and Exchange of
Certificate . The Certificate Registrar shall keep or cause to
be kept, at the office or agency maintained pursuant to Section
3.07, a Certificate Register in which, subject to such reasonable
regulations as it may prescribe, the Certificate Registrar shall
provide for the registration of the Certificates and transfers and
exchanges of the Certificates as herein provided. The Indenture
Trustee shall be the initial Certificate Registrar. If the
Certificate Registrar resigns or is removed, the Owner Trustee
shall appoint a successor Certificate Registrar.
          Subject
to satisfaction of the conditions set forth below, upon surrender
for registration of transfer of any Certificate at the office or
agency maintained pursuant to Section 3.08, the Owner Trustee shall
execute, authenticate and deliver (or shall cause the Certificate
Registrar as its authenticating agent to authenticate and deliver)
in the name of the designated transferee or transferees, one or
more new Certificates in authorized denominations of a like
aggregate amount, dated the date of authentication by the Owner
Trustee or any authenticating agent. At the option of a
Certificateholder, Certificates may be exchanged for other
Certificates of authorized denominations of a like aggregate amount
upon surrender of the Certificates to be exchanged at the office or
agency maintained pursuant to Section 3.07.
          Each
Certificate presented or surrendered for registration of transfer
or exchange shall be accompanied by a written instrument of
transfer in form satisfactory to the Certificate Registrar duly
executed by the related Certificateholders or such
Certificateholders’ attorney duly authorized in writing. Each
Certificate surrendered for registration of transfer or exchange
shall be cancelled and subsequently disposed of by the Certificate
Registrar in accordance with its customary practice.
          No
service charge shall be made for any registration of transfer or
exchange of the Certificate, but the Owner Trustee or the
Certificate Registrar may require payment of a sum sufficient to
cover any tax or governmental charge that may be imposed in
connection with any transfer or exchange of the
Certificate.
          Except
as described below, each Certificateholder shall establish its
non-foreign status by submitting to the Certificate Paying Agent an
IRS Form W-9 and the Certificate of Non-Foreign Status (in
substantially the form attached hereto as Exhibit F).
          A
Certificate may be transferred to a Certificateholder unable to
establish its non-foreign status as described in the preceding
paragraph only if such Certificateholder provides an Opinion of
Counsel to the Depositor and the Certificate Registrar, which
Opinion of Counsel shall not be an expense of the Trust, the Owner
Trustee, the Certificate Registrar or the Depositor, satisfactory
to the Owner Trustee, that such transfer (i) will not affect the
tax status of the Trust and (ii) will not adversely affect the
interests of any Certificateholder or Noteholder, including as a
result of the imposition of any federal withholding taxes on the
Trust (except to the extent that such withholding taxes would be
payable solely from amounts otherwise distributable to the
Certificates of the prospective transferee). If such transfer
occurs and such foreign Certificateholder becomes subject to such
federal withholding taxes, any such taxes will be withheld by the
Indenture Trustee at the direction of the Tax Matters Person. Each
Certificateholder unable to establish its non-foreign status shall
submit to the Certificate Paying Agent a properly completed copy of
the type of Form W-8 that the Certificate Paying Agent shall
reasonably request and shall resubmit such form every three years
or with such frequency as required by then-applicable
regulations.
          No
transfer, sale, pledge or other disposition of a Certificate shall
be made unless such transfer, sale, pledge or other disposition is
exempt from the registration requirements of the Securities Act and
any applicable state securities laws or is made in accordance with
the Securities Act and such state laws. In the event of any such
transfer, the Owner Trustee or the Certificate Registrar shall
prior to such transfer require the transferee to execute (a) either
(i) an investment letter in substantially the form attached hereto
as Exhibit C (or in such form and substance reasonably satisfactory
to the Certificate Registrar and the Depositor), which investment
letters shall not be an expense of the Trust, the Owner Trustee,
the Certificate Registrar or the Depositor, and which investment
letter states that, among other things, such transferee (A) is a
“qualified institutional buyer” as defined under Rule
144A, acting for its own account or the accounts of other
“qualified institutional buyers” as defined under Rule
144A, and (B) is aware that the proposed transferor intends to rely
on the exemption from registration requirements under the
Securities Act provided by Rule 144A or (ii) (A) a written Opinion
of Counsel acceptable to and in form and substance satisfactory to
the Indenture Trustee and the Depositor that such transfer may be
made pursuant to an exemption, describing the applicable exemption
and the basis therefor, from the Securities Act and such state
laws, or is being made pursuant to the Securities Act and such
state laws, which Opinion of Counsel shall not be an expense of the
Trust, the Owner Trustee, the Certificate Registrar or the
Depositor and (B) the transferee executes a representation letter,
substantially in the form of Exhibit D, and the transferor executes
a representation letter, substantially in the form of Exhibit E,
each acceptable to and in form and substance satisfactory to the
Certificate Registrar and the Depositor, certifying the facts
surrounding such transfer, which representation letters shall not
be an expense of the Trust, the Owner Trustee, the Certificate
Registrar or the Depositor and (b) the Certificate of Non-Foreign
Status substantially the form of Exhibit F, acceptable to and in
form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Certificate
Registrar and the Depositor, which certificate shall not be an
expense of the Trust, the Owner Trustee, the Certificate Registrar
or the Depositor. If such Certificateholder is unable to provide a
Certificate of Non-Foreign Status, such Certificateholder must
provide an Opinion of Counsel as described in the preceding
paragraph. The Certificateholder desiring to effect such transfer
shall, and does hereby agree to, indemnify the Trust, the Owner
Trustee, the Certificate Registrar and the Depositor against any
liability that may result if the transfer is not so exempt or is
not made in accordance with such federal and state laws.
          No
transfer of Certificates shall be made to any employee benefit plan
or certain other retirement plans and arrangements, including
individual retirement accounts and annuities, Keogh plans and bank
collective investment funds and insurance company general or
separate accounts in which such plans, accounts or arrangements are
invested, that are subject to Section 406 of ERISA, Section 4975 of
the Code or substantially similar rules under state, local or
federal law (“Similar Law”) (any of the foregoing, a
“Plan”), any Person acting, directly or indirectly, on
behalf of any such Plan or any Person acquiring such Certificates
with “plan assets” within the meaning of the Department
of Labor regulation promulgated at 29 C.F.R. § 2510.3-101
(“Plan Assets”) unless the Depositor, the Owner Trustee
and the Certificate Registrar are provided with an Opinion of
Counsel that establishes to the satisfaction of the Depositor, the
Owner Trustee and the Certificate Registrar that the purchase and
holding of the Certificates is permissible under applicable law,
will not constitute or result in any prohibited transaction under
ERISA, Section 4975 of the Code or Similar Law and will not subject
the Depositor, the Owner Trustee or the Certificate Registrar to
any obligation or liability (including obligations or liabilities
under ERISA, Section 4975 of the Code or Similar Law) in addition
to those undertaken in this Agreement, which Opinion of Counsel
shall not be an expense of the Depositor, the Owner Trustee or the
Certificate Registrar. In lieu of such Opinion of Counsel, a Plan,
any Person acting, directly or indirectly, on behalf of any such
Plan or any Person acquiring such Certificates with Plan Assets may
provide a certification in the form of Exhibit G, upon which the
Depositor, the Owner Trustee and the Certificate Registrar may rely
without further inquiry or investigation. Neither an Opinion of
Counsel nor a certification will be required in connection with the
initial transfer of any such Certificate by the Depositor to an
Affiliate of the Depositor (in which case, the Depositor or such
Affiliate shall have deemed to have represented that such Affiliate
is not a Plan or a Person investing any Plan Assets), and the Owner
Trustee shall be entitled to conclusively rely upon a
representation (which, upon the request of the Owner Trustee, shall
be a written representation) from the Depositor of the status of
such transferee as an Affiliate of the Depositor.
          In
addition, no transfer of a Certificate shall be permitted, and no
such transfer shall be registered by the Certificate Registrar or
be effective hereunder, unless evidenced by an Opinion of Counsel
that establishes that such transfer or the registration of such
transfer would not cause the Trust or any portion thereof to be
characterized as an association (or a publicly traded partnership)
taxable as a corporation either by having more than 100 holders of
the Certificates and the Non-Offered Notes (other than the Class
X-1 Notes and the Class M-7 Notes) at any time during the taxable
year of the Trust or otherwise, a corporation or a taxable mortgage
pool for federal and relevant state income tax purposes.
          In
addition, no transfer, sale, assignment, pledge or other
disposition of a Certificate shall be made unless the proposed
transferee executes a representation letter substantially in the
form of Exhibit H, that (i) such transferee is acquiring the
Certificate for its own behalf and is not acting as agent or
custodian for any other Person or entity in connection with such
acquisition, (ii) if such transferee is a partnership, grantor
trust or S corporation for federal income tax purposes, the related
Certificates represent not more than 50% of the assets of the
partnership, grantor trust or S corporation, (iii) such transferee
agrees to be bound by the Trust Agreement, and (iv) such transferee
will not (x) incur indebtedness secured by the Certificates where
payments on such indebtedness bear a relationship to payments on
the Mortgage Loans within the meaning of Treasury Regulations
Section 301.7701(i)-1(f) or (y) use a partnership, trust or other
entity to indirectly achieve the result described in clause
(x).
          3.05
Mutilated, Destroyed, Lost or Stolen Certificate . If (i)
any mutilated Certificate shall be surrendered to the Certificate
Registrar, or if the Certificate Registrar shall receive evidence
to its satisfaction of the destruction, loss or theft of any
Certificate and (ii) there shall be delivered to the Certificate
Registrar and the Owner Trustee such security or indemnity as may
be required by them to save each of them and the Issuer from harm,
then in the absence of notice to the Certificate Registrar or the
Owner Trustee that such Certificate has been acquired by a bona
fide purchaser, the Owner Trustee shall execute on behalf of the
Trust and the Owner Trustee or the Certificate Paying Agent, as the
Trust’s authenticating agent, shall authenticate and deliver,
in exchange for or in lieu of any such mutilated, destroyed, lost
or stolen Certificate, a new Certificate of like tenor and
denomination. In connection with the issuance of any new
Certificate under this Section, the Owner Trustee or the
Certificate Registrar may require the payment of a sum sufficient
to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed
in connection therewith. Any duplicate Certificate issued pursuant
to this Section shall constitute conclusive evidence of ownership
in the Trust, as if originally issued, whether or not the lost,
stolen or destroyed Certificate shall be found at any
time.
          3.06
Persons Deemed Certificateholders . Prior to due
presentation of a Certificate for registration of transfer, the
Owner Trustee, the Certificate Registrar or any Certificate Paying
Agent may treat the Person in the name of which any Certificate is
registered in the Certificate Register as the owner of such
Certificate for the purpose of receiving distributions pursuant to
Section 5.02 and for all other purposes whatsoever, and none of the
Trust, the Owner Trustee, the Certificate Registrar or the
Certificate Paying Agent shall be bound by any notice to the
contrary.
          3.07
Maintenance of Office or Agency . The Owner Trustee, on
behalf of the Trust, shall maintain in Minneapolis, Minnesota an
office or offices or agency or agencies where the Certificates may
be surrendered for registration of transfer or exchange and where
notices and demands to or upon the Owner Trustee in respect of the
Certificates and the Basic Documents may be served. The Owner
Trustee initially designates the Corporate Trust Office of the
Indenture Trustee as its office for such purposes. The Owner
Trustee shall give prompt written notice to the Depositor and the
Certificateholders of any change in the location of the Certificate
Register or any such office or agency.
          
3.08 Certificate Paying Agent .
          
          
           (a)
The Certificate Paying Agent shall make distributions to
Certificateholders from the Trustee Collection Account on behalf of
the Trust in accordance with the provisions of the Certificates and
Section 5.01 from any payments remitted to the Certificate Paying
Agent by the Indenture Trustee for distribution to
Certificateholders. The Trust hereby appoints the Indenture Trustee
as Certificate Paying Agent and the Indenture Trustee hereby
accepts such appointment and further agrees that it will be bound
by the provisions of this Agreement relating to the Certificate
Paying Agent and shall:
          
          
          
           (i)
hold all sums held by it for the payment of amounts due with
respect to the Certificates in trust for the benefit of the Persons
entitled thereto until such sums shall be paid to such Persons or
otherwise disposed of as herein provided;
          
          
          
           (ii)
give the Owner Trustee notice of any default by the Trust of which
it has actual knowledge, or of the Indenture Trustee, in the making
of any payment required to be made with respect to the
Certificate;
          
          
          
           (iii)
at any time during the continuance of any such default, upon the
written request of the Owner Trustee, forthwith pay to the Owner
Trustee on behalf of the Trust all sums so held in trust by such
Certificate Paying Agent;
          
          
          
           (iv)
immediately resign as Certificate Paying Agent and forthwith pay to
the Owner Trustee on behalf of the Trust all sums held by it in
trust for the payment of the Certificate, if at any time it ceases
to meet the standards required to be met by the Certificate Paying
Agent at the time of its appointment;
          
          
          
           (v)
comply with all requirements of the Code with respect to the
withholding from any payments made by it on any Certificates of any
applicable withholding taxes imposed thereon and with respect to
any applicable reporting requirements in connection therewith;
and
          
          
          
           (vi)
deliver to the Owner Trustee a copy of the Report to Noteholders
prepared with respect to each Payment Date pursuant to Section 4.01
of the Sale and Servicing Agreement.
          
          
           (b)
The Trust may revoke such power and remove the Certificate Paying
Agent if the Owner Trustee determines in its sole discretion that
the Certificate Paying Agent shall have failed to perform its
obligations under this Agreement in any material respect. The
Indenture Trustee shall be permitted to resign as Certificate
Paying Agent upon 30 days written notice to the Owner Trustee;
provided, that the Indenture Trustee is also resigning as Paying
Agent under the Indenture at such time. In the event that the
Indenture Trustee shall no longer be the Certificate Paying Agent
under this Agreement and Paying Agent under the Indenture, the
Owner Trustee shall appoint a successor to act as Certificate
Paying Agent, which shall be a bank or trust company and shall also
be the successor Paying Agent under the Indenture. The Owner
Trustee shall cause such successor Certificate Paying Agent or any
additional Certificate Paying Agent appointed by the Owner Trustee
to execute and deliver to the Owner Trustee an instrument to the
effect set forth in this Section as it relates to the Certificate
Paying Agent. The Certificate Paying Agent shall return all
unclaimed funds to the Trust; and upon removal of a Certificate
Paying Agent, such Certificate Paying Agent shall also return all
funds in its possession to the Trust. The provisions of Sections
6.01, 6.03, 6.04 and 7.01 shall apply to the Certificate Paying
Agent, to the extent applicable. Any reference in this Agreement to
the Certificate Paying Agent shall include any co-paying agent,
unless the context otherwise requires.
          3.09
Access to List of Certificateholders’ Names and
Addresses . The Certificate Registrar shall furnish or cause to
be furnished to the Depositor or the Owner Trustee, within 15 days
after receipt by the Certificate Registrar of a written request
therefor from the Depositor or the Owner Trustee, a list, in such
form as the Depositor or the Owner Trustee, as the case may be, may
reasonably require, of the names and addresses of the
Certificateholders as of the most recent Record Date. Each
Certificateholder, by receiving and holding a Certificate, shall be
deemed to have agreed not to hold any of the Trust, the Depositor,
the Certificate Registrar or the Owner Trustee accountable by
reason of the disclosure of its name and address, regardless of the
source from which such information was derived.
          3.10
Tax Treatment . The Depositor and the Issuer acknowledge
that the Certificates shall be issued, with the intention that, for
federal, state and local income, single business and franchise tax
purposes, the Non-Offered Notes (other than the Class X-1 Notes and
the Class M-7 Notes) will qualify as the sole classes of equity of
the Issuer and the Certificates will be treated as a noneconomic
interest in the Issuer.
          Neither
the Depositor nor the Issuer will take any position inconsistent
with any such intention.
          3.11
Federal Income Tax Allocations . If the Certificates and the
Non-Offered Notes (other than the Class X-1 Notes and the Class M-7
Notes) are held by more than one Person and it is determined by the
Master Servicer that the Issuer is properly treated as a
partnership for federal income tax purposes, the net income of the
Issuer for any month as determined for federal income tax purposes
(and each item of income, gain, loss, credit and deduction entering
into the computation thereof) shall be allocated among the
Certificateholders and each holder of the Non-Offered Notes (other
than the Class X-1 Notes and the Class M-7 Notes), as of the first
Record Date following the end of such month, in accordance with
each such holder’s Percentage Interest in the Certificates
and the Non-Offered Notes (other than the Class X-1 Notes and the
Class M-7 Notes). Net losses of the Issuer, if any, for any month
as determined for federal income tax purposes (and each item of
income, gain, loss, credit and deduction entering into the
computation thereof) shall be allocated among the
Certificateholders and each holder of the Non-Offered Notes (other
than the Class X-1 Notes and the Class M-7 Notes) as of the first
Record Date following the end of such month in accordance with each
such holder’s Percentage Interest in the Certificates and the
Non-Offered Notes (not including the Class X-1 Notes or the Class
M-7 Notes). The Owner Trustee, on behalf of the Depositor and at
the direction of the Master Servicer, is authorized to modify the
allocations in this paragraph if necessary or appropriate, for the
allocations to fairly reflect the economic income, gain or loss to
the holders of the Certificates and the Non-Offered Notes (other
than the Class X-1 Notes and the Class M-7 Notes) or as otherwise
required by the Code. The Owner Trustee shall give the Master
Servicer prompt written notice of any such modification made by the
Owner Trustee.
          3.12
Subordination . Except as otherwise provided in the Basic
Documents, for so long as any Notes are outstanding or unpaid, the
Certificateholders will generally be subordinated in right of
payment, under the Certificates or otherwise, to payments to the
Noteholders under, or otherwise related to, the Indenture. If an
Event of Default has occurred and is continuing under the
Indenture, the Certificates will be fully subordinated as set forth
in the Basic Documents to obligations owing by the Trust to the
Noteholders under, or otherwise related to, the Indenture, and no
distributions will be made on the Certificates until the
Noteholders and the Indenture Trustee have been irrevocably paid in
full.
ARTICLE IV

AUTHORITY AND DUTIES OF OWNER TRUSTEE
          4.01
General Authority . The Owner Trustee is authorized and
directed to execute and deliver the Basic Documents to which the
Trust is to be a party and each certificate or other document
attached as an exhibit to or contemplated by such Basic Documents
and any amendment or other agreement or instrument described
herein, in each case, in such form as the Owner Trustee shall
approve, as evidenced conclusively by the Owner Trustee’s
execution thereof. In addition to the foregoing, the Owner Trustee
is hereby authorized to take all actions required of the Trust
pursuant to the Basic Documents.
          4.02
General Duties . The Owner Trustee shall be responsible to
administer the Trust pursuant to the terms of this Agreement and
the Basic Documents to which the Trust is a party and in the
interest of the Certificateholders, subject to the Basic Documents
and in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement. The Owner
Trustee hereby expressly agrees to execute and deliver any
documents of the Issuer set forth in Sections 3.07, 3.10 and 10.01
of the Indenture.
          
4.03 Action upon Instruction .
          
          
           (a)
Subject to this Article and in accordance with the terms of the
other Basic Documents, the Certificateholders may by written
instruction direct the Owner Trustee in the management of the
Trust. Such direction may be exercised at any time by written
instruction of the Certificateholders pursuant to this
Article.
          
          
           (b)
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Owner Trustee shall not be
required to take any action hereunder or under any other Basic
Document if the Owner Trustee shall have reasonably determined, or
shall have been advised by counsel, that such action is likely to
result in liability on the part of the Owner Trustee or is contrary
to the terms hereof or of any other Basic Document or is otherwise
contrary to law.
          
          
           (c)
Whenever the Owner Trustee is unable to decide between alternative
courses of action permitted or required by the terms of this
Agreement or under any other Basic Document, or in the event that
the Owner Trustee is unsure as to the application of any provision
of this Agreement or any other Basic Document, or any such
provision is ambiguous as to its application, or is, or appears to
be, in conflict with any other applicable provision, or in the
event that this Agreement permits any determination by the Owner
Trustee or is silent or is incomplete as to the course of action
that the Owner Trustee is required to take with respect to a
particular set of facts, the Owner Trustee shall promptly give
notice (in such form as shall be appropriate under the
circumstances) to the Certificateholders requesting instruction as
to the course of action to be adopted, and to the extent the Owner
Trustee acts in good faith in accordance with any written
instructions received from Holders of Certificates representing at
least a majority of the aggregate Percentage Interest, the Owner
Trustee shall not be liable on account of such action to any
Person. If the Owner Trustee shall not have received appropriate
instruction within 10 days of such notice (or such shorter period
as reasonably may be specified in such notice or may be necessary
under the circumstances) it may, but shall be under no duty to,
take or refrain from taking such action not inconsistent with this
Agreement or the other Basic Documents as it shall deem to be in
the best interests of the Certificateholders; and the Owner Trustee
shall have no liability to any Person for such action or
inaction.
          4.04
No Duties Except as Specified under Specified Documents or in
Instructions . The Owner Trustee shall not have any duty or
obligation to manage, make any payment with respect to, register,
record, sell, dispose of, or otherwise deal with the Trust Estate,
or to otherwise take or refrain from taking any action under, or in
connection with, any document contemplated hereby to which the
Owner Trustee is a party, except in accordance with (i) the powers
granted to and the authority conferred upon the Owner Trustee
pursuant to this Agreement, (ii) the Basic Documents and (iii) any
document or instruction delivered to the Owner Trustee pursuant to
Section 4.03; and no implied duties or obligations shall be read
into this Agreement or any other Basic Document against the Owner
Trustee. The Owner Trustee shall have no responsibility for filing
any financing or continuation statement in any public office at any
time or to otherwise perfect or maintain the perfection of any
security interest or Lien granted to it hereunder or to prepare or
file any filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission for the
Trust or to record this Agreement or any other Basic Document. The
Owner Trustee nevertheless agrees that it will, at its own cost and
expense, promptly take all action as may be necessary to discharge
any Liens on any part of the Trust Estate that result from actions
by, or claims against, the Owner Trustee that are not related to
the ownership or the administration of the Trust Estate.
          
4.05 Restrictions .
          
          
           (a)
The Owner Trustee shall not take any action that (i) is
inconsistent with the purposes of the Trust set forth in Section
2.03 or (ii) to the actual knowledge of the Owner Trustee, would
result in the Trust becoming taxable as a corporation for federal
income tax purposes. The Certificateholders shall not direct the
Owner Trustee to take action that would violate the provisions of
this Section.
          
          
           (b)
The Owner Trustee shall not convey or transfer any of the Trust's
properties or assets, including those included in the Trust Estate,
to any person unless (i) it shall have received an Opinion of
Counsel to the effect that such transaction will not have any
material adverse tax consequence to the Trust or any
Certificateholder and (ii) such conveyance or transfer shall not
violate the provisions of Section 3.16(b) of the
Indenture.
          
4.06 Prior Notice to Certificateholders with Respect to Certain
Matters . With respect to the following matters, the Owner
Trustee shall not take action unless at least 30 days before the
taking of such action, the Owner Trustee shall have notified the
Certificateholders in writing of the proposed action and Holders of
Certificates representing at least a majority of the aggregate
Percentage Interest shall not have notified the Owner Trustee in
writing prior to the 30th day after such notice is given that such
Certificateholders have withheld consent or provided alternative
direction:
          
          
           (a)
the initiation of any claim or lawsuit by the Trust (except claims
or lawsuits brought in connection with the collection of cash
distributions due and owing under the Mortgage Loans) and the
compromise of any action, claim or lawsuit brought by or against
the Trust (except with respect to the aforementioned claims or
lawsuits for collection of cash distributions due and owing under
the Mortgage Loans);
          
          
           (b)
the election by the Trust to file an amendment to the Certificate
of Trust (unless such amendment is required to be filed under the
Statutory Trust Statute);
          
          
           (c)
the amendment of the Indenture by a supplemental indenture in
circumstances where the consent of any Noteholder is
required;
          
          
           (d)
the amendment of the Indenture by a supplemental indenture in
circumstances where the consent of any Noteholder is not required
and such amendment materially adversely affects the interest of the
Certificateholders; or
          
          
           (e)
the appointment pursuant to the Indenture of a successor Note
Registrar, Paying Agent or Indenture Trustee or pursuant to this
Agreement of a successor Certificate Registrar or Certificate
Paying Agent, or the consent to the assignment by the Note
Registrar, the Paying Agent, the Indenture Trustee, the Certificate
Registrar or the Certificate Paying Agent of its obligations under
the Indenture or this Agreement, as applicable.
          4.07
Action by Certificateholders with Respect to Certain Matters
. The Owner Trustee shall not have the power, except upon the
written direction of Holders of Certificates representing at least
a majority of the aggregate Percentage Interest of each Class of
Certificates, to (i) remove the Master Servicer under the Sale and
Servicing Agreement pursuant to Sections 3.01(c), 6.02 or 7.01
thereof or (ii) except as expressly provided in the Basic
Documents, sell the Mortgage Loans after the termination of the
Indenture.
          
4.08 Action with Respect to Bankruptcy .
          
          
           (a)
The Trust shall not, without the prior written consent of the Owner
Trustee, (i) institute any proceedings to adjudicate the Trust
bankrupt or insolvent, (ii) consent to the institution of
bankruptcy or insolvency proceedings against the Trust, (iii) file
a petition seeking or consenting to reorganization or relief under
any applicable federal or state law relating to bankruptcy with
respect to the Trust, (iv) consent to the appointment of a
receiver, liquidator, assignee, trustee, sequestrator (or other
similar official) of the Trust or a substantial part of its
property, (v) make any assignment for the benefit of the Trust's
creditors, (vi) cause the Trust to admit in writing its inability
to pay its debts generally as they become due, or (vii) take any
action in furtherance of any of the foregoing (any of the above
foregoing actions, a "Bankruptcy Action"). In considering whether
to give or withhold written consent to the Bankruptcy Action by the
Trust, the Owner Trustee, with the consent of the Certificateholder
(hereby given, which consent the Certificateholder believes to be
in the best interests of the Certificateholder and the Trust),
shall consider the interest of the Noteholders in addition to the
interests of the Trust and whether the Trust is insolvent. The
Owner Trustee shall have no duty to give such written consent to
Bankruptcy Action by the Trust if the Owner Trustee shall not have
been furnished (at the expense of the Trust) or the Person that
requested that such letter be furnished to the Owner Trustee) a
letter from an independent accounting firm of national reputation
stating that in the opinion of such firm the Trust is then
insolvent. The Owner Trustee (as such and in its individual
capacity) shall not be personally liable to any Person on account
of the Owner Trustee's good faith reliance on the provisions of
this Section 4.08 or in connection with the Owner Trustee's giving
prior written consent to Bankruptcy Action by the Trust in
accordance herewith, or withholding such consent, in good faith,
and neither the Trust nor any Certificateholder nor any other
Person shall have any claim for breach of fiduciary duty or
otherwise against the Owner Trustee (as such and in its individual
capacity) for giving or withholding its consent to any such
Bankruptcy Action.
          
          
           (b)
The parties hereto stipulate and agree that no Certificateholder
has power to commence any Bankruptcy Action on the part of the
Trust or to direct the Owner Trustee to take any Bankruptcy Action
on the part of the Trust.
          
          
           (c)
The provisions of this Section 4.08 shall not constitute an
acknowledgment or admission by the Trust, the Owner Trustee, any
Certificateholder or any creditor of the Trust that the Trust is
eligible to be a debtor, under the United States Bankruptcy Code,
11 U.S.C.ss.ss.101 et seq., as amended.
          4.09
Restrictions on Certificateholders’ Power . The
Certificateholders shall not direct the Owner Trustee to take or to
refrain from taking any action if such action or inaction would be
contrary to any obligation of the Trust or the Owner Trustee under
this Agreement or any other Basic Document or would be contrary to
Section 2.03, nor shall the Owner Trustee be obligated to follow
any such direction, if given.
          4.10
Doing Business in Other Jurisdictions . Notwithstanding
anything contained herein to the contrary, neither Wilmington Trust
Company nor the Owner Trustee shall be required to take any action
in any jurisdiction other than in the State of Delaware if the
taking of such action will, even after the appointment of a
co-trustee or separate trustee in accordance with Section 9.05, (i)
require the consent or approval or authorization or order of or the
giving of notice to, or the registration with or the taking of any
other action in respect of, any state or other governmental
authority or agency of any jurisdiction other than the State of
Delaware; (ii) result in any fee, tax or other governmental charge
under the laws of the State of Delaware becoming payable by
Wilmington Trust Company, or (iii) subject Wilmington Trust Company
to personal jurisdiction in any jurisdiction other than the State
of Delaware for causes of action arising from acts unrelated to the
consummation of the transactions by Wilmington Trust Company
contemplated hereby.
          4.11
Majority Control . Except as expressly provided herein, any
action that may be taken by the Certificateholders under this
Agreement may be taken by Holders of Certificates representing at
least a majority of the aggregate Percentage Interest of the Class
specified, if any. Except as expressly provided herein, any written
notice of the Certificateholders of a Class delivered pursuant to
this Agreement shall be effective if signed by Certificateholders
evidencing at least a majority of the aggregate Percentage Interest
of such Class outstanding at the time of the delivery of such
notice.
ARTICLE V

APPLICATION OF TRUST ESTATE
          
5.01 Distributions .
          
          
           (a) On
each Payment Date, the Certificate Paying Agent shall distribute to
the Certificateholders all funds, if any, on deposit in the Trustee
Collection Account for distribution to the Certificateholders as a
result of the application of Section 3.05 of the Indenture. Any
distributions made pursuant to this Section to any Class of
Certificates shall be distributed to the Certificateholders of such
Class pro rata based upon the respective Percentage Interests
thereof.
          
          
           (b) In
the event that any withholding tax is imposed on distributions (or
allocations of income) to a Certificateholder, such tax shall
reduce the amount otherwise distributable to such Certificateholder
in accordance with this Section. The Certificate Paying Agent is
hereby authorized and directed to retain or cause to be retained
from amounts otherwise distributable to the Certificateholders
sufficient funds for the payment of any tax that is legally owed by
the Trust; provided, that such authorization shall not prevent the
Owner Trustee from contesting any such tax in appropriate
Proceedings and withholding payment thereof, if permitted by law,
pending the outcome of such Proceedings. The amount of any
withholding tax imposed with respect to a Certificateholder shall
be treated as cash distributed to such Certificateholder at the
time it is withheld by the Certificate Paying Agent and remitted to
the appropriate taxing authority. If there is a possibility that
withholding tax is payable with respect to a distribution (such as
a distribution to a non-U.S. Certificateholder), the Certificate
Paying Agent may in its sole discretion withhold such amounts in
accordance with this paragraph.
          
          
           (c)
Distributions to Certificateholders shall be subordinated to the
creditors of the Trust, including the Noteholders to the extent set
forth in the Basic Documents.
          5.02
Method of Payment . Subject to Section 8.01(b),
distributions required to be made to Certificateholders on any
Payment Date as provided in Section 5.01 shall be made to each
Certificateholder of record on the preceding Record Date either by,
in the case of any Holder of a Certificate having a Percentage
Interest of at least 20%, wire transfer, in immediately available
funds, to the account of such Certificateholders at a bank or other
entity having appropriate facilities therefor, if such
Certificateholder shall have provided to the Certificate Registrar
appropriate written instructions at least five Business Days prior
to such Payment Date or, if not, by check mailed to such
Certificateholder at the address thereof appearing in the
Certificate Register.
          5.03
Signature on Returns . The Master Servicer, as agent of the
tax matters partner of the Trust (the “Tax Matters
Person”), shall sign on behalf of the Trust the tax returns
of the Trust.
          5.04
Statements to Certificateholders . On each Payment Date (or
promptly after receipt if not received prior to the Payment Date),
the Certificate Paying Agent shall make available to each
Certificateholder the statement or statements provided to the Owner
Trustee and the Certificate Paying Agent pursuant to Section 4.01
of the Sale and Servicing Agreement with respect to such Payment
Date.
          5.05
Tax Reporting; Tax Elections . The Administrator hereby
undertakes to (i) prepare and deliver to the holders of the
Certificates and the Non-Offered Notes (other than the Class M-7
Notes) within 90 days after the expiration of each fiscal year of
the Trust, all information returns required by the Code and
information available to the Administrator with respect to the
Trust necessary for the preparation of such holders’ federal
income tax returns, (ii) prepare all income tax returns of the
Trust in all jurisdictions where in its judgment such filings are
required or where it is directed by the Trust to file such income
tax returns and (iii) deliver such returns to the Owner Trustee not
less than one week prior to their due date in order for such
returns to be timely filed. Pursuant to Treasury Regulation
301.7701-2(c)(2), the Administrator does not intend to file any
income tax returns of the Trust as long as there is a single owner
of the Certificates and the Non-Offered Notes (not including the
Class X-1 Notes or the Class M-7 Notes). If partnership tax returns
are required to be filed, the Administrator shall not be required
to compute the Issuer’s gross income except to the extent
that it can do so without unreasonable effort based upon income
statements furnished to it. It is the intention of the parties that
no portion of the Trust be treated as a partnership for tax
purposes unless there is more than one holder of the Certificates
and the Non-Offered Notes (not including the Class X-1 Notes or the
Class M-7 Notes). The Administrator shall not be required to
prepare any partnership tax returns unless it receives an opinion
of counsel that such returns are required by applicable laws, rule
or regulations to be filed.
          The
Administrator shall (i) act on behalf of the Trust in relation to
any tax matter or controversy involving the Trust and (ii)
represent the Trust in any Proceeding relating to tax examination
or audit by any governmental taxing authority with respect thereto.
The legal expenses, including attorneys’ and
accountants’ fees, the costs of any such Proceeding and any
liability resulting therefrom shall be expenses of the Trust, and
the Administrator shall be entitled to reimbursement therefor from
the Master Servicer out of amounts attributable to the Mortgage
Loans on deposit in the Collection Account as provided by Section
3.04 of the Sale and Servicing Agreement, unless such legal
expenses and costs are incurred by reason of the
Administrator’s willful misfeasance, bad faith or gross
negligence.
ARTICLE VI

CONCERNING THE OWNER TRUSTEE
          6.01
Acceptance of Trusts and Duties . The Owner Trustee accepts
the trusts hereby created and agrees to perform its duties
hereunder with respect to such trusts pursuant to the terms of this
Agreement. The Owner Trustee and the Certificate Paying Agent also
agree to disburse all moneys actually received by them constituting
part of the Trust Estate pursuant to the terms of this Agreement
and the other Basic Documents. The Owner Trustee shall not be
answerable or accountable hereunder or under any other Basic
Document under any circumstance, except (i) for its own willful
misconduct, gross negligence, bad faith or grossly negligent
failure to act or (ii) in the case of the inaccuracy of any
representation or warranty contained in Section 6.03 expressly made
by the Owner Trustee. In particular, without limitation and subject
to the exceptions set forth in the preceding sentence:
          
          
           (a) no
provision of this Agreement or any other Basic Document shall
require the Owner Trustee to expend or risk funds or otherwise
incur any financial liability in the performance of any of its
rights, duties or powers hereunder or under any other Basic
Document, if the Owner Trustee shall have reasonable grounds for
believing that repayment of such funds or adequate indemnity
against such risk or liability is not reasonably assured or
provided to it;
          
          
           (b)
under no circumstances shall the Owner Trustee be liable for
indebtedness evidenced by or arising under any Basic Document,
including the principal of and interest on the Notes;
          
          
           (c)
the Owner Trustee shall not be responsible for the validity or
sufficiency of this Agreement, for the due execution hereof by the
Depositor, for the form, character, genuineness, sufficiency, value
or validity of the Trust Estate or for the validity or sufficiency
of other Basic Documents, the Notes or the Certificates (other than
its certificate of authentication on the Certificate), and the
Owner Trustee shall not assume or incur any liability, duty or
obligation to any Noteholder or Certificateholder, other than as
expressly provided for herein or in the other Basic
Documents;
          
          
           (d)
the execution, delivery, authentication and performance by the
Owner Trustee of this Agreement will not require the authorization,
consent or approval of, the giving of notice to, the filing or
registration with or the taking of any other action with respect
to, any governmental authority or agency;
          
          
           (e)
the Owner Trustee shall not be liable for the default or misconduct
of the Depositor, the Indenture Trustee, the Administrator or the
Master Servicer under any Basic Document or otherwise, and the
Owner Trustee shall have no obligation or liability to perform the
obligations of the Trust under this Agreement or the other Basic
Documents that are required to be performed by the Indenture
Trustee under the Indenture, the Seller or the Purchaser under the
Mortgage Loan Purchase and Servicing Agreement, the Administrator
or the Master Servicer under the Administration Agreement, or the
Master Servicer or the Depositor under the Sale and Servicing
Agreement;
          
          
           (f)
the Owner Trustee shall be under no obligation to exercise any
right or power vested in it or duty imposed upon it by this
Agreement, or to institute, conduct or defend any litigation under
this Agreement or otherwise or in relation to this Agreement or any
other Basic Document, at the request, order or direction of any
Certificateholder, unless such Certificateholder shall have offered
the Owner Trustee security or indemnity satisfactory to it against
the costs, expenses and liabilities that may be incurred by the
Owner Trustee therein or thereby. The right of the Owner Trustee to
perform any discretionary act enumerated in this Agreement or in
any other Basic Document shall not be construed as a duty, and the
Owner Trustee shall not be answerable for other than its gross
negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct in the performance of
any such act; and
          
          
           (g) In
no event shall the Owner Trustee be liable for any act or omission
taken in accordance with the direction of the Certificateholders
pursuant to this Agreement.
          6.02
Furnishing of Documents . The Owner Trustee shall furnish to
the Certificateholders promptly upon receipt of a written
reasonable request therefor, duplicates or copies of all reports,
notices, requests, demands, certificates, financial statements and
any other instruments furnished to the Trust under the Basic
Documents.
          6.03
Representations and Warranties . The Owner Trustee hereby
represents and warrants to the Depositor, for the benefit of the
Certificateholders, that:
          
          
           (a) it
is a banking corporation duly organized and validly existing in
good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware. It has all
requisite corporate power and authority to execute, deliver and
perform its obligations under this Agreement;
          
          
           (b) it
has taken all corporate action necessary to authorize the execution
and delivery by it of this Agreement, and this Agreement will be
executed and delivered by one of its officers who is duly
authorized to execute and deliver this Agreement on its
behalf;
          
          
           (c)
neither the execution nor the delivery by it of this Agreement, nor
the consummation by it of the transactions contemplated hereby nor
compliance by it with any terms or provisions hereof will
contravene any federal or Delaware law, governmental rule or
regulation governing the banking or trust powers of the Owner
Trustee or any judgment or order binding on it, or constitute any
default under its charter documents or bylaws or any indenture,
mortgage, contract, agreement or instrument to which it is a party
or by which any of its properties may be bound;
          
          
           (d)
this Agreement, assuming due authorization, execution and delivery
by the Owner Trustee and the Depositor, constitutes a valid, legal
and binding obligation of the Owner Trustee, enforceable against it
in accordance with the terms hereof subject to applicable
bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium and other laws
affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and to
general principles of equity, regardless of whether such
enforcement is considered in a Proceeding in equity or at
law;
          
          
           (e)
the Owner Trustee is not in default with respect to any order or
decree of any court or any order, regulation or demand of any
federal, state, municipal or governmental agency, which default
might have consequences that would materially and adversely affect
the condition (financial or otherwise) or operations of the Owner
Trustee or its properties or might have consequences that would
materially adversely affect its performance hereunder;
and
          
          
           (f) no
litigation is pending or, to the best of the Owner Trustee's
knowledge, threatened against the Owner Trustee that would prohibit
its entering into this Agreement or performing its obligations
under this Agreement.
          
6.04 Reliance; Advice of Counsel .
          
          
           (a)
The Owner Trustee shall incur no liability to anyone in acting upon
any signature, instrument, notice, resolution, request, consent,
order, certificate, report, opinion, bond, or other document or
paper believed by it to be genuine and believed by it to be signed
by the proper party or parties. The Owner Trustee may accept a
certified copy of a resolution of the board of directors or other
governing body of any corporate party as conclusive evidence that
such resolution has been duly adopted by such body and that the
same is in full force and effect. As to any fact or matter the
method of










 


















Trust Agreement, Trust Contracts - Free Legal Documents (page 1 Of 78)

















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Trust Agreement    

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents













SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>








Trust Agreements 





	These Trust Agreements are actual legal documents drafted by top law firms for their clients. Use them for competitive intelligence, drafting documents or to get information about transactions within a particular industry or sector. We have millions of legal documents and clauses that you can search for free.	



1) TRUST AGREEMENT AMONG ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC, DEPOSITOR BNY MELLON TRUST OF DELAWARE, OWNER TRUSTEE AND THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, AS PAYING AGENT DATED AS OF MARCH 29, 2017Parties: ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC | BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 3/31/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
2) AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENTParties: FORD CREDIT AUTO LEASE TRUST 2017-A | BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON | FORD CREDIT AUTO LEASE TWO LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/30/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
3) AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENTParties: FORD CREDIT AUTO LEASE TWO LLC | BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
4) TRUST AGREEMENT AMONG ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC, DEPOSITOR BNY MELLON TRUST OF DELAWARE, OWNER TRUSTEE AND THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, AS PAYING AGENT DATED AS OF MARCH 29, 2017Parties: ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC | BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
5) TRUST SALE AGREEMENT BETWEEN ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC DEPOSITOR AND ALLY AUTO RECEIVABLES TRUST 2017-2 ISSUING ENTITY DATED AS OF MARCH 29, 2017Parties: ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC | Closing Date, Ally Bank | DEUTSCHE BANK NATIONAL TRUST COMPANY | DEUTSCHE BANK TRUST COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
6) CNH EQUIPMENT TRUST 2017-A PURCHASE AGREEMENTParties: CNH CAPITAL RECEIVABLES LLC | CNH INDUSTRIAL CAPITAL AMERICA LLC 
								Law Firm: Greenberg Traurig
								Document Date: 3/22/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
7) CNH EQUIPMENT TRUST 2017-A PURCHASE AGREEMENTParties: CNH CAPITAL RECEIVABLES LLC | CNH INDUSTRIAL CAPITAL AMERICA LLC 
								Law Firm: Greenberg Traurig
								Document Date: 3/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
8) TRUST AGREEMENTParties: CNH EQUIPMENT TRUST 2017-A | Citibank, NA | CNH CAPITAL RECEIVABLES LLC | WILMINGTON TRUST COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 3/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
9) CNH EQUIPMENT TRUST 2017-A PURCHASE AGREEMENTParties: CNH EQUIPMENT TRUST 2017-A | CNH CAPITAL RECEIVABLES LLC | CNH INDUSTRIAL CAPITAL AMERICA LLC 
								Law Firm: Greenberg Traurig
								Document Date: 3/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
10) TRUST AGREEMENTParties: CNH CAPITAL RECEIVABLES LLC | Citibank, NA | WILMINGTON TRUST COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 3/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
11) AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENTParties: TOYOTA AUTO FINANCE RECEIVABLES LLC | ADMINISTRATOR, TOYOTA MOTOR CREDIT CORPORATION, TOYOTA AUTO FINANCE RECEIVABLES LLC | Corporate Trust Services 
								
								Document Date: 3/15/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
12) TRUST AGREEMENTParties: WORLD OMNI AUTO LEASING LLC | DEPOSITOR, ANY AFFILIATE | MUFG Union Bank, NA | US BANK TRUST NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 3/15/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
13) FIRST AMENDMENT TO SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED DECLARATION OF TRUST AND TRUST AGREEMENT OF EQUINOX FRONTIER FUNDS A Delaware Statutory TrustParties: EQUINOX FRONTIER BALANCED FUND | Equinox Frontier Funds | Equinox Fund Management, LLC | Frontier Fund Management LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

14) FIRST AMENDMENT TO SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED DECLARATION OF TRUST AND TRUST AGREEMENT OF EQUINOX FRONTIER FUNDS A Delaware Statutory TrustParties: EQUINOX FRONTIER FUNDS | Equinox Fund Management, LLC | Frontier Fund Management LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

15) FORM OF AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENTParties: TOYOTA AUTO FINANCE RECEIVABLES LLC | ADMINISTRATOR, TOYOTA MOTOR CREDIT CORPORATION, TOYOTA AUTO FINANCE RECEIVABLES LLC | Corporate Trust Services 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
16) TRUST AGREEMENTParties: WORLD OMNI LT | DEPOSITOR, ANY AFFILIATE | MUFG Union Bank, NA | US BANK TRUST NATIONAL ASSOCIATION | WORLD OMNI AUTO LEASING LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
17) MODERN MEDIA ACQUISITION CORP. and CONTINENTAL STOCK TRANSFER  TRUST COMPANY FORM OF WARRANT AGREEMENT Dated as of , 2017Parties: MODERN MEDIA ACQUISITION CORP. | Continental Stock Transfer  Trust Company | MODERN MEDIA ACQUISITION CORP | Modern Media Sponsor, LLC 
								Law Firm: Jones Day
								Document Date: 3/8/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
18) JOHN DEERE OWNER TRUST 2017 TRUST AGREEMENT between JOHN DEERE RECEIVABLES, INC. Depositor and WELLS FARGO DELAWARE TRUST COMPANY, N.A. Owner Trustee Dated as of March 1, 2017Parties: JOHN DEERE OWNER TRUST 2017 | Deere  Company | John Deere Receivables, Inc | US Bank National Association 
								
								Document Date: 3/2/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
19) AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENT amongParties: CREDIT ACCEPTANCE CORP | CREDIT ACCEPTANCE FUNDING LLC | Trust and US BANK TRUST NATIONAL ASSOCIATION | WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								Law Firm: Skadden Arps
								Document Date: 3/1/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
20) LCI INDUSTRIES GRANTOR TRUST AGREEMENTParties: LCI INDUSTRIES | WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017

21) AMENDMENT TO THE TRUST AGREEMENT Establishing theParties: ZIONS BANCORPORATION /UT/ | Prudential Bank | Prudential Financial, Inc, CIGNA Bank  Trust Company 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Connecticut
22) SEVENTH AMENDMENT TO TRUST AGREEMENT BETWEEN FIDELITY MANAGEMENT TRUST COMPANY AND ZIONS BANCORPORATIONParties: ZIONS BANCORPORATION /UT/ | Fidelity Management Trust Company 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017

23) SIXTH AMENDMENT TO TRUST AGREEMENT BETWEEN FIDELITY MANAGEMENT TRUST COMPANY AND FMC CORPORATIONParties: FMC CORP | Fidelity Management Trust Company | FMC Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017

24) AMENDED AND RESTATED 80% COINSURANCE TRUST AGREEMENT Dated as of March 31, 2016 amongParties: PRIMERICA, INC. | Bank of New York Mellon | PECAN RE INC | Primerica Life Insurance Company 
								Law Firm: DLA Piper;Debevoise Plimpton
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Massachusetts
25) SILVER BAY REALTY TRUST CORP. ANNOUNCES AGREEMENT TO BE ACQUIRED BY TRICON CAPITAL GROUP INC. IN $1.4 BILLION ALL-CASH TRANSACTION; REPORTS STRONG FOURTH QUARTER AND FULL YEAR 2016 FINANCIAL RESULTSParties: SILVER BAY REALTY TRUST CORP. | Silver Bay Realty Trust Corp | Tricon Capital Group Inc 
								Law Firm: Orrick Herrington
								Document Date: 2/27/2017

26) JOHN DEERE OWNER TRUST 2017 TRUST AGREEMENT between JOHN DEERE RECEIVABLES, INC. Depositor and WELLS FARGO DELAWARE TRUST COMPANY, N.A. Owner Trustee Dated as of March 1, 2017Parties: JOHN DEERE OWNER TRUST 2017 | Deere  Company | John Deere Receivables, Inc | US Bank National Association 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
27) INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT TRUST AGREEMENTParties: MATLIN  PARTNERS ACQUISITION CORP | Cantor Fitzgerald  Co | Continental Stock Transfer  Trust Company | Investment Management | Matlin  Partners Acquisition Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/15/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
28) TRUST AGREEMENT AMONG ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC, DEPOSITOR BNY MELLON TRUST OF DELAWARE, OWNER TRUSTEE AND THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, AS PAYING AGENT DATED AS OF JANUARY 31, 2017Parties: ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC | BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 2/2/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
29) SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENTParties: FORD CREDIT AUTO OWNER TRUST 2017-A | FORD CREDIT AUTO RECEIVABLES TWO LLC | US BANK TRUST NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 1/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
30) TRUST AGREEMENT [BETWEEN][AMONG] ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC, DEPOSITOR [AND] BNY MELLON TRUST OF DELAWARE, OWNER TRUSTEE [AND THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, AS PAYING AGENT]1Parties: ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC | BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 1/26/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
31) TRUST SALE AGREEMENTParties: ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC | Closing Date, Ally Bank | DEUTSCHE BANK NATIONAL TRUST COMPANY | DEUTSCHE BANK TRUST COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 1/26/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
32) INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT TRUST AGREEMENTParties: FINTECH ACQUISITION CORP. II | Cantor Fitzgerald  Co | Continental Stock Transfer  Trust Company | FinTech Acquisition Corp | Investment Management 
								
								Document Date: 1/25/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
33) SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENTParties: FORD CREDIT AUTO OWNER TRUST 2017-A | FORD CREDIT AUTO RECEIVABLES TWO LLC | US BANK TRUST NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 1/20/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
34) VORNADO REALTY TRUST 2017 OUTPERFORMANCE PLAN AWARD AGREEMENTParties: VORNADO REALTY LP | VORNADO REALTY TRUST 
								
								Document Date: 1/20/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
35) TRUST SUPPLEMENT NO. 2017-1A Dated as of January 13, 2017 between AMERICAN AIRLINES, INC., and WILMINGTON TRUST COMPANY, as Trustee, to PASS THROUGH TRUST AGREEMENT Dated as of September 16, 2014 American Airlines Pass Through Trust 2017-1A American Airlines Pass Through Certificates, Series 2017-1AParties: AMERICAN AIRLINES INC | AMERICAN AIRLINES, INC | CEDE  CO | Wilmington Trust Company 
								
								Document Date: 1/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
36) TRUST SUPPLEMENT NO. 2017-1AA Dated as of January 13, 2017 between AMERICAN AIRLINES, INC., and WILMINGTON TRUST COMPANY, as Trustee, to PASS THROUGH TRUST AGREEMENT Dated as of September 16, 2014 American Airlines Pass Through Trust 2017-1AA American Airlines Pass Through Certificates, Series 2017Parties: AMERICAN AIRLINES INC | AMERICAN AIRLINES, INC | CEDE  CO | Wilmington Trust Company 
								
								Document Date: 1/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
37) TRUST SUPPLEMENT NO. 2017-1B Dated as of January 13, 2017 between AMERICAN AIRLINES, INC., and WILMINGTON TRUST COMPANY, as Trustee, to PASS THROUGH TRUST AGREEMENT Dated as of September 16, 2014 American Airlines Pass Through Trust 2017-1B American Airlines Pass Through Certificates, Series 2017-1BParties: AMERICAN AIRLINES INC | AMERICAN AIRLINES, INC | CEDE  CO | Wilmington Trust Company 
								
								Document Date: 1/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
38) LIQUIDATING TRUST AGREEMENTParties: ICON LEASING FUND ELEVEN, LLC | ICON CAPITAL, LLC | NRAI SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 1/5/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
39) LIQUIDATING TRUST AGREEMENTParties: ICON LEASING FUND TWELVE, LLC | ICON CAPITAL, LLC | NRAI SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 1/5/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
40) AMENDMENT TO INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT TRUST AGREEMENTParties: INSPIRED ENTERTAINMENT, INC. | Continental Stock Transfer  Trust Company | Hydra Industries Acquisition Corp | Investment Management 
								
								Document Date: 12/30/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
41) COLLATERAL TRUST AGREEMENT dated as of October 3, 2016 among TEX OPERATIONS COMPANY LLC, as the Company, the Grantors from time to time party heretoParties: VISTRA ENERGY CORP | 4CHANGE ENERGY COMPANY LLC | BIG BROWN POWER COMPANY LLC | BRIGHTEN ENERGY LLC | COMANCHE PEAK POWER COMPANY LLC | DALLAS POWER  LIGHT COMPANY, INC | DEUTSCHE BANK AG | EFH CORPORATE SERVICES COMPANY | EFH PROPERTIES COMPANY | ENERGY INDUSTRIES COMPANY, INC | FORNEY PIPELINE, LLC | GENERATION SVC COMPANY | LA FRONTERA HOLDINGS, LLC | LONE ST AR PIPELINE COMPANY, INC | LONE STAR ENERGY COMPANY, INC | LUMINANT ENERGY COMPANY LLC | LUMINANT ENERGY TRADING CALIFORNIA COMPANY | LUMINANT ET SERVICES COMPANY LLC | LUMINANT GENERATION COMPANY LLC | Luminant Mining Company, LLC | NCA RESOURCES DEVELOPMENT COMPANY LLC | OAK GROVE MANAGEMENT COMPANY LLC | RAILROAD COMMISSION | SANDOW POWER COMPANY LLC | SOUTHWESTERN ELECTRIC SERVICE COMPANY, INC | TEX ASSET COMPANY LLC | TEX FINANCE CORP | TEX INTERMEDIATE COMPANY LLC | TEX OPERATIONS COMPANY LLC | TEX PREFERRED INC | TXU ELECTRIC COMPANY, INC | TXU ENERGY RETAIL COMPANY LLC | TXU RETAIL SERVICES COMPANY | UTILITIES COMPANY, INC | UTILITIES ELECTRIC COMPANY, INC 
								
								Document Date: 12/23/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
42) INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT TRUST AGREEMENTParties: FINTECH ACQUISITION CORP. II | Cantor Fitzgerald  Co | Continental Stock Transfer  Trust Company | FinTech Acquisition Corp | Investment Management 
								
								Document Date: 12/23/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
43) Second Amended and Restated Depositary Trust AgreementParties: ISHARES SILVER TRUST | BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON | CEDE  CO | Product Management 
								
								Document Date: 12/22/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
44) ZIMMER BIOMET HOLDINGS, INC., AS ISSUER ELAVON FINANCIAL SERVICES DAC, UK BRANCH, AS PAYING AGENT ELAVON FINANCIAL SERVICES DAC, AS TRANSFER AGENT ELAVON FINANCIAL SERVICES DAC, AS REGISTRAR - AND - WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, AS TRUSTEE AGENCY AGREEMENTParties: ZIMMER BIOMET HOLDINGS, INC. | CEDE  CO | ELAVON FINANCIAL SERVICES | WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION | ZIMMER BIOMET HOLDINGS, INC | ZIMMER HOLDINGS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 12/13/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
45) Amendment No. 1 to Second Amended and Restated Trust AgreementParties: MEDALLION FINANCIAL CORP | DZ BANK AG | Medallion Funding Corp | MEDALLION FUNDING LLC | US BANK TRUST, NA 
								
								Document Date: 12/13/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
46) GRANTOR TRUST AGREEMENT BETWEEN PENTEGRA TRUST COMPANY AND FEDERAL HOME LOAN BANK OF NEW YORKParties: FEDERAL HOME LOAN BANK OF NEW YORK | Federal Home Loan Bank of New York, New York | PENTEGRA TRUST COMPANY | RSGroup Trust Company 
								
								Document Date: 12/9/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Maine
47) SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENT OF COMPASS DIVERSIFIED HOLDINGS AMONG COMPASS GROUP DIVERSIFIED HOLDINGS LLC as SponsorParties: COMPASS DIVERSIFIED HOLDINGS | ANY OTHER REGULATORY AUTHORITY | ANY STATE SECURITIES COMMISSION | COMPASS GROUP DIVERSIFIED HOLDINGS LLC 
								Law Firm: Richards Layton;Patton Boggs
								Document Date: 12/7/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
48) HUNTINGTON AUTO TRUST 2016-1 AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENT between HUNTINGTON FUNDING, LLC, as the Depositor and CITIBANK, N.A., as the Owner Trustee and CITICORP TRUST DELAWARE, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as the Issuer Delaware Trustee Dated as of November 30, 2016Parties: HUNTINGTON AUTO TRUST 2016-1 | CEDE  CO | CITIBANK, NA | HUNTINGTON FUNDING, LLC | Huntington National Bank | WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 12/1/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
49) FOURTH AMENDMENT TO INDEMNIFICATION TRUST AGREEMENTParties: J C PENNEY CO INC | Chemical Bank | J C Penney Company, Inc, J C Penney Corporation, Inc | JPMorgan Chase Bank | SunTrust Bank 
								
								Document Date: 11/30/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
50) HUNTINGTON AUTO TRUST 2016-1 AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENT between HUNTINGTON FUNDING, LLC, as the Depositor and CITIBANK, N.A., as the Owner Trustee and CITICORP TRUST DELAWARE, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as the Issuer Delaware Trustee Dated as of November 30, 2016Parties: HUNTINGTON AUTO TRUST 2016-1 | CEDE  CO | CITIBANK, NA | HUNTINGTON FUNDING, LLC | Huntington National Bank | WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 11/29/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
 




Browse by StateGo directly to a specific page of results:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233343536373839404142434445464748495051525354555657585960616263646566676869707172737475767778 
 
 

 















Bear Stearns - Wikipedia






















 






Bear Stearns

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc.





Former type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: BSC


Industry
Investment services


Fate
acquired by JP Morgan Chase


Founded
1923


Defunct
March 2008


Headquarters
New York City, US



Key people

Alan Schwartz, former CEO
James Cayne, former Chairman & CEO


Products
Financial services
Investment banking
Investment management


Parent
JPMorgan Chase


Website
www.bear.com


The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc. was a New York-based global investment bank, securities trading and brokerage firm that failed in 2008 as part of the global financial crisis and recession, and was subsequently sold to JPMorgan Chase. Its main business areas before its failure were capital markets, investment banking, wealth management and global clearing services, and it was heavily involved in the subprime mortgage crisis.
In the years leading up to the failure, Bear Stearns was heavily involved in securitization and issued large amounts of asset-backed securities, which in the case of mortgages, were pioneered by Lewis Ranieri, "the father of mortgage securities".[1] As investor losses mounted in those markets in 2006 and 2007, the company actually increased its exposure, especially the mortgage-backed assets that were central to the subprime mortgage crisis. In March 2008, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York provided an emergency loan to try to avert a sudden collapse of the company. The company could not be saved however and was sold to JP Morgan Chase for $10 per share, a price far below its pre-crisis 52-week high of $133.20 per share, but not as low as the $2 per share originally agreed upon by Bear Stearns and JP Morgan Chase.[2]
The collapse of the company was a prelude to the risk management meltdown of the investment banking industry in the United States and elsewhere that culminated in September 2008, and the subsequent global financial crisis of 2008–2009. In January 2010, JPMorgan ceased using the Bear Stearns name.[3]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Lead-up to the failure – increasing exposure to subprime mortgages
1.2 Start of the crisis – two subprime mortgage funds fail
1.3 Fed bailout and sale to JPMorgan Chase


2 Structure prior to collapse

2.1 Managing Partners/Chief Executive Officers
2.2 Major shareholders


3 See also
4 References
5 Further reading
6 External links



History[edit]




Bear Stearns' former offices at 383 Madison Avenue


Bear Stearns was founded as an equity trading house on May Day 1923 by Joseph Ainslee Bear, Robert B. Stearns and Harold C. Mayer Sr. with $500,000 in capital. Internal tensions quickly arose among the three founders. The firm survived the Wall Street Crash of 1929 without laying off any employees and by 1933 opened its first branch office in Chicago. In 1955 the firm opened its first international office in Amsterdam.[4]
In 1985, Bear Stearns became a publicly traded company.[4] It served corporations, institutions, governments, and individuals. The company's business included corporate finance, mergers and acquisitions, institutional equities, fixed income sales & risk management, trading and research, private client services, derivatives, foreign exchange and futures sales and trading, asset management and custody services. Through Bear Stearns Securities Corp., it offered global clearing services to broker dealers, prime broker clients and other professional traders, including securities lending.[5] Bear Stearns was also known for one of the most widely read market intelligence pieces on the street, known as the "Early Look at the Market."[citation needed]
Bear Stearns' World Headquarters was located at 383 Madison Avenue, between East 46th Street and East 47th Street in Manhattan. By 2007, the company employed more than 15,500 people worldwide.[6] The firm was headquartered in New York City with offices in Atlanta, Boston, Chicago, Dallas, Denver, Houston, Los Angeles, Irvine, San Francisco, St. Louis, Whippany, New Jersey; and San Juan, Puerto Rico. Internationally the firm had offices in London, Beijing, Dublin, Frankfurt, Hong Kong, Lugano, Milan, São Paulo, Mumbai, Shanghai, Singapore and Tokyo.
In 2005–2007, Bear Stearns was recognized as the "Most Admired" securities firm in Fortune's "America's Most Admired Companies" survey, and second overall in the securities firm section.[7] The annual survey is a prestigious ranking of employee talent, quality of risk management and business innovation. This was the second time in three years that Bear Stearns had achieved this "top" distinction.
Lead-up to the failure – increasing exposure to subprime mortgages[edit]
By November 2006, the company had total capital of approximately $66.7 billion and total assets of $350.4 billion and according to the April 2005 issue of Institutional Investor magazine, Bear Stearns was the seventh-largest securities firm in terms of total capital.
A year later Bear Stearns had notional contract amounts of approximately $13.40 trillion in derivative financial instruments, of which $1.85 trillion were listed futures and option contracts. In addition, Bear Stearns was carrying more than $28 billion in 'level 3' assets on its books at the end of fiscal 2007 versus a net equity position of only $11.1 billion. This $11.1 billion supported $395 billion in assets,[8] which means a leverage ratio of 35.6 to 1. This highly leveraged balance sheet, consisting of many illiquid and potentially worthless assets, led to the rapid diminution of investor and lender confidence, which finally evaporated as Bear was forced to call the New York Federal Reserve to stave off the looming cascade of counterparty risk which would ensue from forced liquidation.
Start of the crisis – two subprime mortgage funds fail[edit]
Main article: 2007 subprime mortgage financial crisis
See also: Subprime lending and Collateralized debt obligation
On June 22, 2007, Bear Stearns pledged a collateralized loan of up to $3.2 billion to "bail out" one of its funds, the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Fund, while negotiating with other banks to loan money against collateral to another fund, the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Enhanced Leveraged Fund. Bear Stearns had originally put up just $25 million, so they were hesitant about the bailout; nonetheless, CEO James Cayne and other senior executives worried about the damage to the company's reputation.[9][10] The funds were invested in thinly traded collateralized debt obligations (CDOs). Merrill Lynch seized $850 million worth of the underlying collateral but only was able to auction $100 million of them. The incident sparked concern of contagion as Bear Stearns might be forced to liquidate its CDOs, prompting a mark-down of similar assets in other portfolios.[11][12] Richard A. Marin, a senior executive at Bear Stearns Asset Management responsible for the two hedge funds, was replaced on June 29 by Jeffrey B. Lane, a former Vice Chairman of rival investment bank, Lehman Brothers.[13]
During the week of July 16, 2007, Bear Stearns disclosed that the two subprime hedge funds had lost nearly all of their value amid a rapid decline in the market for subprime mortgages.
On August 1, 2007, investors in the two funds took action against Bear Stearns and its top board and risk management managers and officers. The law firms of Jake Zamansky & Associates and Rich & Intelisano both filed arbitration claims with the National Association of Securities Dealers alleging that Bear Stearns misled investors about its exposure to the funds. This was the first legal action made against Bear Stearns. Co-President Warren Spector was asked to resign on August 5, 2007, as a result of the collapse of two hedge funds tied to subprime mortgages. A September 21 report in the New York Times noted that Bear Stearns posted a 61 percent drop in net profits due to their hedge fund losses.[14] With Samuel Molinaro's November 15 revelation that Bear Stearns was writing down a further $1.2 billion in mortgage-related securities and would face its first loss in 83 years, Standard & Poor's downgraded the company's credit rating from AA to A.[15]
Matthew Tannin and Ralph R. Cioffi, both former managers of hedge funds at Bear Stearns Companies, were arrested June 19, 2008.[16] They faced criminal charges and were found not guilty of misleading investors about the risks involved in the subprime market. Tannin and Cioffi have also been named in lawsuits brought by Barclays Bank, which claims they were one of the many investors misled by the executives.[17][18]
They were also named in civil lawsuits brought in 2007 by investors, including Barclays Bank, who claimed they had been misled. Barclays claimed that Bear Stearns knew that certain assets in the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Strategies Enhanced Leverage Master Fund were worth much less than their professed values. The suit claimed that Bear Stearns managers devised "a plan to make more money for themselves and further to use the Enhanced Fund as a repository for risky, poor-quality investments." The lawsuit said Bear Stearns told Barclays that the enhanced fund was up almost 6% through June 2007—when "in reality, the portfolio's asset values were plummeting."[19]
Other investors in the fund included Jeffrey E. Epstein's Financial Trust Company.[20]
Fed bailout and sale to JPMorgan Chase[edit]
On March 14, 2008, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York agreed to provide a $25 billion loan to Bear Stearns collateralized by free and clear assets from Bear Stearns in order to provide Bear Stearns the liquidity for up to 28 days that the market was refusing to provide. Shortly thereafter the Federal Reserve Bank of New York had a change of heart and told Bear Stearns that the 28-day loan was unavailable to them.[21] The deal was then changed to where the NY FED would create a company to buy $30 billion worth of Bear Stearns assets. Two days later, on March 16, 2008, Bear Stearns signed a merger agreement with JP Morgan Chase in a stock swap worth $2 a share or less than 7 percent of Bear Stearns' market value just two days before.[22] This sale price represented a staggering loss as its stock had traded at $172 a share as late as January 2007, and $93 a share as late as February 2008. The new company is funded by loans of $29 billion from the New York FRB, and $1 billion from JP Morgan Chase (the junior loan), with no further recourse to JP Morgan Chase.[23] This non-recourse loan means that the loan is collateralized by mortgage debt[24] and that the government cannot seize JP Morgan Chase's assets if the mortgage debt collateral becomes insufficient to repay the loan.[24][25] Chairman of the Fed, Ben Bernanke, defended the bailout by stating that a bankruptcy of Bear Stearns would have affected the real economy[26] and could have caused a "chaotic unwinding" of investments across the US markets.[22]
On March 20, Securities and Exchange Commission Chairman Christopher Cox said the collapse of Bear Stearns was due to a lack of confidence, not a lack of capital. Cox noted that Bear Stearns's problems escalated when rumors spread about its liquidity crisis which in turn eroded investor confidence in the firm. "Notwithstanding that Bear Stearns continued to have high quality collateral to provide as security for borrowings, market counterparties became less willing to enter into collateralized funding arrangements with Bear Stearns," said Cox. Bear Stearns' liquidity pool started at $18.1 billion on March 10 and then plummeted to $2 billion on March 13. Ultimately market rumors about Bear Stearns' difficulties became self-fulfilling, Cox said.[27]
On March 24, 2008, a class action was filed on behalf of shareholders, challenging the terms of JPMorgan’s recently announced acquisition of Bear Stearns.[28] That same day, a new agreement was reached that raised JPMorgan Chase's offer to $10 a share, up from the initial $2 offer, which meant an offer of $1.2 billion.[29] The revised deal was aimed to quiet upset investors and any subsequent legal action brought against JP Morgan Chase as a result of the deal as well as to prevent employees, many of whose past compensation consisted of Bear Stearns stock, from leaving for other firms. The Bear Stearns bailout was seen as an extreme-case scenario, and continues to raise significant questions about Fed intervention. On April 8, 2008, Paul A. Volcker stated that the Fed has taken 'actions that extend to the very edge of its lawful and implied powers.' See his remarks at a Luncheon of the Economic Club of New York.[30] On May 29, Bear Stearns shareholders approved the sale to JPMorgan Chase at the $10-per-share price.[31]
An article by journalist Matt Taibbi for Rolling Stone contended that naked short selling had a role in the demise of both Bear Stearns and Lehman Brothers.[32] A study by finance researchers at the University of Oklahoma Price College of Business studied trading in financial stocks, including Bear Stearns and Lehman Brothers, and found "no evidence that stock price declines were caused by naked short selling."[33]
Structure prior to collapse[edit]
Managing Partners/Chief Executive Officers[edit]

Salim L. Lewis: 1949–1978
Alan C. Greenberg: 1978–1993
James Cayne: 1993–2008
Alan Schwartz: 2008–collapse

Major shareholders[edit]
The largest Bear Stearns shareholders as of December 2007 were:[34]

Barrow Hanley Mewhinney & Strauss – 9.73%
Joseph C. Lewis – 9.36%
Morgan Stanley – 5.37%
James Cayne – 4.94%
Legg Mason Capital Management – 4.84%
Private Capital Management – 4.49%
Barclays Global Investors – 3.10%
State Street Global Advisors – 3.01%
The Vanguard Group – 2.67%
Janus Capital Management – 2.34%

See also[edit]


New York City portal
Companies portal



Primary dealer
Bankruptcy of Lehman Brothers
Lehman Brothers
Bear Stearns Merchant Banking

References[edit]


^ Lowenstein, Roger The End Of Wall Street, Penguin Press 2010, pp.xvii,22 ISBN 978-1-59420-239-1
^ Ross, Andrew (March 17, 2008). "JP Morgan Pays $2 a Share for Bear Stearns". The New York Times.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.
^ Bear Stearns Brand Finally Fades, Two Years After Collapse
^ a b "Could Bear Stearns Do Better?". The New York Times. March 17, 2008. Retrieved March 17, 2008. 
^ "Bear Stearns Companies, Inc.", International Directory of Company Histories, Vol. 52, St. James Press, 2003 
^ Tim McLaughlin (November 28, 2007). "Bear Stearns to cut 650 jobs globally". Reuters. 
^ "America's Most Admired Companies 2007 FORTUNE". CNN. Retrieved August 23, 2011. 
^ Boyd, Roddy (March 31, 2008). "The last days of Bear Stearns". Fortune. Archived from the original on September 19, 2008.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.
^ Burrough, Bryan. "Bringing Down Bear Stearns". Vanity Fair. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ Creswell, Julie; Bajaj, Vikas (June 23, 2007), "$3.2 Billion Move by Bear Stearns to Rescue Fund", New York Times, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Siew, Walden; Yoon, Al (June 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns CDO liquidation sparks contagion fears", Reuters 
^ Pittman, Mark (June 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns Fund Collapse Sends Shock Through CDOs", Bloomberg, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Bajaj, Vikas (June 30, 2007), "Bear Stearns Shakes Up Funds Unit", New York Times, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Grynbaum, Michael M. (September 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns Profit Plunges 61% on Subprime Woes", New York Times, retrieved September 14, 2008 
^ Basar, Shanny; Ahuja, Vivek (November 15, 2007), "Bear downgraded in face of first loss in 83 years", Financial News Online, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ DealBook (June 19, 2008). "Behind the Scenes of Bear's Fund Meltdown". The New York Times. 
^ "2 Former Bear Stearns Managers Arrested". NY Times. Associated Press. June 19, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2008. 
^ Charges at Bear Stearns linked to subprime debacle Archived June 20, 2008, at the Wayback Machine. By TOM HAYS, Associated Press Writer, 6/19/08.
^ Ex-Bear Stearns managers arrested at their homes Archived June 20, 2008, at the Wayback Machine. By Tom Hays, Associated Press, 6/19/08.
^ More Bad News for Jeff Epstein? JULY 11, 2007, Dealbook, New York Times retrieved 2011 3 25
^ FRONTLINE: Inside the Meltdown – You Have a Weekend to Save Yourself Retrieved February 26, 2009
^ a b Fed Aided Bear Stearns as Firm Faced Chapter 11, Bernanke Says. Bloomberg, April 2, 2008
^ http://www.jpmorgan.com/cm/Satellite?c=JPM_Content_C&cid=1159339104093&pagename=JPM_redesign%2FJPM_Content_C%2FGeneric_Detail_Page_Template
^ a b "Bear Stearns Bondholders Win Big". Seeking Alpha. March 27, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ "Weekly Market Comment: Why is Bear Stearns Trading at $6 Instead of $2". Hussman Funds. March 24, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ "Bernanke Defends Bear Stearns Bailout". CBS News. April 3, 2008. 
^ Chairman Cox Letter To Basel Committee In Support Of New Guidance On Liquidity Management (PDF), March 20, 2008, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ C&T Files Complaint and Temporary Restraining Order Challenging Bear Stearns Buyout by JPMorgan, March 24, 2008, archived from the original on May 13, 2008, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Seeking Fast Deal, JPMorgan Quintuples Bear Stearns Bid. New York Times, March 25, 2008
^ Niall Ferguson: The Ascent of Money: A Financial History of The World, Chapter 6: From Empire to Chimerica; Chimerica, p. 338
^ White, Ben (May 29, 2008), "Bear Stearns passes into Wall Street history", Financial Times 
^ Taibbi, Matt (October 2009). "Wall Street's Naked Swindle". Rolling Stone. Retrieved October 15, 2009. 
^ http://www.cfr-cologne.de/download/workingpaper/cfr-09-09.pdf
^ Wright, William (March 17, 2008). "Employees lose $5bn on Bear Stearns". Financial News.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.


Further reading[edit]

William Cohan (2010). House of Cards: A Tale of Hubris and Wretched Excess on Wall Street.

External links[edit]

JPMorgan Securities home page
FRONTLINE: Inside the Meltdown Analysis—The Bear Stearns Rescue
New York Times Timeline of Bear Stearns' history
Bloomberg: JPMorgan Chase to Buy Bear Stearns for $240 Million
J.P. Morgan Buys Bear in Fire Sale, As Fed Widens Credit to Avert Crisis - WSJ





Links to related articles











v
t
e


JPMorgan Chase



Divisions



J.P. Morgan & Co.
Chase Bank
Chase Paymentech
Chase Card Services Canada
EMC Mortgage Company
Highbridge Capital Management
J.P. Morgan Cazenove
One Equity Partners





Notable current executives



Jamie Dimon (CEO)
Matthew E. Zames
Steven Black
Jing Ulrich





Notable former executives



John Pierpont Morgan
J. P. Morgan Jr.
Junius Spencer Morgan
George Peabody
Henry Sturgis Morgan
David Rockefeller
William B. Harrison Jr.
John B. McCoy
Walter V. Shipley
Douglas A. Warner III
Temple Bowdoin
Jes Staley
Blythe Masters
James B. Lee Jr.
Thomas W. Lamont
Dennis Weatherstone
John J. McCloy
Winthrop Aldrich





Board of directors



Crandall C. Bowles
Stephen B. Burke
David M. Cote
James S. Crown
Jamie Dimon
Ellen V. Futter
William H. Gray
Laban P. Jackson Jr.
David C. Novak
Lee R. Raymond
William C. Weldon





Historical components



American Fletcher
Anchor Savings Bank
Banca Commerciale Italiana Trust Co.
Bank One Corporation
The Manhattan Company
Bank United of Texas
Bear Stearns
CenTrust Bank
Chase Manhattan Bank
Chemical Bank
Corn Exchange Bank
Dime Savings Bank of New York
First Chicago Bank
First USA Bank
Great Western Bank
Hambrecht & Quist
H. F. Ahmanson & Co.
Jardine Fleming
J.P. Morgan & Co.
Lincoln Savings
Manufacturers Hanover
National Bank of Detroit
National Park Bank
New York Trust Company
Providian
Robert Fleming & Co.
State Bank of Chicago
Texas Commerce Bank
Valley National Bank of Arizona
Washington Mutual





Buildings



125 London Wall
245 Park Avenue
25 Bank Street
270 Park Avenue
277 Park Avenue
383 Madison Avenue
Chase Field
Chase Tower (Amarillo)
Chase Tower (Chicago)
Chase Tower (Dallas)
Chase Tower (El Paso)
Chase Tower (Englewood, Colorado)
Chase Tower (Indianapolis)
Chase Tower (Milwaukee)
Chase Tower (Oklahoma City)
Chase Tower (Phoenix)
Chase Tower (Rochester)
Chater House
Indiana Michigan Power Center (Fort Wayne)
JPMorgan Chase Building (San Francisco)
JPMorgan Chase Tower (Houston)
McCoy Building
One Chase Manhattan Plaza
The Qube (Detroit)








 Category
 Commons
 Wikiversity












v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List












v
t
e


Corporate scandals






South Sea Company (1720)
Panic of 1890 (Baring crisis) (1890)
Salad Oil (1963)
Banco Ambrosiano (1982)
Carrian Group (1983)
Guinness (1986)
Polly Peck (1990)
Bank of Credit and Commerce International (1990)
Metallgesellschaft (1993)
Barings Bank (1995)
Sumitomo Corporation (1996)
Archer Daniels Midland (1997)
Long-Term Capital Management (2000)
One.Tel (2001)
Enron (2001)
Adelphia (2002)
WorldCom (2002)
Tyco (2004)
Bayou Hedge Fund Group (2005)
Société Générale (2008)
Bear Stearns (2008)
Libor (2008–2012)
Anglo Irish Bank (2008–2011)
Volkswagen emissions scandal (2008-ongoing)
Satyam (2009)
Olympus (2011)
OCZ (2012-2013)
Forex (2013–)
Tesco (2014)
Toshiba (2015)
Target Australia (2016)
Wells Fargo account fraud scandal (2016-ongoing)
Daewoo Shipbuilding & Marine Engineering (2016)












v
t
e


Great Recession



By region



Africa
Americas

United States
South America


Asia
Europe
Oceania





United States-specific



Automotive industry crisis
California budget crisis
Housing bubble
Housing market correction
Subprime mortgage crisis





Banking losses and fraud



Anglo Irish Bank hidden loans controversy
Libor scandal

Tom Hayes


Société Générale trading loss
Forex scandal
Seán FitzPatrick
Bernard Madoff
Tom Petters
Scott W. Rothstein
Allen Stanford





Government entities



Consumer Financial Protection Bureau
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Federal Home Loan Banks
Federal Housing Administration
Federal Housing Finance Agency
Federal Housing Finance Board
Federal Reserve System
Government National Mortgage Association
Irish Bank Resolution Corporation
National Asset Management Agency
Office of Federal Housing Enterprise Oversight
Office of Financial Stability
UK Financial Investments










Government policy and spending responses



Banking and finance
stability and reform



Anglo Irish Bank Corporation Act 2009
Banking (Special Provisions) Act 2008
China–Japan–South Korea trilateral summit
Commercial Paper Funding Facility
Dodd–Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act
Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008
Irish emergency budget, 2009
Irish budget, 2010
Irish budget, 2011
Irish budget, 2012
Irish budget, 2013
Temporary Liquidity Guarantee Program
Term Asset-Backed Securities Loan Facility
Troubled Asset Relief Program
2008 United Kingdom bank rescue package




Bank stress tests



EU
U.S.








Stimulus and recovery



2008 European Union stimulus plan
2008–09 Keynesian resurgence
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009
Chinese economic stimulus program
Economic Stimulus Act of 2008
Fraud Enforcement and Recovery Act of 2009
Green New Deal
Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008
National fiscal policy response to the Great Recession
Zero interest-rate policy





Government interventions,
rescues, and acquisitions



List of banks acquired or bankrupted during the Great Recession




Non-banking



Chrysler
General Motors











Securities involved
and financial markets



Auction rate securities
Collateralized debt obligations
Collateralized mortgage obligations
Credit default swaps
Mortgage-backed securities
Secondary mortgage market





Social responses



Tea Party protests (United States; c. 2009)
May Day protests (Europe, Middle East and North Africa, Asia; 2009)
Occupy movement (worldwide)





Related topics



2000s energy crisis

Central Asia: 2008


Effects on museums
Decline of newspapers
World food price crisis








European debt crisis
Financial crisis of 2007–08
List of countries by public debt














Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 147604903
LCCN: nr94015164










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Bear_Stearns&oldid=791270892"					
Categories: Bear Stearns1923 establishments in New York2000s economic history2008 acquisitions2008 disestablishments in New YorkBank failures in the United StatesBanks disestablished in 2008Banks established in 1923Companies based in New York CityFinancial services companies established in 1923Financial crisesFormer investment banksInvestment management companies of the United StatesJPMorgan ChaseHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from October 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2014Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEspañolEsperantoفارسیFrançais한국어ItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSuomiSvenskaУкраїнськаייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 19 July 2017, at 05:25.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Bear Stearns - Wikipedia






















 






Bear Stearns

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc.





Former type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: BSC


Industry
Investment services


Fate
acquired by JP Morgan Chase


Founded
1923


Defunct
March 2008


Headquarters
New York City, US



Key people

Alan Schwartz, former CEO
James Cayne, former Chairman & CEO


Products
Financial services
Investment banking
Investment management


Parent
JPMorgan Chase


Website
www.bear.com


The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc. was a New York-based global investment bank, securities trading and brokerage firm that failed in 2008 as part of the global financial crisis and recession, and was subsequently sold to JPMorgan Chase. Its main business areas before its failure were capital markets, investment banking, wealth management and global clearing services, and it was heavily involved in the subprime mortgage crisis.
In the years leading up to the failure, Bear Stearns was heavily involved in securitization and issued large amounts of asset-backed securities, which in the case of mortgages, were pioneered by Lewis Ranieri, "the father of mortgage securities".[1] As investor losses mounted in those markets in 2006 and 2007, the company actually increased its exposure, especially the mortgage-backed assets that were central to the subprime mortgage crisis. In March 2008, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York provided an emergency loan to try to avert a sudden collapse of the company. The company could not be saved however and was sold to JP Morgan Chase for $10 per share, a price far below its pre-crisis 52-week high of $133.20 per share, but not as low as the $2 per share originally agreed upon by Bear Stearns and JP Morgan Chase.[2]
The collapse of the company was a prelude to the risk management meltdown of the investment banking industry in the United States and elsewhere that culminated in September 2008, and the subsequent global financial crisis of 2008–2009. In January 2010, JPMorgan ceased using the Bear Stearns name.[3]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Lead-up to the failure – increasing exposure to subprime mortgages
1.2 Start of the crisis – two subprime mortgage funds fail
1.3 Fed bailout and sale to JPMorgan Chase


2 Structure prior to collapse

2.1 Managing Partners/Chief Executive Officers
2.2 Major shareholders


3 See also
4 References
5 Further reading
6 External links



History[edit]




Bear Stearns' former offices at 383 Madison Avenue


Bear Stearns was founded as an equity trading house on May Day 1923 by Joseph Ainslee Bear, Robert B. Stearns and Harold C. Mayer Sr. with $500,000 in capital. Internal tensions quickly arose among the three founders. The firm survived the Wall Street Crash of 1929 without laying off any employees and by 1933 opened its first branch office in Chicago. In 1955 the firm opened its first international office in Amsterdam.[4]
In 1985, Bear Stearns became a publicly traded company.[4] It served corporations, institutions, governments, and individuals. The company's business included corporate finance, mergers and acquisitions, institutional equities, fixed income sales & risk management, trading and research, private client services, derivatives, foreign exchange and futures sales and trading, asset management and custody services. Through Bear Stearns Securities Corp., it offered global clearing services to broker dealers, prime broker clients and other professional traders, including securities lending.[5] Bear Stearns was also known for one of the most widely read market intelligence pieces on the street, known as the "Early Look at the Market."[citation needed]
Bear Stearns' World Headquarters was located at 383 Madison Avenue, between East 46th Street and East 47th Street in Manhattan. By 2007, the company employed more than 15,500 people worldwide.[6] The firm was headquartered in New York City with offices in Atlanta, Boston, Chicago, Dallas, Denver, Houston, Los Angeles, Irvine, San Francisco, St. Louis, Whippany, New Jersey; and San Juan, Puerto Rico. Internationally the firm had offices in London, Beijing, Dublin, Frankfurt, Hong Kong, Lugano, Milan, São Paulo, Mumbai, Shanghai, Singapore and Tokyo.
In 2005–2007, Bear Stearns was recognized as the "Most Admired" securities firm in Fortune's "America's Most Admired Companies" survey, and second overall in the securities firm section.[7] The annual survey is a prestigious ranking of employee talent, quality of risk management and business innovation. This was the second time in three years that Bear Stearns had achieved this "top" distinction.
Lead-up to the failure – increasing exposure to subprime mortgages[edit]
By November 2006, the company had total capital of approximately $66.7 billion and total assets of $350.4 billion and according to the April 2005 issue of Institutional Investor magazine, Bear Stearns was the seventh-largest securities firm in terms of total capital.
A year later Bear Stearns had notional contract amounts of approximately $13.40 trillion in derivative financial instruments, of which $1.85 trillion were listed futures and option contracts. In addition, Bear Stearns was carrying more than $28 billion in 'level 3' assets on its books at the end of fiscal 2007 versus a net equity position of only $11.1 billion. This $11.1 billion supported $395 billion in assets,[8] which means a leverage ratio of 35.6 to 1. This highly leveraged balance sheet, consisting of many illiquid and potentially worthless assets, led to the rapid diminution of investor and lender confidence, which finally evaporated as Bear was forced to call the New York Federal Reserve to stave off the looming cascade of counterparty risk which would ensue from forced liquidation.
Start of the crisis – two subprime mortgage funds fail[edit]
Main article: 2007 subprime mortgage financial crisis
See also: Subprime lending and Collateralized debt obligation
On June 22, 2007, Bear Stearns pledged a collateralized loan of up to $3.2 billion to "bail out" one of its funds, the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Fund, while negotiating with other banks to loan money against collateral to another fund, the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Enhanced Leveraged Fund. Bear Stearns had originally put up just $25 million, so they were hesitant about the bailout; nonetheless, CEO James Cayne and other senior executives worried about the damage to the company's reputation.[9][10] The funds were invested in thinly traded collateralized debt obligations (CDOs). Merrill Lynch seized $850 million worth of the underlying collateral but only was able to auction $100 million of them. The incident sparked concern of contagion as Bear Stearns might be forced to liquidate its CDOs, prompting a mark-down of similar assets in other portfolios.[11][12] Richard A. Marin, a senior executive at Bear Stearns Asset Management responsible for the two hedge funds, was replaced on June 29 by Jeffrey B. Lane, a former Vice Chairman of rival investment bank, Lehman Brothers.[13]
During the week of July 16, 2007, Bear Stearns disclosed that the two subprime hedge funds had lost nearly all of their value amid a rapid decline in the market for subprime mortgages.
On August 1, 2007, investors in the two funds took action against Bear Stearns and its top board and risk management managers and officers. The law firms of Jake Zamansky & Associates and Rich & Intelisano both filed arbitration claims with the National Association of Securities Dealers alleging that Bear Stearns misled investors about its exposure to the funds. This was the first legal action made against Bear Stearns. Co-President Warren Spector was asked to resign on August 5, 2007, as a result of the collapse of two hedge funds tied to subprime mortgages. A September 21 report in the New York Times noted that Bear Stearns posted a 61 percent drop in net profits due to their hedge fund losses.[14] With Samuel Molinaro's November 15 revelation that Bear Stearns was writing down a further $1.2 billion in mortgage-related securities and would face its first loss in 83 years, Standard & Poor's downgraded the company's credit rating from AA to A.[15]
Matthew Tannin and Ralph R. Cioffi, both former managers of hedge funds at Bear Stearns Companies, were arrested June 19, 2008.[16] They faced criminal charges and were found not guilty of misleading investors about the risks involved in the subprime market. Tannin and Cioffi have also been named in lawsuits brought by Barclays Bank, which claims they were one of the many investors misled by the executives.[17][18]
They were also named in civil lawsuits brought in 2007 by investors, including Barclays Bank, who claimed they had been misled. Barclays claimed that Bear Stearns knew that certain assets in the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Strategies Enhanced Leverage Master Fund were worth much less than their professed values. The suit claimed that Bear Stearns managers devised "a plan to make more money for themselves and further to use the Enhanced Fund as a repository for risky, poor-quality investments." The lawsuit said Bear Stearns told Barclays that the enhanced fund was up almost 6% through June 2007—when "in reality, the portfolio's asset values were plummeting."[19]
Other investors in the fund included Jeffrey E. Epstein's Financial Trust Company.[20]
Fed bailout and sale to JPMorgan Chase[edit]
On March 14, 2008, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York agreed to provide a $25 billion loan to Bear Stearns collateralized by free and clear assets from Bear Stearns in order to provide Bear Stearns the liquidity for up to 28 days that the market was refusing to provide. Shortly thereafter the Federal Reserve Bank of New York had a change of heart and told Bear Stearns that the 28-day loan was unavailable to them.[21] The deal was then changed to where the NY FED would create a company to buy $30 billion worth of Bear Stearns assets. Two days later, on March 16, 2008, Bear Stearns signed a merger agreement with JP Morgan Chase in a stock swap worth $2 a share or less than 7 percent of Bear Stearns' market value just two days before.[22] This sale price represented a staggering loss as its stock had traded at $172 a share as late as January 2007, and $93 a share as late as February 2008. The new company is funded by loans of $29 billion from the New York FRB, and $1 billion from JP Morgan Chase (the junior loan), with no further recourse to JP Morgan Chase.[23] This non-recourse loan means that the loan is collateralized by mortgage debt[24] and that the government cannot seize JP Morgan Chase's assets if the mortgage debt collateral becomes insufficient to repay the loan.[24][25] Chairman of the Fed, Ben Bernanke, defended the bailout by stating that a bankruptcy of Bear Stearns would have affected the real economy[26] and could have caused a "chaotic unwinding" of investments across the US markets.[22]
On March 20, Securities and Exchange Commission Chairman Christopher Cox said the collapse of Bear Stearns was due to a lack of confidence, not a lack of capital. Cox noted that Bear Stearns's problems escalated when rumors spread about its liquidity crisis which in turn eroded investor confidence in the firm. "Notwithstanding that Bear Stearns continued to have high quality collateral to provide as security for borrowings, market counterparties became less willing to enter into collateralized funding arrangements with Bear Stearns," said Cox. Bear Stearns' liquidity pool started at $18.1 billion on March 10 and then plummeted to $2 billion on March 13. Ultimately market rumors about Bear Stearns' difficulties became self-fulfilling, Cox said.[27]
On March 24, 2008, a class action was filed on behalf of shareholders, challenging the terms of JPMorgan’s recently announced acquisition of Bear Stearns.[28] That same day, a new agreement was reached that raised JPMorgan Chase's offer to $10 a share, up from the initial $2 offer, which meant an offer of $1.2 billion.[29] The revised deal was aimed to quiet upset investors and any subsequent legal action brought against JP Morgan Chase as a result of the deal as well as to prevent employees, many of whose past compensation consisted of Bear Stearns stock, from leaving for other firms. The Bear Stearns bailout was seen as an extreme-case scenario, and continues to raise significant questions about Fed intervention. On April 8, 2008, Paul A. Volcker stated that the Fed has taken 'actions that extend to the very edge of its lawful and implied powers.' See his remarks at a Luncheon of the Economic Club of New York.[30] On May 29, Bear Stearns shareholders approved the sale to JPMorgan Chase at the $10-per-share price.[31]
An article by journalist Matt Taibbi for Rolling Stone contended that naked short selling had a role in the demise of both Bear Stearns and Lehman Brothers.[32] A study by finance researchers at the University of Oklahoma Price College of Business studied trading in financial stocks, including Bear Stearns and Lehman Brothers, and found "no evidence that stock price declines were caused by naked short selling."[33]
Structure prior to collapse[edit]
Managing Partners/Chief Executive Officers[edit]

Salim L. Lewis: 1949–1978
Alan C. Greenberg: 1978–1993
James Cayne: 1993–2008
Alan Schwartz: 2008–collapse

Major shareholders[edit]
The largest Bear Stearns shareholders as of December 2007 were:[34]

Barrow Hanley Mewhinney & Strauss – 9.73%
Joseph C. Lewis – 9.36%
Morgan Stanley – 5.37%
James Cayne – 4.94%
Legg Mason Capital Management – 4.84%
Private Capital Management – 4.49%
Barclays Global Investors – 3.10%
State Street Global Advisors – 3.01%
The Vanguard Group – 2.67%
Janus Capital Management – 2.34%

See also[edit]


New York City portal
Companies portal



Primary dealer
Bankruptcy of Lehman Brothers
Lehman Brothers
Bear Stearns Merchant Banking

References[edit]


^ Lowenstein, Roger The End Of Wall Street, Penguin Press 2010, pp.xvii,22 ISBN 978-1-59420-239-1
^ Ross, Andrew (March 17, 2008). "JP Morgan Pays $2 a Share for Bear Stearns". The New York Times.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.
^ Bear Stearns Brand Finally Fades, Two Years After Collapse
^ a b "Could Bear Stearns Do Better?". The New York Times. March 17, 2008. Retrieved March 17, 2008. 
^ "Bear Stearns Companies, Inc.", International Directory of Company Histories, Vol. 52, St. James Press, 2003 
^ Tim McLaughlin (November 28, 2007). "Bear Stearns to cut 650 jobs globally". Reuters. 
^ "America's Most Admired Companies 2007 FORTUNE". CNN. Retrieved August 23, 2011. 
^ Boyd, Roddy (March 31, 2008). "The last days of Bear Stearns". Fortune. Archived from the original on September 19, 2008.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.
^ Burrough, Bryan. "Bringing Down Bear Stearns". Vanity Fair. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ Creswell, Julie; Bajaj, Vikas (June 23, 2007), "$3.2 Billion Move by Bear Stearns to Rescue Fund", New York Times, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Siew, Walden; Yoon, Al (June 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns CDO liquidation sparks contagion fears", Reuters 
^ Pittman, Mark (June 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns Fund Collapse Sends Shock Through CDOs", Bloomberg, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Bajaj, Vikas (June 30, 2007), "Bear Stearns Shakes Up Funds Unit", New York Times, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Grynbaum, Michael M. (September 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns Profit Plunges 61% on Subprime Woes", New York Times, retrieved September 14, 2008 
^ Basar, Shanny; Ahuja, Vivek (November 15, 2007), "Bear downgraded in face of first loss in 83 years", Financial News Online, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ DealBook (June 19, 2008). "Behind the Scenes of Bear's Fund Meltdown". The New York Times. 
^ "2 Former Bear Stearns Managers Arrested". NY Times. Associated Press. June 19, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2008. 
^ Charges at Bear Stearns linked to subprime debacle Archived June 20, 2008, at the Wayback Machine. By TOM HAYS, Associated Press Writer, 6/19/08.
^ Ex-Bear Stearns managers arrested at their homes Archived June 20, 2008, at the Wayback Machine. By Tom Hays, Associated Press, 6/19/08.
^ More Bad News for Jeff Epstein? JULY 11, 2007, Dealbook, New York Times retrieved 2011 3 25
^ FRONTLINE: Inside the Meltdown – You Have a Weekend to Save Yourself Retrieved February 26, 2009
^ a b Fed Aided Bear Stearns as Firm Faced Chapter 11, Bernanke Says. Bloomberg, April 2, 2008
^ http://www.jpmorgan.com/cm/Satellite?c=JPM_Content_C&cid=1159339104093&pagename=JPM_redesign%2FJPM_Content_C%2FGeneric_Detail_Page_Template
^ a b "Bear Stearns Bondholders Win Big". Seeking Alpha. March 27, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ "Weekly Market Comment: Why is Bear Stearns Trading at $6 Instead of $2". Hussman Funds. March 24, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ "Bernanke Defends Bear Stearns Bailout". CBS News. April 3, 2008. 
^ Chairman Cox Letter To Basel Committee In Support Of New Guidance On Liquidity Management (PDF), March 20, 2008, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ C&T Files Complaint and Temporary Restraining Order Challenging Bear Stearns Buyout by JPMorgan, March 24, 2008, archived from the original on May 13, 2008, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Seeking Fast Deal, JPMorgan Quintuples Bear Stearns Bid. New York Times, March 25, 2008
^ Niall Ferguson: The Ascent of Money: A Financial History of The World, Chapter 6: From Empire to Chimerica; Chimerica, p. 338
^ White, Ben (May 29, 2008), "Bear Stearns passes into Wall Street history", Financial Times 
^ Taibbi, Matt (October 2009). "Wall Street's Naked Swindle". Rolling Stone. Retrieved October 15, 2009. 
^ http://www.cfr-cologne.de/download/workingpaper/cfr-09-09.pdf
^ Wright, William (March 17, 2008). "Employees lose $5bn on Bear Stearns". Financial News.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.


Further reading[edit]

William Cohan (2010). House of Cards: A Tale of Hubris and Wretched Excess on Wall Street.

External links[edit]

JPMorgan Securities home page
FRONTLINE: Inside the Meltdown Analysis—The Bear Stearns Rescue
New York Times Timeline of Bear Stearns' history
Bloomberg: JPMorgan Chase to Buy Bear Stearns for $240 Million
J.P. Morgan Buys Bear in Fire Sale, As Fed Widens Credit to Avert Crisis - WSJ





Links to related articles











v
t
e


JPMorgan Chase



Divisions



J.P. Morgan & Co.
Chase Bank
Chase Paymentech
Chase Card Services Canada
EMC Mortgage Company
Highbridge Capital Management
J.P. Morgan Cazenove
One Equity Partners





Notable current executives



Jamie Dimon (CEO)
Matthew E. Zames
Steven Black
Jing Ulrich





Notable former executives



John Pierpont Morgan
J. P. Morgan Jr.
Junius Spencer Morgan
George Peabody
Henry Sturgis Morgan
David Rockefeller
William B. Harrison Jr.
John B. McCoy
Walter V. Shipley
Douglas A. Warner III
Temple Bowdoin
Jes Staley
Blythe Masters
James B. Lee Jr.
Thomas W. Lamont
Dennis Weatherstone
John J. McCloy
Winthrop Aldrich





Board of directors



Crandall C. Bowles
Stephen B. Burke
David M. Cote
James S. Crown
Jamie Dimon
Ellen V. Futter
William H. Gray
Laban P. Jackson Jr.
David C. Novak
Lee R. Raymond
William C. Weldon





Historical components



American Fletcher
Anchor Savings Bank
Banca Commerciale Italiana Trust Co.
Bank One Corporation
The Manhattan Company
Bank United of Texas
Bear Stearns
CenTrust Bank
Chase Manhattan Bank
Chemical Bank
Corn Exchange Bank
Dime Savings Bank of New York
First Chicago Bank
First USA Bank
Great Western Bank
Hambrecht & Quist
H. F. Ahmanson & Co.
Jardine Fleming
J.P. Morgan & Co.
Lincoln Savings
Manufacturers Hanover
National Bank of Detroit
National Park Bank
New York Trust Company
Providian
Robert Fleming & Co.
State Bank of Chicago
Texas Commerce Bank
Valley National Bank of Arizona
Washington Mutual





Buildings



125 London Wall
245 Park Avenue
25 Bank Street
270 Park Avenue
277 Park Avenue
383 Madison Avenue
Chase Field
Chase Tower (Amarillo)
Chase Tower (Chicago)
Chase Tower (Dallas)
Chase Tower (El Paso)
Chase Tower (Englewood, Colorado)
Chase Tower (Indianapolis)
Chase Tower (Milwaukee)
Chase Tower (Oklahoma City)
Chase Tower (Phoenix)
Chase Tower (Rochester)
Chater House
Indiana Michigan Power Center (Fort Wayne)
JPMorgan Chase Building (San Francisco)
JPMorgan Chase Tower (Houston)
McCoy Building
One Chase Manhattan Plaza
The Qube (Detroit)








 Category
 Commons
 Wikiversity












v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List












v
t
e


Corporate scandals






South Sea Company (1720)
Panic of 1890 (Baring crisis) (1890)
Salad Oil (1963)
Banco Ambrosiano (1982)
Carrian Group (1983)
Guinness (1986)
Polly Peck (1990)
Bank of Credit and Commerce International (1990)
Metallgesellschaft (1993)
Barings Bank (1995)
Sumitomo Corporation (1996)
Archer Daniels Midland (1997)
Long-Term Capital Management (2000)
One.Tel (2001)
Enron (2001)
Adelphia (2002)
WorldCom (2002)
Tyco (2004)
Bayou Hedge Fund Group (2005)
Société Générale (2008)
Bear Stearns (2008)
Libor (2008–2012)
Anglo Irish Bank (2008–2011)
Volkswagen emissions scandal (2008-ongoing)
Satyam (2009)
Olympus (2011)
OCZ (2012-2013)
Forex (2013–)
Tesco (2014)
Toshiba (2015)
Target Australia (2016)
Wells Fargo account fraud scandal (2016-ongoing)
Daewoo Shipbuilding & Marine Engineering (2016)












v
t
e


Great Recession



By region



Africa
Americas

United States
South America


Asia
Europe
Oceania





United States-specific



Automotive industry crisis
California budget crisis
Housing bubble
Housing market correction
Subprime mortgage crisis





Banking losses and fraud



Anglo Irish Bank hidden loans controversy
Libor scandal

Tom Hayes


Société Générale trading loss
Forex scandal
Seán FitzPatrick
Bernard Madoff
Tom Petters
Scott W. Rothstein
Allen Stanford





Government entities



Consumer Financial Protection Bureau
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Federal Home Loan Banks
Federal Housing Administration
Federal Housing Finance Agency
Federal Housing Finance Board
Federal Reserve System
Government National Mortgage Association
Irish Bank Resolution Corporation
National Asset Management Agency
Office of Federal Housing Enterprise Oversight
Office of Financial Stability
UK Financial Investments










Government policy and spending responses



Banking and finance
stability and reform



Anglo Irish Bank Corporation Act 2009
Banking (Special Provisions) Act 2008
China–Japan–South Korea trilateral summit
Commercial Paper Funding Facility
Dodd–Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act
Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008
Irish emergency budget, 2009
Irish budget, 2010
Irish budget, 2011
Irish budget, 2012
Irish budget, 2013
Temporary Liquidity Guarantee Program
Term Asset-Backed Securities Loan Facility
Troubled Asset Relief Program
2008 United Kingdom bank rescue package




Bank stress tests



EU
U.S.








Stimulus and recovery



2008 European Union stimulus plan
2008–09 Keynesian resurgence
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009
Chinese economic stimulus program
Economic Stimulus Act of 2008
Fraud Enforcement and Recovery Act of 2009
Green New Deal
Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008
National fiscal policy response to the Great Recession
Zero interest-rate policy





Government interventions,
rescues, and acquisitions



List of banks acquired or bankrupted during the Great Recession




Non-banking



Chrysler
General Motors











Securities involved
and financial markets



Auction rate securities
Collateralized debt obligations
Collateralized mortgage obligations
Credit default swaps
Mortgage-backed securities
Secondary mortgage market





Social responses



Tea Party protests (United States; c. 2009)
May Day protests (Europe, Middle East and North Africa, Asia; 2009)
Occupy movement (worldwide)





Related topics



2000s energy crisis

Central Asia: 2008


Effects on museums
Decline of newspapers
World food price crisis








European debt crisis
Financial crisis of 2007–08
List of countries by public debt














Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 147604903
LCCN: nr94015164










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Bear_Stearns&oldid=791270892"					
Categories: Bear Stearns1923 establishments in New York2000s economic history2008 acquisitions2008 disestablishments in New YorkBank failures in the United StatesBanks disestablished in 2008Banks established in 1923Companies based in New York CityFinancial services companies established in 1923Financial crisesFormer investment banksInvestment management companies of the United StatesJPMorgan ChaseHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from October 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2014Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEspañolEsperantoفارسیFrançais한국어ItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSuomiSvenskaУкраїнськаייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 19 July 2017, at 05:25.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Bear Stearns - Wikipedia






















 






Bear Stearns

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc.





Former type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: BSC


Industry
Investment services


Fate
acquired by JP Morgan Chase


Founded
1923


Defunct
March 2008


Headquarters
New York City, US



Key people

Alan Schwartz, former CEO
James Cayne, former Chairman & CEO


Products
Financial services
Investment banking
Investment management


Parent
JPMorgan Chase


Website
www.bear.com


The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc. was a New York-based global investment bank, securities trading and brokerage firm that failed in 2008 as part of the global financial crisis and recession, and was subsequently sold to JPMorgan Chase. Its main business areas before its failure were capital markets, investment banking, wealth management and global clearing services, and it was heavily involved in the subprime mortgage crisis.
In the years leading up to the failure, Bear Stearns was heavily involved in securitization and issued large amounts of asset-backed securities, which in the case of mortgages, were pioneered by Lewis Ranieri, "the father of mortgage securities".[1] As investor losses mounted in those markets in 2006 and 2007, the company actually increased its exposure, especially the mortgage-backed assets that were central to the subprime mortgage crisis. In March 2008, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York provided an emergency loan to try to avert a sudden collapse of the company. The company could not be saved however and was sold to JP Morgan Chase for $10 per share, a price far below its pre-crisis 52-week high of $133.20 per share, but not as low as the $2 per share originally agreed upon by Bear Stearns and JP Morgan Chase.[2]
The collapse of the company was a prelude to the risk management meltdown of the investment banking industry in the United States and elsewhere that culminated in September 2008, and the subsequent global financial crisis of 2008–2009. In January 2010, JPMorgan ceased using the Bear Stearns name.[3]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Lead-up to the failure – increasing exposure to subprime mortgages
1.2 Start of the crisis – two subprime mortgage funds fail
1.3 Fed bailout and sale to JPMorgan Chase


2 Structure prior to collapse

2.1 Managing Partners/Chief Executive Officers
2.2 Major shareholders


3 See also
4 References
5 Further reading
6 External links



History[edit]




Bear Stearns' former offices at 383 Madison Avenue


Bear Stearns was founded as an equity trading house on May Day 1923 by Joseph Ainslee Bear, Robert B. Stearns and Harold C. Mayer Sr. with $500,000 in capital. Internal tensions quickly arose among the three founders. The firm survived the Wall Street Crash of 1929 without laying off any employees and by 1933 opened its first branch office in Chicago. In 1955 the firm opened its first international office in Amsterdam.[4]
In 1985, Bear Stearns became a publicly traded company.[4] It served corporations, institutions, governments, and individuals. The company's business included corporate finance, mergers and acquisitions, institutional equities, fixed income sales & risk management, trading and research, private client services, derivatives, foreign exchange and futures sales and trading, asset management and custody services. Through Bear Stearns Securities Corp., it offered global clearing services to broker dealers, prime broker clients and other professional traders, including securities lending.[5] Bear Stearns was also known for one of the most widely read market intelligence pieces on the street, known as the "Early Look at the Market."[citation needed]
Bear Stearns' World Headquarters was located at 383 Madison Avenue, between East 46th Street and East 47th Street in Manhattan. By 2007, the company employed more than 15,500 people worldwide.[6] The firm was headquartered in New York City with offices in Atlanta, Boston, Chicago, Dallas, Denver, Houston, Los Angeles, Irvine, San Francisco, St. Louis, Whippany, New Jersey; and San Juan, Puerto Rico. Internationally the firm had offices in London, Beijing, Dublin, Frankfurt, Hong Kong, Lugano, Milan, São Paulo, Mumbai, Shanghai, Singapore and Tokyo.
In 2005–2007, Bear Stearns was recognized as the "Most Admired" securities firm in Fortune's "America's Most Admired Companies" survey, and second overall in the securities firm section.[7] The annual survey is a prestigious ranking of employee talent, quality of risk management and business innovation. This was the second time in three years that Bear Stearns had achieved this "top" distinction.
Lead-up to the failure – increasing exposure to subprime mortgages[edit]
By November 2006, the company had total capital of approximately $66.7 billion and total assets of $350.4 billion and according to the April 2005 issue of Institutional Investor magazine, Bear Stearns was the seventh-largest securities firm in terms of total capital.
A year later Bear Stearns had notional contract amounts of approximately $13.40 trillion in derivative financial instruments, of which $1.85 trillion were listed futures and option contracts. In addition, Bear Stearns was carrying more than $28 billion in 'level 3' assets on its books at the end of fiscal 2007 versus a net equity position of only $11.1 billion. This $11.1 billion supported $395 billion in assets,[8] which means a leverage ratio of 35.6 to 1. This highly leveraged balance sheet, consisting of many illiquid and potentially worthless assets, led to the rapid diminution of investor and lender confidence, which finally evaporated as Bear was forced to call the New York Federal Reserve to stave off the looming cascade of counterparty risk which would ensue from forced liquidation.
Start of the crisis – two subprime mortgage funds fail[edit]
Main article: 2007 subprime mortgage financial crisis
See also: Subprime lending and Collateralized debt obligation
On June 22, 2007, Bear Stearns pledged a collateralized loan of up to $3.2 billion to "bail out" one of its funds, the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Fund, while negotiating with other banks to loan money against collateral to another fund, the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Enhanced Leveraged Fund. Bear Stearns had originally put up just $25 million, so they were hesitant about the bailout; nonetheless, CEO James Cayne and other senior executives worried about the damage to the company's reputation.[9][10] The funds were invested in thinly traded collateralized debt obligations (CDOs). Merrill Lynch seized $850 million worth of the underlying collateral but only was able to auction $100 million of them. The incident sparked concern of contagion as Bear Stearns might be forced to liquidate its CDOs, prompting a mark-down of similar assets in other portfolios.[11][12] Richard A. Marin, a senior executive at Bear Stearns Asset Management responsible for the two hedge funds, was replaced on June 29 by Jeffrey B. Lane, a former Vice Chairman of rival investment bank, Lehman Brothers.[13]
During the week of July 16, 2007, Bear Stearns disclosed that the two subprime hedge funds had lost nearly all of their value amid a rapid decline in the market for subprime mortgages.
On August 1, 2007, investors in the two funds took action against Bear Stearns and its top board and risk management managers and officers. The law firms of Jake Zamansky & Associates and Rich & Intelisano both filed arbitration claims with the National Association of Securities Dealers alleging that Bear Stearns misled investors about its exposure to the funds. This was the first legal action made against Bear Stearns. Co-President Warren Spector was asked to resign on August 5, 2007, as a result of the collapse of two hedge funds tied to subprime mortgages. A September 21 report in the New York Times noted that Bear Stearns posted a 61 percent drop in net profits due to their hedge fund losses.[14] With Samuel Molinaro's November 15 revelation that Bear Stearns was writing down a further $1.2 billion in mortgage-related securities and would face its first loss in 83 years, Standard & Poor's downgraded the company's credit rating from AA to A.[15]
Matthew Tannin and Ralph R. Cioffi, both former managers of hedge funds at Bear Stearns Companies, were arrested June 19, 2008.[16] They faced criminal charges and were found not guilty of misleading investors about the risks involved in the subprime market. Tannin and Cioffi have also been named in lawsuits brought by Barclays Bank, which claims they were one of the many investors misled by the executives.[17][18]
They were also named in civil lawsuits brought in 2007 by investors, including Barclays Bank, who claimed they had been misled. Barclays claimed that Bear Stearns knew that certain assets in the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Strategies Enhanced Leverage Master Fund were worth much less than their professed values. The suit claimed that Bear Stearns managers devised "a plan to make more money for themselves and further to use the Enhanced Fund as a repository for risky, poor-quality investments." The lawsuit said Bear Stearns told Barclays that the enhanced fund was up almost 6% through June 2007—when "in reality, the portfolio's asset values were plummeting."[19]
Other investors in the fund included Jeffrey E. Epstein's Financial Trust Company.[20]
Fed bailout and sale to JPMorgan Chase[edit]
On March 14, 2008, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York agreed to provide a $25 billion loan to Bear Stearns collateralized by free and clear assets from Bear Stearns in order to provide Bear Stearns the liquidity for up to 28 days that the market was refusing to provide. Shortly thereafter the Federal Reserve Bank of New York had a change of heart and told Bear Stearns that the 28-day loan was unavailable to them.[21] The deal was then changed to where the NY FED would create a company to buy $30 billion worth of Bear Stearns assets. Two days later, on March 16, 2008, Bear Stearns signed a merger agreement with JP Morgan Chase in a stock swap worth $2 a share or less than 7 percent of Bear Stearns' market value just two days before.[22] This sale price represented a staggering loss as its stock had traded at $172 a share as late as January 2007, and $93 a share as late as February 2008. The new company is funded by loans of $29 billion from the New York FRB, and $1 billion from JP Morgan Chase (the junior loan), with no further recourse to JP Morgan Chase.[23] This non-recourse loan means that the loan is collateralized by mortgage debt[24] and that the government cannot seize JP Morgan Chase's assets if the mortgage debt collateral becomes insufficient to repay the loan.[24][25] Chairman of the Fed, Ben Bernanke, defended the bailout by stating that a bankruptcy of Bear Stearns would have affected the real economy[26] and could have caused a "chaotic unwinding" of investments across the US markets.[22]
On March 20, Securities and Exchange Commission Chairman Christopher Cox said the collapse of Bear Stearns was due to a lack of confidence, not a lack of capital. Cox noted that Bear Stearns's problems escalated when rumors spread about its liquidity crisis which in turn eroded investor confidence in the firm. "Notwithstanding that Bear Stearns continued to have high quality collateral to provide as security for borrowings, market counterparties became less willing to enter into collateralized funding arrangements with Bear Stearns," said Cox. Bear Stearns' liquidity pool started at $18.1 billion on March 10 and then plummeted to $2 billion on March 13. Ultimately market rumors about Bear Stearns' difficulties became self-fulfilling, Cox said.[27]
On March 24, 2008, a class action was filed on behalf of shareholders, challenging the terms of JPMorgan’s recently announced acquisition of Bear Stearns.[28] That same day, a new agreement was reached that raised JPMorgan Chase's offer to $10 a share, up from the initial $2 offer, which meant an offer of $1.2 billion.[29] The revised deal was aimed to quiet upset investors and any subsequent legal action brought against JP Morgan Chase as a result of the deal as well as to prevent employees, many of whose past compensation consisted of Bear Stearns stock, from leaving for other firms. The Bear Stearns bailout was seen as an extreme-case scenario, and continues to raise significant questions about Fed intervention. On April 8, 2008, Paul A. Volcker stated that the Fed has taken 'actions that extend to the very edge of its lawful and implied powers.' See his remarks at a Luncheon of the Economic Club of New York.[30] On May 29, Bear Stearns shareholders approved the sale to JPMorgan Chase at the $10-per-share price.[31]
An article by journalist Matt Taibbi for Rolling Stone contended that naked short selling had a role in the demise of both Bear Stearns and Lehman Brothers.[32] A study by finance researchers at the University of Oklahoma Price College of Business studied trading in financial stocks, including Bear Stearns and Lehman Brothers, and found "no evidence that stock price declines were caused by naked short selling."[33]
Structure prior to collapse[edit]
Managing Partners/Chief Executive Officers[edit]

Salim L. Lewis: 1949–1978
Alan C. Greenberg: 1978–1993
James Cayne: 1993–2008
Alan Schwartz: 2008–collapse

Major shareholders[edit]
The largest Bear Stearns shareholders as of December 2007 were:[34]

Barrow Hanley Mewhinney & Strauss – 9.73%
Joseph C. Lewis – 9.36%
Morgan Stanley – 5.37%
James Cayne – 4.94%
Legg Mason Capital Management – 4.84%
Private Capital Management – 4.49%
Barclays Global Investors – 3.10%
State Street Global Advisors – 3.01%
The Vanguard Group – 2.67%
Janus Capital Management – 2.34%

See also[edit]


New York City portal
Companies portal



Primary dealer
Bankruptcy of Lehman Brothers
Lehman Brothers
Bear Stearns Merchant Banking

References[edit]


^ Lowenstein, Roger The End Of Wall Street, Penguin Press 2010, pp.xvii,22 ISBN 978-1-59420-239-1
^ Ross, Andrew (March 17, 2008). "JP Morgan Pays $2 a Share for Bear Stearns". The New York Times.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.
^ Bear Stearns Brand Finally Fades, Two Years After Collapse
^ a b "Could Bear Stearns Do Better?". The New York Times. March 17, 2008. Retrieved March 17, 2008. 
^ "Bear Stearns Companies, Inc.", International Directory of Company Histories, Vol. 52, St. James Press, 2003 
^ Tim McLaughlin (November 28, 2007). "Bear Stearns to cut 650 jobs globally". Reuters. 
^ "America's Most Admired Companies 2007 FORTUNE". CNN. Retrieved August 23, 2011. 
^ Boyd, Roddy (March 31, 2008). "The last days of Bear Stearns". Fortune. Archived from the original on September 19, 2008.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.
^ Burrough, Bryan. "Bringing Down Bear Stearns". Vanity Fair. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ Creswell, Julie; Bajaj, Vikas (June 23, 2007), "$3.2 Billion Move by Bear Stearns to Rescue Fund", New York Times, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Siew, Walden; Yoon, Al (June 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns CDO liquidation sparks contagion fears", Reuters 
^ Pittman, Mark (June 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns Fund Collapse Sends Shock Through CDOs", Bloomberg, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Bajaj, Vikas (June 30, 2007), "Bear Stearns Shakes Up Funds Unit", New York Times, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Grynbaum, Michael M. (September 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns Profit Plunges 61% on Subprime Woes", New York Times, retrieved September 14, 2008 
^ Basar, Shanny; Ahuja, Vivek (November 15, 2007), "Bear downgraded in face of first loss in 83 years", Financial News Online, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ DealBook (June 19, 2008). "Behind the Scenes of Bear's Fund Meltdown". The New York Times. 
^ "2 Former Bear Stearns Managers Arrested". NY Times. Associated Press. June 19, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2008. 
^ Charges at Bear Stearns linked to subprime debacle Archived June 20, 2008, at the Wayback Machine. By TOM HAYS, Associated Press Writer, 6/19/08.
^ Ex-Bear Stearns managers arrested at their homes Archived June 20, 2008, at the Wayback Machine. By Tom Hays, Associated Press, 6/19/08.
^ More Bad News for Jeff Epstein? JULY 11, 2007, Dealbook, New York Times retrieved 2011 3 25
^ FRONTLINE: Inside the Meltdown – You Have a Weekend to Save Yourself Retrieved February 26, 2009
^ a b Fed Aided Bear Stearns as Firm Faced Chapter 11, Bernanke Says. Bloomberg, April 2, 2008
^ http://www.jpmorgan.com/cm/Satellite?c=JPM_Content_C&cid=1159339104093&pagename=JPM_redesign%2FJPM_Content_C%2FGeneric_Detail_Page_Template
^ a b "Bear Stearns Bondholders Win Big". Seeking Alpha. March 27, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ "Weekly Market Comment: Why is Bear Stearns Trading at $6 Instead of $2". Hussman Funds. March 24, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ "Bernanke Defends Bear Stearns Bailout". CBS News. April 3, 2008. 
^ Chairman Cox Letter To Basel Committee In Support Of New Guidance On Liquidity Management (PDF), March 20, 2008, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ C&T Files Complaint and Temporary Restraining Order Challenging Bear Stearns Buyout by JPMorgan, March 24, 2008, archived from the original on May 13, 2008, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Seeking Fast Deal, JPMorgan Quintuples Bear Stearns Bid. New York Times, March 25, 2008
^ Niall Ferguson: The Ascent of Money: A Financial History of The World, Chapter 6: From Empire to Chimerica; Chimerica, p. 338
^ White, Ben (May 29, 2008), "Bear Stearns passes into Wall Street history", Financial Times 
^ Taibbi, Matt (October 2009). "Wall Street's Naked Swindle". Rolling Stone. Retrieved October 15, 2009. 
^ http://www.cfr-cologne.de/download/workingpaper/cfr-09-09.pdf
^ Wright, William (March 17, 2008). "Employees lose $5bn on Bear Stearns". Financial News.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.


Further reading[edit]

William Cohan (2010). House of Cards: A Tale of Hubris and Wretched Excess on Wall Street.

External links[edit]

JPMorgan Securities home page
FRONTLINE: Inside the Meltdown Analysis—The Bear Stearns Rescue
New York Times Timeline of Bear Stearns' history
Bloomberg: JPMorgan Chase to Buy Bear Stearns for $240 Million
J.P. Morgan Buys Bear in Fire Sale, As Fed Widens Credit to Avert Crisis - WSJ





Links to related articles











v
t
e


JPMorgan Chase



Divisions



J.P. Morgan & Co.
Chase Bank
Chase Paymentech
Chase Card Services Canada
EMC Mortgage Company
Highbridge Capital Management
J.P. Morgan Cazenove
One Equity Partners





Notable current executives



Jamie Dimon (CEO)
Matthew E. Zames
Steven Black
Jing Ulrich





Notable former executives



John Pierpont Morgan
J. P. Morgan Jr.
Junius Spencer Morgan
George Peabody
Henry Sturgis Morgan
David Rockefeller
William B. Harrison Jr.
John B. McCoy
Walter V. Shipley
Douglas A. Warner III
Temple Bowdoin
Jes Staley
Blythe Masters
James B. Lee Jr.
Thomas W. Lamont
Dennis Weatherstone
John J. McCloy
Winthrop Aldrich





Board of directors



Crandall C. Bowles
Stephen B. Burke
David M. Cote
James S. Crown
Jamie Dimon
Ellen V. Futter
William H. Gray
Laban P. Jackson Jr.
David C. Novak
Lee R. Raymond
William C. Weldon





Historical components



American Fletcher
Anchor Savings Bank
Banca Commerciale Italiana Trust Co.
Bank One Corporation
The Manhattan Company
Bank United of Texas
Bear Stearns
CenTrust Bank
Chase Manhattan Bank
Chemical Bank
Corn Exchange Bank
Dime Savings Bank of New York
First Chicago Bank
First USA Bank
Great Western Bank
Hambrecht & Quist
H. F. Ahmanson & Co.
Jardine Fleming
J.P. Morgan & Co.
Lincoln Savings
Manufacturers Hanover
National Bank of Detroit
National Park Bank
New York Trust Company
Providian
Robert Fleming & Co.
State Bank of Chicago
Texas Commerce Bank
Valley National Bank of Arizona
Washington Mutual





Buildings



125 London Wall
245 Park Avenue
25 Bank Street
270 Park Avenue
277 Park Avenue
383 Madison Avenue
Chase Field
Chase Tower (Amarillo)
Chase Tower (Chicago)
Chase Tower (Dallas)
Chase Tower (El Paso)
Chase Tower (Englewood, Colorado)
Chase Tower (Indianapolis)
Chase Tower (Milwaukee)
Chase Tower (Oklahoma City)
Chase Tower (Phoenix)
Chase Tower (Rochester)
Chater House
Indiana Michigan Power Center (Fort Wayne)
JPMorgan Chase Building (San Francisco)
JPMorgan Chase Tower (Houston)
McCoy Building
One Chase Manhattan Plaza
The Qube (Detroit)








 Category
 Commons
 Wikiversity












v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List












v
t
e


Corporate scandals






South Sea Company (1720)
Panic of 1890 (Baring crisis) (1890)
Salad Oil (1963)
Banco Ambrosiano (1982)
Carrian Group (1983)
Guinness (1986)
Polly Peck (1990)
Bank of Credit and Commerce International (1990)
Metallgesellschaft (1993)
Barings Bank (1995)
Sumitomo Corporation (1996)
Archer Daniels Midland (1997)
Long-Term Capital Management (2000)
One.Tel (2001)
Enron (2001)
Adelphia (2002)
WorldCom (2002)
Tyco (2004)
Bayou Hedge Fund Group (2005)
Société Générale (2008)
Bear Stearns (2008)
Libor (2008–2012)
Anglo Irish Bank (2008–2011)
Volkswagen emissions scandal (2008-ongoing)
Satyam (2009)
Olympus (2011)
OCZ (2012-2013)
Forex (2013–)
Tesco (2014)
Toshiba (2015)
Target Australia (2016)
Wells Fargo account fraud scandal (2016-ongoing)
Daewoo Shipbuilding & Marine Engineering (2016)












v
t
e


Great Recession



By region



Africa
Americas

United States
South America


Asia
Europe
Oceania





United States-specific



Automotive industry crisis
California budget crisis
Housing bubble
Housing market correction
Subprime mortgage crisis





Banking losses and fraud



Anglo Irish Bank hidden loans controversy
Libor scandal

Tom Hayes


Société Générale trading loss
Forex scandal
Seán FitzPatrick
Bernard Madoff
Tom Petters
Scott W. Rothstein
Allen Stanford





Government entities



Consumer Financial Protection Bureau
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Federal Home Loan Banks
Federal Housing Administration
Federal Housing Finance Agency
Federal Housing Finance Board
Federal Reserve System
Government National Mortgage Association
Irish Bank Resolution Corporation
National Asset Management Agency
Office of Federal Housing Enterprise Oversight
Office of Financial Stability
UK Financial Investments










Government policy and spending responses



Banking and finance
stability and reform



Anglo Irish Bank Corporation Act 2009
Banking (Special Provisions) Act 2008
China–Japan–South Korea trilateral summit
Commercial Paper Funding Facility
Dodd–Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act
Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008
Irish emergency budget, 2009
Irish budget, 2010
Irish budget, 2011
Irish budget, 2012
Irish budget, 2013
Temporary Liquidity Guarantee Program
Term Asset-Backed Securities Loan Facility
Troubled Asset Relief Program
2008 United Kingdom bank rescue package




Bank stress tests



EU
U.S.








Stimulus and recovery



2008 European Union stimulus plan
2008–09 Keynesian resurgence
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009
Chinese economic stimulus program
Economic Stimulus Act of 2008
Fraud Enforcement and Recovery Act of 2009
Green New Deal
Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008
National fiscal policy response to the Great Recession
Zero interest-rate policy





Government interventions,
rescues, and acquisitions



List of banks acquired or bankrupted during the Great Recession




Non-banking



Chrysler
General Motors











Securities involved
and financial markets



Auction rate securities
Collateralized debt obligations
Collateralized mortgage obligations
Credit default swaps
Mortgage-backed securities
Secondary mortgage market





Social responses



Tea Party protests (United States; c. 2009)
May Day protests (Europe, Middle East and North Africa, Asia; 2009)
Occupy movement (worldwide)





Related topics



2000s energy crisis

Central Asia: 2008


Effects on museums
Decline of newspapers
World food price crisis








European debt crisis
Financial crisis of 2007–08
List of countries by public debt














Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 147604903
LCCN: nr94015164










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Bear_Stearns&oldid=791270892"					
Categories: Bear Stearns1923 establishments in New York2000s economic history2008 acquisitions2008 disestablishments in New YorkBank failures in the United StatesBanks disestablished in 2008Banks established in 1923Companies based in New York CityFinancial services companies established in 1923Financial crisesFormer investment banksInvestment management companies of the United StatesJPMorgan ChaseHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from October 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2014Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEspañolEsperantoفارسیFrançais한국어ItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSuomiSvenskaУкраїнськаייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 19 July 2017, at 05:25.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 








Cases matching "Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I LLC" :: Justia Dockets & Filings 














































































Log In
Sign Up











Find a Lawyer
Ask a Lawyer 
Research the Law
Law Schools
Laws & Regs
Newsletters
Legal Marketing












                                             Cases matching "Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I LLC"
                                    


                                                    Cases 1 - 10 of 55
                                            

RSS Feed | 
                                                View as table




Faulkner v. Gomez et al


Filed: June 7, 2017 as 1:2017cv04286



Plaintiff: 
                                    Marvin  Faulkner
                                            

Defendant: 
                                    Bryan  Gomez, Anna M. Loftus, Pierce & Associates
                                                    and others
                            
Cause Of Action: Racketeering (RICO) Act

Court:
Seventh Circuit
›
Illinois
›
Illinois Northern District Court

Type:
Other Statutes
›
Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations




Silas v. Argent Mortgage Company, LLC its Successors and/or Assigns


Filed: May 19, 2017 as 1:2017cv00703



Plaintiff: 
                                    Rodrick J. Silas
                                            

Defendant: 
                                    Argent Mortgage Company, LLC its Successors and/or  Assigns  
                                            

Intervenor_defendant: 
                                    U.S. Bank, N.A., successor trustee to LaSalle Bank National Association, on behalf of the holders of Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I Trust 2006-AQ1, Asset-Backed Certificates Series 2006-AQ1  
                                            
Cause Of Action: Petition for Removal

Court:
Ninth Circuit
›
California
›
California Eastern District Court

Type:
Real Property
›
Foreclosure




SILAS v. ARGENT MORTGAGE COMPANY, LLC ITS SUCCESSORS AND/OR ASSIGNS


Filed: May 19, 2017 as 1:2017at00413



Plaintiff: 
                                    RODRICK J.  SILAS
                                            

Defendant: 
                                    ARGENT MORTGAGE COMPANY, LLC ITS SUCCESSORS AND/OR ASSIGNS, U.S. Bank, N.A., successor trustee to LaSalle Bank National Association, on behalf of the holders of Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I Trust 2006-AQ1, Asset-Backed Certificates Series 2006-AQ1  
                                            
Cause Of Action: Petition for Removal

Court:
Ninth Circuit
›
California
›
California Eastern District Court

Type:
Real Property
›
Foreclosure




In re: James Krage, et al v. EMC Mortgage Corporation, et al


Filed: September 26, 2016 as 16-56405



Debtor: 
                                    In the Matter of:  JAMES ARTHUR KRAGE
                                            

Appellant: 
                                    JAMES ARTHUR KRAGE
                                            

Appellee: 
                                    EMC MORTGAGE CORPORATION, BEAR STEARNS, Asset Backed Securities I LLC, MORTGAGE ELECTRONIC REGISTRATION SYSTEMS, INC.
                                                    and others
                            

Court:
Ninth Circuit
U.S. Court of Appeals, Ninth Circuit

Type:
Other Statutes
›
Other




In re: James Krage v. U.S. Bank National Association, et al


Filed: September 26, 2016 as 16-56406



Debtor: 
                                    In the Matter of:  JAMES ARTHUR KRAGE
                                            

Appellant: 
                                    JAMES ARTHUR KRAGE
                                            

Appellee: 
                                    U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as Successor by merger to LaSalle Bank National Association, as Trustee for Certificiate holders of Bear Stearns asset backed Securities I LLC, asset-backed certificates, series 2005-HE9, its Successors and/or assigns, EMC MORTGAGE CORPORATION, BEAR STEARNS, Asset Backed Securities I LLC
                                                    and others
                            

Court:
Ninth Circuit
U.S. Court of Appeals, Ninth Circuit

Type:
Other Statutes
›
Other




In re: James Arthur Krage



Filed: April 21, 2015 as 2:2015cv02936



Appellee: 
                                    Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I LLC, EMC Mortgage Corporation, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
                                                    and others
                            

Appellant: 
                                    James A. Krage
                                            

In Re Debtor: 
                                    James Arthur Krage
                                            

Court:
Ninth Circuit
›
California
›
California Central District Court

Type:
Bankruptcy
›
Bankruptcy Appeal (801)




In re: James Arthur Krage



Filed: March 11, 2015 as 2:2015cv01795



Appellee: 
                                    Bears Stearns Asset Backed Securities I LLC, JPMorgan Chase Bank, Mortgage Electronic Registration Systems Inc
                                                    and others
                            

Appellant: 
                                    James Arthur Krage
                                            

In Re Debtor: 
                                    James Arthur Krage
                                            

Court:
Ninth Circuit
›
California
›
California Central District Court

Type:
Bankruptcy
›
Bankruptcy Appeal (801)




James A. Krage v. Nelson Sanchez et al


Filed: January 20, 2015 as 8:2015cv00090



Defendant: 
                                    Marvin Adviento, Michael Asatourian, Bank of America, N.A.
                                                    and others
                            

Plaintiff: 
                                    James A. Krage
                                            

Court:
Ninth Circuit
›
California
›
California Central District Court

Type:
Civil Rights
›
Civil Rights: Other




Steven Crear, Sr. v. U.S. Bank National Association, et al


Filed: December 16, 2014 as 14-11332



Plaintiff - Appellant: 
                                    STEVEN CREAR, SR.
                                            

Defendant - Appellee: 
                                    U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as Trustee Successor in Interest to Bank of America, NA as Successor by Merger to LaSalle Bank, NA for Certificateholders of Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I LLC, Asset Backed-Certificates, Series 2005-HE10, its Succe, MORTGAGE ELECTRONIC REGISTRATION SYSTEMS, INCORPORATED
                                            

Court:
Fifth Circuit
U.S. Court of Appeals, Fifth Circuit

Type:
Real Property
›
Other Property Actions




Justice v. Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee for Certificateholders of Bear Stearns Asset Backed Securities I, LLC, Series 2007-AC-2 et al



Filed: November 20, 2014 as 4:2014cv03341



Plaintiff: 
                                    Brian W. Justice  
                                            

Defendant: 
                                    Wells Fargo Bank, National Association  , Select Portfolio Servicing, Inc  
                                            
Cause Of Action: Diversity-Petition to Quiet Title

Court:
Fifth Circuit
›
Texas
›
Texas Southern District Court

Type:
Real Property
›
Foreclosure










Disclaimer: Justia Dockets & Filings provides public litigation records from the federal appellate and district courts. These filings and docket sheets should not be considered findings of fact or liability, nor do they necessarily reflect the view of Justia.
Why Is My Information Online?



1
2
3
4
5
…
Next






Ask a Lawyer





Question:



Add details
120



More Information:



1000


Ask Question






Find a Lawyer











Lawyers - Get Listed Now!
Get a free directory profile listing







			
			Subscribe to Justia's Free Newsletters featuring summaries of federal and state court opinions.		
		

			Subscribe Now
		


 






                Justia Legal Resources
            



Find a Lawyer





Bankruptcy Lawyers
Business Lawyers
Criminal Lawyers
Employment Lawyers
Estate Planning Lawyers
Family Lawyers
Personal Injury Lawyers
More... 




Individuals





Bankruptcy
Criminal
Divorce
DUI
Estate Planning
Family Law
Personal Injury
More...




Business





Business Formation
Business Operations
Employment
Intellectual Property
International Trade
Real Estate
Tax Law
More... 




Law Students





Law Schools
Admissions
Financial Aid
Course Outlines
Law Journals
Blogs
Employment
More...




US Federal Law





US Constitution
US Code
Regulations
Supreme Court
Circuit Courts
District Courts
Dockets & Filings
More...




US State Law





State Constitutions
State Codes
State Case Law
California
Florida
New York
Texas
More... 




Other Databases





Legal Blogs
Legal Forms
GAO Reports
Product Recalls
Patents
Trademarks
Countries
More...




Legal Marketing





Websites
Blogs
Content
Social Media
Local Marketing
Paid Ads (CPC/PPC)
Lawyer Directory
More...












 
                        © 2017 Justia



Company
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Help
Marketing Solutions







﻿











The Fed - Bear Stearns, JPMorgan Chase, and Maiden Lane LLC













Skip to main content



Back to Home

Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System


Stay Connected

Link to Stay Connected Title
Link to Link to Federal Reserve Twitter Page
Link to Link to Federal Reserve YouTube Page
Link to Link to Federal Reserve Flickr Page
Link to Link to Federal Reserve LinkedIn Page
Link to Stay Connected Title
Link to Stay Connected Title


Recent Postings
Calendar
Publications
Site Map
A-Z index
Careers
FAQs
Videos
Contact



Search



Submit Search Button




Advanced



Toggle Dropdown Menu







Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System
The Federal Reserve, the central bank of the United States, provides the nation with a safe, flexible, and stable monetary and financial system.






Main Menu Toggle Button

Sections

Search Toggle Button





Search


Search Submit Button
Submit













Home
Regulatory Reform
Transaction Data
Transaction Data (Released December 1, 2010)






               Regulatory Reform
        







Share


























RSS













Recent Developments
AboutCommunications with the PublicProposals for CommentMilestonesTransaction DataAuditAcronym Glossary











Bear Stearns, JPMorgan Chase, and Maiden Lane LLC
Background
In March 2008, The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc. (Bear Stearns) was one of the largest securities firms in the country, with reported total consolidated assets of nearly $400 billion. Bear Stearns engaged in a broad range of activities, including investment banking, securities and derivatives trading and clearing, brokerage services, and originating and securitizing commercial and residential mortgage loans. Financial conditions for the firm deteriorated markedly between mid-January and mid-March 2008. On March 13, 2008, Bear Stearns notified the Federal Reserve that it expected that it would not have enough funding or liquid assets to meet its financial obligations the following day and would not be able to find a private-sector source of alternative financing.
The imminent insolvency of Bear Stearns, the large presence of Bear Stearns in several important financial markets (including, in particular, the markets for repo-style transactions, over-the-counter derivative and foreign exchange transactions, mortgage-backed securities, and securities clearing services), and the potential for contagion to similarly situated firms raised significant concern that the stability of financial markets would be seriously disrupted if Bear Stearns were suddenly unable to meet its obligations to counterparties, and the extension of credit allowed for an orderly resolution of the firm.
Bridge Loan
To address the immediate liquidity needs of Bear Stearns and forestall the potential systemic disruptions that a default or bankruptcy of the company would have caused in the already stressed credit markets, on Friday, March 14, 2008, the Federal Reserve Board authorized the Federal Reserve Bank of New York (FRBNY) to extend credit to Bear Stearns through JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. (JPMC Bank). The purpose of this bridge loan was to ensure that Bear Stearns would meet its obligations as they came due that day, allowing for time during the weekend for Bear Stearns to explore options with other financial institutions that might enable it to avoid bankruptcy and for policymakers to continue to seek ways to contain the risk to financial markets in the event no private-sector solution proved possible. The loan to Bear Stearns was in the amount of $12.9 billion and was secured by assets of Bear Stearns with a value of $13.8 billion. The rate of interest on this loan was the rate for primary credit. The FRBNY received no warrantsor any other potential equity of either JPMC Bank or Bear Stearns in exchange for the loan, and the loan was made without recourse to JPMC Bank. On the morning of Monday, March 17, the $12.9 billion was repaid in full to the FRBNY with interest of nearly $4 million.
The bridge loan was extended under the authority of Section 13(3) of the Federal Reserve Act, which permitted the Board, in unusual and exigent circumstances, to authorize Reserve Banks to extend credit to individuals, partnerships, and corporations.
Maiden Lane LLC
Despite the receipt by Bear Stearns of Federal Reserve funding through a bridge loan on March 14, 2008, market pressures on Bear Stearns worsened that day and during the weekend. Bear Stearns likely would have been unable to avoid bankruptcy on Monday, March 17, without either very large injections of liquidity from the Federal Reserve or an acquisition by a stronger firm. JPMorgan Chase and Co. (JPMC) emerged as the only viable bidder for Bear Stearns, and on Sunday, March 16, Bear Stearns accepted an offer to merge with JPMC.
However, JPMC was concerned about its ability to absorb a portion of Bear Stearn's mortgage trading portfolio, given the uncertainty about the scale of potential losses facing the financial system at the time and strained credit markets.
To facilitate a prompt acquisition of Bear Stearns by JPMC, the FRBNY created a limited liability company, Maiden Lane LLC, to acquire that set of assets of Bear Stearns. The FRBNY extended credit to the LLC, which would then manage those assets through time to maximize the repayment of credit extended to the LLC and to minimize disruption to financial markets. Maiden Lane LLC purchased approximately $30 billion in assets from Bear Stearns with a loan of approximately $29 billion from the FRBNY. Under the terms of the agreement, JPMC also lent roughly $1 billion to Maiden Lane in a loan that is subordinated to the loan from the FRBNY for repayment purposes. The interest rate on the loan extended by the FRBNY is the primary credit rate, and the interest rate on thesubordinated loan is the primary credit rate plus 450 basis points. Payments from the proceeds from the assets held by the LLC are to be used in the following order: operating expenses of the LLC, principal due to the FRBNY, interest due to the FRBNY, principal due to JPMC, and interest due to JPMC. Any remaining funds will be paid to the FRBNY. Details on the terms of the loan to Maiden Lane LLC are available on the FRBNY website.
The loan to Maiden Lane LLC loan was extended under the authority of Section 13(3) of the Federal Reserve Act, which permitted the Board, in unusual and exigent circumstances, to authorize Reserve Banks to extend credit to individuals, partnerships, and corporations.
 Data

Bridge Loan: Excel (22 KB) | Accessible (3 KB ZIP)
CSV Data (1 KB) | CSV Definitions and Notes (1 KB)
Maiden Lane LLC: Excel (34 KB) | Accessible (4 KB ZIP)
CSV Data (4 KB) | CSV Definitions and Notes (3 KB)


Visit the Excel viewer for more information. Filter and sort features have been added to the column headers in the Excel spreadsheet to assist you with searching and to allow for the creation of custom datasets. Click on the arrow button in each column header to view and select the different filter and sort features.
Compressed (ZIP) files are available through 7-zip. Download the free 7-zip compression utility

The following information on the bridge loan that was extended to Bear Stearns through JPMC Bank is provided: 



Data Description


Loan date
Date upon which the bridge loan originated


Repayment date
Date upon which the bridge loan was repaid


Loan amount
Amount of bridge loan, in billions of dollars


Interest rate
Interest rate on bridge loan, in percent


Total collateral
Value of collateral, in billions of dollars


Collateral by Asset Type
Values in billions of dollars


Collateralized mortgage obligations (CMO)
Collateralized mortgage obligations (CMO), in billions of dollars


Other asset-backed securities (ABS)
Asset-backed securities other than CMOs, in billions of dollars


Municipal securities
Securities issued by state and local governments and agencies, in billions of dollars


Other securities and equity
Securities not included in other listed categories and equity, in billions of dollars



The following information on Maiden Lane LLC transactions is provided:



Data Description


FRBNY senior loan
Loan from the FRBNY


Principal balance (including accrued and capitalized interest) as of quarter end
Balance of loan outstanding, including interest that has accrued and been capitalized into the balance of the loan, in millions of dollars


Accrued and capitalized interest during quarter
Amount of interest that has been accrued during the quarter and added to the balance of the loan, in millions of dollars. Values for 9/30/2008 reflect accruals since LLC was established


Repayment during quarter
Amount of repayment on the loan from the proceeds of the portfolio, in millions of dollars


JPMC subordinated loan
Loan from JPMorgan Chase & Co. (JPMC) to Maiden Lane LLC, in millions of dollars. For repayment purposes, this obligation is subordinated to the senior loan extended by the FRBNY, and would absorb the first loss of realized losses on the assets of Maiden Lane LLC, should any occur


Summary of Portfolio Composition, Cash and Cash Equivalents, and Other Assets and Liabilities, Fair Value
 


Federal agency and GSE MBS
Mortgage-backed securities (MBS) issued by federal agencies and government-sponsored enterprises (GSE), in millions of dollars


Non-agency RMBS
Residential mortgage-backed securities (RMBS) issued by private corporations, in millions of dollars


Commercial loans
Loans to businesses, in millions of dollars


Residential loans
Mortgage loans, in millions of dollars


Swap contracts
Credit default swaps, interest rate swaps, and other swaps and hedges, in millions of dollars. Fair value of swap contracts is presented net of associated liabilities


TBA (To be announced) commitments
Commitments to purchase or sell mortgage-backed securities for a fixed price at a future date, in millions of dollars


Other investments
Other investments, primarily commercial mortgage-backed securities (CMBS) and collateralized debt obligations (CDOs), in millions of dollars


Cash and cash equivalents
Holdings of cash or other comparable, short-term, highly liquid asset, in millions of dollars


Other assets
Includes interest and principal receivable and other assets, in millions of dollars


Other liabilities
Includes amounts payable for securities purchased, collateral posted to Maiden Lane LLC by swap counterparties, and other liabilities and accrued expenses, in millions of dollars


Securities portfolio distribution by credit rating
Based on fair value, and the lowest of all ratings for each security, in percent









Back to Top


Last Update:
              
                            February 12, 2016
                          
            















	EDGAR Online Pro 































                                     
                                




Welcome


                                                |
                                            

Help


                                                |
                                            

About EDGAR Online
                                                   


                                                |
                                            

 Login 















Dashboard 

Today 
Company

Industry

Search
Screener

Analytics
















































Enter your Email to Learn More:  
                                 












Form






                         (Filer)
                    

                         Received

                        (
                        Period
                        
                        ) 
                    


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 05/15/17 (03/31/17) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 02/14/17 (12/31/16) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 11/14/16 (09/30/16) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 08/15/16 (06/30/16) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 05/16/16 (03/31/16) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 02/16/16 (12/31/15) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 11/13/15 (09/30/15) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 08/14/15 (06/30/15) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 05/15/15 (03/31/15) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 02/13/15 (12/31/14) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 11/13/14 (09/30/14) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 08/13/14 (06/30/14) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 05/15/14 (03/31/14) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 02/12/14 (12/31/13) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 11/13/13 (09/30/13) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 08/13/13 (06/30/13) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 05/15/13 (03/31/13) 


ABS-15G

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 02/14/13 (12/31/12) 


40-APP/A

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 01/09/13 


40-APP

BEAR STEARNS ASSET BACKED SECURITIES I LLC
 11/16/12 




                             
                        












             Results 1 - 20 of 367




 


  
            
                    [1]
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
                
             
            Next 9 Pages


[ Show Next 20 Results ] 





























                 
            











            © 1995-2017

EDGAR® Online, a division of Donnelley Financial Solutions
            All rights reserved  Solutions
                for Corporations 
            Terms of Use
             
                Privacy Statement























Bear Stearns Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates Litigation | Cohen Milstein




















Skip to main content








Toggle navigation





Toggle navigation
















    Practice Area:
  


Securities Litigation & Investor Protection 





Bear Stearns Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates Litigation











On August 5, 2016, Judge Laura Taylor Swain of the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York issued an order approving the distribution of net settlement proceeds to class members in In re Bear Stearns Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates Litigation, Case No. 1:08-cv-08093-LTS (S.D.N.Y.). This order came after the Court issued an order and final judgment on May 27, 2015, granting final approval to a settlement in which J.P. Morgan Chase & Co., which had purchased Bear Stearns in 2008, agreed to pay $500 million in cash, plus up to $5 million in expenses, to investors led by a group of pension funds. The claims against Bear Stearns arose from its sale of $27.2 billion worth of mortgage-backed securities that proved defective during the recent U.S. housing and financial crises. 
The settlement finally resolves claims that Bear Stearns violated federal securities laws by selling certificates backed by approximately 71,000 largely “Alt-A” mortgages in 22 offerings from May 2006 to April 2007. Investors alleged that the offering documents contained false and misleading statements about the underwriting guidelines used by Bear Stearns’ EMC Mortgage unit, Countrywide Home Loans and other lenders, and the accuracy of associated property appraisals.
Appointed Lead Counsel in December 2009, Cohen Milstein represents Co-Lead Plaintiffs the New Jersey Carpenters Health Fund, the Oregon Public Employees Retirement System, and the Iowa Public Employees Retirement System. The Defendants named in the lawsuit include Structured Asset Mortgage Investments II, Inc. (“SAMI”) and Bear Stearns Asset-Backed Securities I LLC (“BSABSI”), certain of their officers and directors, Bear Stearns Cos., Inc. (“BSC”), J.P. Morgan Chase, Inc. (“JPM”) as successor in interest to BSC, the Underwriter of the Certificates Bear Stearns & Co., Inc., the issuers of the certificates and the ratings agencies who rated the certificates.
CASE BACKGROUND
This class action securities lawsuit was brought on behalf of purchasers of Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates issued by SAMI and/or BSABSI (the “Certificates”) pursuant and/or traceable to false and misleading registration statements and prospectus supplements issued between March 2006 and September 2007 (collectively, the “Registration Statements”).
The lawsuit alleged that the Registration Statements and Prospectuses incorporated therein contained material misstatements and omissions in violation of Sections 11, 12 and 15 of the Securities Act of 1933. The Certificates were supported by large pools of mortgage loans generally secured by first liens on residential properties, including conventional, adjustable rate and negative amortization mortgage loans. According to the pleadings, the Registration Statements included false statements and/or omissions about: (i) the underwriting standards purportedly used in connection with the origination of the underlying mortgage loans; (ii) the maximum loan-to-value ratios used to qualify borrowers; (iii) the appraisals of properties underlying the mortgage loans; and (iv) the debt-to-income ratios permitted on the loans. As a result of these misstatements and omissions, the Certificates were secured by assets that had a much greater risk profile than represented in the Registration Statement, and the Nationally Recognized Statistical Ratings Organizations (the “NRSROs” or “Ratings Agencies”) assigned superior credit ratings to the Certificates as a result of Defendants’ failure to disclose the underwriting defects and appraisal manipulations.
However, by late 2008, the amount of uncollectible mortgage loans securing the Certificates began to be revealed to the public and the Rating Agencies began to put negative watch labels on many Certificate classes, ultimately down-grading many. The delinquency and foreclosure rates of the mortgage loans securing the Certificates had grown both faster and in greater quantity than what would be expected for mortgage loans of the types described in the Prospectus Supplements. As a result, the Certificates had declined precipitously in value.
This class action posed several substantial challenges to obtaining relief for the Class. For instance, Lead Counsel had to file a motion for leave to amend the then-current complaint and oppose Defendants’ motions for reconsideration based on changing law in the Second Circuit. In particular, Lead Counsel had to adapt to new rulings in NECA-IBEW Health & Welfare Fund v. Goldman Sachs & Co., 693 F.3d 145 (2d Cir. 2012), which significantly altered the law on issues of standing, and Police and Fire Retirement System of the City of Detroit v. IndyMac MBS, Inc., 721 F.3d 95 (2d Cir. 2013) (“Indymac”), which resolved unsettled law on the application of the Securities Act’s statue of repose.  Due to changing case law as well as arguments and defenses set forth by the parties, Lead Counsel filed two amended complaints, opposed two rounds of motion to dismiss briefing from Defendants, and, together with Defendants, submitted nine additional letter briefs to draw the Court’s attention to eleven decisions that were relevant to issues raised in the parties’ briefing and also submitted supplemental briefing to address new issues that arose in response to changing precedent post-IndyMac. After this substantial briefing, on March 30, 2012, the Court granted in part and denied in part Defendants’ second motion to dismiss Lead Plaintiffs’ claims.  
Eventually Lead Plaintiffs and Defendants began exploring potential settlement. In connection with those discussions, the parties agreed to exchange certain information that likely otherwise would have been available to Lead Plaintiffs during discovery. Accordingly, Lead Plaintiffs ultimately obtained over 15 million pages of documents and 55 million additional pages of loan files, which required review by Lead Counsel. On October 14, 2014, the parties exchanged and submitted their opening mediation statements and on October 30, 2014 participated in an in-person mediation session. Although the parties reached an impasse at the mediation, settlement negotiations continued and, on November 17, 2014, the parties executed a binding term sheet, which included a cash settlement of $500 million. The Court granted final approval of the settlement on May 27, 2015. Since that time, Lead Counsel has continued to oversee the process of distributing net settlement proceeds to qualifying class members. 
Lead Plaintiffs are represented by Steven J. Toll, Daniel S. Sommers, Joel P. Laitman, Christopher Lometti, S. Douglas Bunch, and Richard A. Speirs, all of Cohen Milstein.











Case Documents








 Memorandum of Law in Support of Plaintiffs' Motion for Final Approval of Class Action Settlement and Approval of Plan of Allocat
Memorandum of Law in Support of Lead Counsel's Motion for an Award of Attorneys' Fees and Reimbursement of Litigation Expenses -
Notice of Pendency of Class Action and Proposed Settlement
Proof of Claim and Release Form
Proof of Claim and Release Instructions
Order Appointing Lead Counsel and Lead Plaintiff - December 28, 2009
First Amended Class Action Complaint - February 19, 2010
  

 









Related Professionals





S. Douglas BunchJoel P. LaitmanChristopher LomettiJulie G. ReiserDaniel S. SommersRichard A. SpeirsSteven J. Toll 









Related News & Events







  



        Federal Court Approves Landmark $505 Million Settlement with JPMorgan Chase & Co. in Bear Stearns Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates Litigation      

 







        Investors and J.P. Morgan Chase Agree to $505 Million Settlement in Bear Stearns Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates Litigation      

 



 
 


















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft

























































Home|Contact Us|Newsroom|Investor Relations|WebFolio|WT365|WTIA Cash Reporting|Collective Funds













Forgot User ID | Reset Password

Need Online Access?























 Wilmington Trust offices in Florida are currently closed due to Hurricane Matthew.   






Go to...
WEALTH ADVISORY SERVICES
WEALTH ADVISORY SOLUTIONS
CORPORATE & INSTITUTIONAL
CORPORATE & INSTITUTIONAL GLOBAL PRESENCE
RESEARCH & INSIGHTS
ABOUT US
NEWSROOM
INVESTOR RELATIONS
WebFolio
WT365












Services
Planning & Trusts 
    Estate Planning& Strategic    Wealth Transfer
    Philanthropic Planning
    Business Succession    Planning
    Executive Benefit Planning
    Insurance Planning
    Trustee Services


 
    Personal Trust    Administration
    Personal Trusts in    Delaware
Investment Management
Family Governance & Education 
Private Banking 
Family Office 
 


Solutions For You
Families and Individuals
    Philanthropic Planning
Business Owners
    Business Capital
    Personal Capital
    Legacy Capital
Professional Advisors
    Delaware Trusts
    Directed Trusts


 
Corporate Executives
    Retirement planning
    Concentrated stock    and options strategies







The Markets We Serve
Capital MarketsAgency Services
    Default & Bankruptcy
    Restructuring
    Large and Complex Trusts
    Corporate Debt    & High Yield
    Global Loan Agency
    Mergers and Acquisitions
    Project Finance
    Public Finance and    Agency


 
    Education Finance    Services
    Escrows
    Global Capital Markets    Custody
Capital MarketsStructured Finance
    Equipment &    Transportation Finance
    Asset-Backed Securities &    Mortgage-Backed    Securities


 
    Capital Markets Insurance
    Insurance Collateral    Solutions
Institutional Custody/Administrative Services
Special PurposeVehicle Administration
Entity Management
Retirement Services
Investment Management
 


Global Presence
United States
United Kingdom
Italy
Ireland
Germany







Individual Investor
Core Investment Tenets
Investment Process
    Plan
    Implement
    Monitor
Client Experience
Our Team


Institutional Investor
About WTIA
Core Investment Tenets
    Risk Has Been Redefined
Strategic Intelligence
All-in-one Solutions Platform
Your Tactical Portfolio
The Client Experience
Our Team
 

















CONTACT US
General Service
1-800-982-4620

Mon-Fri 8 AM - 5 PM ET

View all
Visit M&T Bank







Loading



































ABS & MBS Structured Services & Transactions | Wilmington Trust

Corporate & Institutional

Home>
Corporate & Institutional>
Capital Markets Structured Finance>
Asset-Backed Securities (ABS) & Mortgage-Backed Securities (MBS)

the markets we serve
global presence
print    share

Capital MarketsAgency Services
Capital Markets Structured Finance

Equipment & Transportation Finance
Asset-Backed Securities & Mortgage-Backed Securities
Capital Markets Insurance
Insurance Collateral Solutions


Institutional Custody & Administrative Services
Special Purpose Vehicle Administration
Entity Management
Retirement Services
Investment Management


Asset-Backed Securities (ABS) & Mortgage-Backed Securities (MBS)
When you oversee ABS or MBS deals you'll likely need more than a capable trustee.  Turn to Wilmington Trust's range of structured services that can help you with deals involving Residential Mortgage-Backed Securities (RMBS) and Commercial Mortgage-Backed Securities (CMBS).
Years of experience serving in a wide range of roles
Wilmington Trust is often considered the trustee of choice for securitizations. We've partnered with issuers since the beginning of the collateralized mortgage securities market.  Along with our years of experience in this market and ability to serve in a broad range of roles, Wilmington Trust has a long history of working with Delaware Statutory Trusts.

Expertise includes facilitation of virtually all securitizations:

Residential Mortgage-Backed Securities (RMBS)
Commercial Mortgage-Backed Securities (CMBS)
Asset-Backed Securities (ABS)
Mortgage-Backed Securities (MBS)

Services and capabilities include:

Backup servicing
Document custodian
Owner/Issuer trustee
Administrator
Indenture trustee
Tax preparation and financial reporting
Resident trustee for Delaware entities
Support for issuing securities in a wide-range of jurisdictions, both domestic and offshore
Provision of independent directors and officers
Paying agent/certificate registrar

Speak to Wilmington Trust's team today about how we can serve in a broad range of roles and bring unique experience to each of your ABS/MBS deals.

These services are provided by Wilmington Trust, N.A.











Pat Evans 
Vice President
302-636-6104Email Pat



Roseline Maney 
Administrative Vice President
302-636-6170Email Roseline






Contact an Expert


Related Insights
Backup Servicing Solutions
Learn more about our range of capabilities
Read article (PDF)














Help  |  Site Map  |  Privacy / Security  |  Terms of Use  |  Careers  |  Locations  |  Wilmington Trust Investment Advisors  |  Wilmington Funds  |  WTRIS  |  M&T Bank  |  Press Releases  |  Login





Need help, visit our Contact Us page.

© 2017 Wilmington Trust Corporation and its affiliates. All rights reserved.

Wilmington Trust is a registered service mark. Wilmington Trust Corporation is a wholly owned subsidiary of M&T Bank Corporation. Wilmington Trust Company, operating in Delaware only, Wilmington Trust, N.A.,  M&T Bank and certain other affiliates, provide various fiduciary and non-fiduciary services, including trustee, custodial, agency, investment management and other services. International corporate and institutional services are offered through Wilmington Trust Corporation's international affiliates. Loans, credit cards, retail and business deposits, and other business and personal banking services and products are offered by M&T Bank, member FDIC.

Wilmington Trust Investment Advisors, Inc., a subsidiary of M&T Bank, is a SEC-registered investment adviser providing investment management services to Wilmington Trust and M&T Bank's affiliates and clients.
 Investment and Insurance Products 
 Are NOT Deposits 
 Are NOT FDIC-Insured 
 Are NOT Insured By Any Federal Government Agency 
 Have NO Bank Guarantee 
 May Go Down In Value
 


Brokerage services and insurance products are offered by M&T Securities, Inc. (member FINRA/SIPC), not by M&T Bank, Wilmington Trust Company, or Wilmington Trust, N.A. 

Private Banking is the marketing name for an offering of M&T Bank deposit and loan products and services.


M&T Bank, Member FDIC and Equal Housing Lender NMLS #381076 















J.P. Morgan Securities | Wealth Management | Investment Strategies | Portfolio Management | Brokerage | J.P. Morgan Securities








































Skip to Main Content







Welcome to J.P. Morgan Securities |Select a Country



Chase


J.P. Morgan


Careers




 
 



Skip to main content


Overview
Wealth Planning

Transferring Wealth
Executive Services
Retirement Planning
Education Funding
Corporate Plans
Stock Plan Services


Research
Investing Solutions

Brokerage Services
Consulting Programs
Portfolio Management


Banking & Lending

Banking
Lending


Our Offices
Contact
















 


 


 


 


 











 Print
 Share (opens overlay)

Share via  Email
Share on  Facebook (opens pop-up window)
Share on  LinkedIn (opens pop-up window)
Share on  Twitter (opens pop-up window)






J.P. Morgan Securities

 

Personal attention, global resources
At J.P. Morgan Securities, you benefit from the best of both worlds: the personalized service of a boutique organization and the global resources of one of the largest and most respected financial firms in the world. Our Financial Advisors can create solutions that address your specific needs, whether you seek a strategic investment approach, professional portfolio management or a broader range of wealth management services.
Customized solutions
We will work closely with you to understand your unique needs and create solutions designed to help you meet your financial goals. Our experienced Financial Advisors excel at tailoring individual portfolios utilizing J.P. Morgan’s robust investment capabilities.
Exceptional access to industry experts
Our Financial Advisors provide access to J.P. Morgan’s industry-leading investment and trading experts as well as members of our senior executive team, all of whom actively participate in developing customized solutions for our clients. Your Financial Advisor will draw on J.P. Morgan’s award-winning research, combining it with his or her market knowledge and experience to create effective investment strategies. You can benefit from this expertise whether you seek short-term tactical investment opportunities, a disciplined portfolio management approach or a more comprehensive wealth management strategy.
Investment expertise and flexibility
J.P. Morgan Securities offers a broad array of investment products and the world’s leading investment managers. These expansive resources—the best people and products in the industry coupled with a Financial Advisor who is directly involved in the investment process—are the true benefits of working with us.
 






A link to this article will be included in your message to the recipient.   Fields with an * are required.


The e-mail addresses entered on this page will not be used to send unsolicited e-mail and will not be sold to a third party.  For additional information, view our privacy and security policy.


To  (e-mail address - use a comma between multiple addresses)*



From  (your e-mail address)*




Cancel (updates page content above)






Learn more about our firm and investment professionals through FINRA BrokerCheck.
“J.P. Morgan Securities” is a brand name for a wealth management business conducted by JPMorgan Chase & Co. and certain subsidiaries. J.P. Morgan Securities offers investment products, services, Clearing and Custody through J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, a member of FINRA and SIPC. Bank products and services are offered by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and its bank affiliates.
Bank products and services are offered through JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and its affiliates. Securities are offered by J.P. Morgan Securities   LLC and Clearing and Custody by J.P. Morgan Clearing Corp., both are   members of FINRA and SIPC. J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and J.P. Morgan Clearing Corp are affiliates of JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
Investment products: Not FDIC insured • No bank guarantee • May lose value

 
 






 


 


 


 


 


 




Skip to Global Header Content

 
 
 
 
 

Copyright © 2017 JPMorgan Chase & Co. All rights reserved.

 














Bear Stearns - Wikipedia






















 






Bear Stearns

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc.





Former type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: BSC


Industry
Investment services


Fate
acquired by JP Morgan Chase


Founded
1923


Defunct
March 2008


Headquarters
New York City, US



Key people

Alan Schwartz, former CEO
James Cayne, former Chairman & CEO


Products
Financial services
Investment banking
Investment management


Parent
JPMorgan Chase


Website
www.bear.com


The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc. was a New York-based global investment bank, securities trading and brokerage firm that failed in 2008 as part of the global financial crisis and recession, and was subsequently sold to JPMorgan Chase. Its main business areas before its failure were capital markets, investment banking, wealth management and global clearing services, and it was heavily involved in the subprime mortgage crisis.
In the years leading up to the failure, Bear Stearns was heavily involved in securitization and issued large amounts of asset-backed securities, which in the case of mortgages, were pioneered by Lewis Ranieri, "the father of mortgage securities".[1] As investor losses mounted in those markets in 2006 and 2007, the company actually increased its exposure, especially the mortgage-backed assets that were central to the subprime mortgage crisis. In March 2008, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York provided an emergency loan to try to avert a sudden collapse of the company. The company could not be saved however and was sold to JP Morgan Chase for $10 per share, a price far below its pre-crisis 52-week high of $133.20 per share, but not as low as the $2 per share originally agreed upon by Bear Stearns and JP Morgan Chase.[2]
The collapse of the company was a prelude to the risk management meltdown of the investment banking industry in the United States and elsewhere that culminated in September 2008, and the subsequent global financial crisis of 2008–2009. In January 2010, JPMorgan ceased using the Bear Stearns name.[3]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Lead-up to the failure – increasing exposure to subprime mortgages
1.2 Start of the crisis – two subprime mortgage funds fail
1.3 Fed bailout and sale to JPMorgan Chase


2 Structure prior to collapse

2.1 Managing Partners/Chief Executive Officers
2.2 Major shareholders


3 See also
4 References
5 Further reading
6 External links



History[edit]




Bear Stearns' former offices at 383 Madison Avenue


Bear Stearns was founded as an equity trading house on May Day 1923 by Joseph Ainslee Bear, Robert B. Stearns and Harold C. Mayer Sr. with $500,000 in capital. Internal tensions quickly arose among the three founders. The firm survived the Wall Street Crash of 1929 without laying off any employees and by 1933 opened its first branch office in Chicago. In 1955 the firm opened its first international office in Amsterdam.[4]
In 1985, Bear Stearns became a publicly traded company.[4] It served corporations, institutions, governments, and individuals. The company's business included corporate finance, mergers and acquisitions, institutional equities, fixed income sales & risk management, trading and research, private client services, derivatives, foreign exchange and futures sales and trading, asset management and custody services. Through Bear Stearns Securities Corp., it offered global clearing services to broker dealers, prime broker clients and other professional traders, including securities lending.[5] Bear Stearns was also known for one of the most widely read market intelligence pieces on the street, known as the "Early Look at the Market."[citation needed]
Bear Stearns' World Headquarters was located at 383 Madison Avenue, between East 46th Street and East 47th Street in Manhattan. By 2007, the company employed more than 15,500 people worldwide.[6] The firm was headquartered in New York City with offices in Atlanta, Boston, Chicago, Dallas, Denver, Houston, Los Angeles, Irvine, San Francisco, St. Louis, Whippany, New Jersey; and San Juan, Puerto Rico. Internationally the firm had offices in London, Beijing, Dublin, Frankfurt, Hong Kong, Lugano, Milan, São Paulo, Mumbai, Shanghai, Singapore and Tokyo.
In 2005–2007, Bear Stearns was recognized as the "Most Admired" securities firm in Fortune's "America's Most Admired Companies" survey, and second overall in the securities firm section.[7] The annual survey is a prestigious ranking of employee talent, quality of risk management and business innovation. This was the second time in three years that Bear Stearns had achieved this "top" distinction.
Lead-up to the failure – increasing exposure to subprime mortgages[edit]
By November 2006, the company had total capital of approximately $66.7 billion and total assets of $350.4 billion and according to the April 2005 issue of Institutional Investor magazine, Bear Stearns was the seventh-largest securities firm in terms of total capital.
A year later Bear Stearns had notional contract amounts of approximately $13.40 trillion in derivative financial instruments, of which $1.85 trillion were listed futures and option contracts. In addition, Bear Stearns was carrying more than $28 billion in 'level 3' assets on its books at the end of fiscal 2007 versus a net equity position of only $11.1 billion. This $11.1 billion supported $395 billion in assets,[8] which means a leverage ratio of 35.6 to 1. This highly leveraged balance sheet, consisting of many illiquid and potentially worthless assets, led to the rapid diminution of investor and lender confidence, which finally evaporated as Bear was forced to call the New York Federal Reserve to stave off the looming cascade of counterparty risk which would ensue from forced liquidation.
Start of the crisis – two subprime mortgage funds fail[edit]
Main article: 2007 subprime mortgage financial crisis
See also: Subprime lending and Collateralized debt obligation
On June 22, 2007, Bear Stearns pledged a collateralized loan of up to $3.2 billion to "bail out" one of its funds, the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Fund, while negotiating with other banks to loan money against collateral to another fund, the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Enhanced Leveraged Fund. Bear Stearns had originally put up just $25 million, so they were hesitant about the bailout; nonetheless, CEO James Cayne and other senior executives worried about the damage to the company's reputation.[9][10] The funds were invested in thinly traded collateralized debt obligations (CDOs). Merrill Lynch seized $850 million worth of the underlying collateral but only was able to auction $100 million of them. The incident sparked concern of contagion as Bear Stearns might be forced to liquidate its CDOs, prompting a mark-down of similar assets in other portfolios.[11][12] Richard A. Marin, a senior executive at Bear Stearns Asset Management responsible for the two hedge funds, was replaced on June 29 by Jeffrey B. Lane, a former Vice Chairman of rival investment bank, Lehman Brothers.[13]
During the week of July 16, 2007, Bear Stearns disclosed that the two subprime hedge funds had lost nearly all of their value amid a rapid decline in the market for subprime mortgages.
On August 1, 2007, investors in the two funds took action against Bear Stearns and its top board and risk management managers and officers. The law firms of Jake Zamansky & Associates and Rich & Intelisano both filed arbitration claims with the National Association of Securities Dealers alleging that Bear Stearns misled investors about its exposure to the funds. This was the first legal action made against Bear Stearns. Co-President Warren Spector was asked to resign on August 5, 2007, as a result of the collapse of two hedge funds tied to subprime mortgages. A September 21 report in the New York Times noted that Bear Stearns posted a 61 percent drop in net profits due to their hedge fund losses.[14] With Samuel Molinaro's November 15 revelation that Bear Stearns was writing down a further $1.2 billion in mortgage-related securities and would face its first loss in 83 years, Standard & Poor's downgraded the company's credit rating from AA to A.[15]
Matthew Tannin and Ralph R. Cioffi, both former managers of hedge funds at Bear Stearns Companies, were arrested June 19, 2008.[16] They faced criminal charges and were found not guilty of misleading investors about the risks involved in the subprime market. Tannin and Cioffi have also been named in lawsuits brought by Barclays Bank, which claims they were one of the many investors misled by the executives.[17][18]
They were also named in civil lawsuits brought in 2007 by investors, including Barclays Bank, who claimed they had been misled. Barclays claimed that Bear Stearns knew that certain assets in the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Strategies Enhanced Leverage Master Fund were worth much less than their professed values. The suit claimed that Bear Stearns managers devised "a plan to make more money for themselves and further to use the Enhanced Fund as a repository for risky, poor-quality investments." The lawsuit said Bear Stearns told Barclays that the enhanced fund was up almost 6% through June 2007—when "in reality, the portfolio's asset values were plummeting."[19]
Other investors in the fund included Jeffrey E. Epstein's Financial Trust Company.[20]
Fed bailout and sale to JPMorgan Chase[edit]
On March 14, 2008, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York agreed to provide a $25 billion loan to Bear Stearns collateralized by free and clear assets from Bear Stearns in order to provide Bear Stearns the liquidity for up to 28 days that the market was refusing to provide. Shortly thereafter the Federal Reserve Bank of New York had a change of heart and told Bear Stearns that the 28-day loan was unavailable to them.[21] The deal was then changed to where the NY FED would create a company to buy $30 billion worth of Bear Stearns assets. Two days later, on March 16, 2008, Bear Stearns signed a merger agreement with JP Morgan Chase in a stock swap worth $2 a share or less than 7 percent of Bear Stearns' market value just two days before.[22] This sale price represented a staggering loss as its stock had traded at $172 a share as late as January 2007, and $93 a share as late as February 2008. The new company is funded by loans of $29 billion from the New York FRB, and $1 billion from JP Morgan Chase (the junior loan), with no further recourse to JP Morgan Chase.[23] This non-recourse loan means that the loan is collateralized by mortgage debt[24] and that the government cannot seize JP Morgan Chase's assets if the mortgage debt collateral becomes insufficient to repay the loan.[24][25] Chairman of the Fed, Ben Bernanke, defended the bailout by stating that a bankruptcy of Bear Stearns would have affected the real economy[26] and could have caused a "chaotic unwinding" of investments across the US markets.[22]
On March 20, Securities and Exchange Commission Chairman Christopher Cox said the collapse of Bear Stearns was due to a lack of confidence, not a lack of capital. Cox noted that Bear Stearns's problems escalated when rumors spread about its liquidity crisis which in turn eroded investor confidence in the firm. "Notwithstanding that Bear Stearns continued to have high quality collateral to provide as security for borrowings, market counterparties became less willing to enter into collateralized funding arrangements with Bear Stearns," said Cox. Bear Stearns' liquidity pool started at $18.1 billion on March 10 and then plummeted to $2 billion on March 13. Ultimately market rumors about Bear Stearns' difficulties became self-fulfilling, Cox said.[27]
On March 24, 2008, a class action was filed on behalf of shareholders, challenging the terms of JPMorgan’s recently announced acquisition of Bear Stearns.[28] That same day, a new agreement was reached that raised JPMorgan Chase's offer to $10 a share, up from the initial $2 offer, which meant an offer of $1.2 billion.[29] The revised deal was aimed to quiet upset investors and any subsequent legal action brought against JP Morgan Chase as a result of the deal as well as to prevent employees, many of whose past compensation consisted of Bear Stearns stock, from leaving for other firms. The Bear Stearns bailout was seen as an extreme-case scenario, and continues to raise significant questions about Fed intervention. On April 8, 2008, Paul A. Volcker stated that the Fed has taken 'actions that extend to the very edge of its lawful and implied powers.' See his remarks at a Luncheon of the Economic Club of New York.[30] On May 29, Bear Stearns shareholders approved the sale to JPMorgan Chase at the $10-per-share price.[31]
An article by journalist Matt Taibbi for Rolling Stone contended that naked short selling had a role in the demise of both Bear Stearns and Lehman Brothers.[32] A study by finance researchers at the University of Oklahoma Price College of Business studied trading in financial stocks, including Bear Stearns and Lehman Brothers, and found "no evidence that stock price declines were caused by naked short selling."[33]
Structure prior to collapse[edit]
Managing Partners/Chief Executive Officers[edit]

Salim L. Lewis: 1949–1978
Alan C. Greenberg: 1978–1993
James Cayne: 1993–2008
Alan Schwartz: 2008–collapse

Major shareholders[edit]
The largest Bear Stearns shareholders as of December 2007 were:[34]

Barrow Hanley Mewhinney & Strauss – 9.73%
Joseph C. Lewis – 9.36%
Morgan Stanley – 5.37%
James Cayne – 4.94%
Legg Mason Capital Management – 4.84%
Private Capital Management – 4.49%
Barclays Global Investors – 3.10%
State Street Global Advisors – 3.01%
The Vanguard Group – 2.67%
Janus Capital Management – 2.34%

See also[edit]


New York City portal
Companies portal



Primary dealer
Bankruptcy of Lehman Brothers
Lehman Brothers
Bear Stearns Merchant Banking

References[edit]


^ Lowenstein, Roger The End Of Wall Street, Penguin Press 2010, pp.xvii,22 ISBN 978-1-59420-239-1
^ Ross, Andrew (March 17, 2008). "JP Morgan Pays $2 a Share for Bear Stearns". The New York Times.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.
^ Bear Stearns Brand Finally Fades, Two Years After Collapse
^ a b "Could Bear Stearns Do Better?". The New York Times. March 17, 2008. Retrieved March 17, 2008. 
^ "Bear Stearns Companies, Inc.", International Directory of Company Histories, Vol. 52, St. James Press, 2003 
^ Tim McLaughlin (November 28, 2007). "Bear Stearns to cut 650 jobs globally". Reuters. 
^ "America's Most Admired Companies 2007 FORTUNE". CNN. Retrieved August 23, 2011. 
^ Boyd, Roddy (March 31, 2008). "The last days of Bear Stearns". Fortune. Archived from the original on September 19, 2008.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.
^ Burrough, Bryan. "Bringing Down Bear Stearns". Vanity Fair. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ Creswell, Julie; Bajaj, Vikas (June 23, 2007), "$3.2 Billion Move by Bear Stearns to Rescue Fund", New York Times, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Siew, Walden; Yoon, Al (June 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns CDO liquidation sparks contagion fears", Reuters 
^ Pittman, Mark (June 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns Fund Collapse Sends Shock Through CDOs", Bloomberg, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Bajaj, Vikas (June 30, 2007), "Bear Stearns Shakes Up Funds Unit", New York Times, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Grynbaum, Michael M. (September 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns Profit Plunges 61% on Subprime Woes", New York Times, retrieved September 14, 2008 
^ Basar, Shanny; Ahuja, Vivek (November 15, 2007), "Bear downgraded in face of first loss in 83 years", Financial News Online, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ DealBook (June 19, 2008). "Behind the Scenes of Bear's Fund Meltdown". The New York Times. 
^ "2 Former Bear Stearns Managers Arrested". NY Times. Associated Press. June 19, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2008. 
^ Charges at Bear Stearns linked to subprime debacle Archived June 20, 2008, at the Wayback Machine. By TOM HAYS, Associated Press Writer, 6/19/08.
^ Ex-Bear Stearns managers arrested at their homes Archived June 20, 2008, at the Wayback Machine. By Tom Hays, Associated Press, 6/19/08.
^ More Bad News for Jeff Epstein? JULY 11, 2007, Dealbook, New York Times retrieved 2011 3 25
^ FRONTLINE: Inside the Meltdown – You Have a Weekend to Save Yourself Retrieved February 26, 2009
^ a b Fed Aided Bear Stearns as Firm Faced Chapter 11, Bernanke Says. Bloomberg, April 2, 2008
^ http://www.jpmorgan.com/cm/Satellite?c=JPM_Content_C&cid=1159339104093&pagename=JPM_redesign%2FJPM_Content_C%2FGeneric_Detail_Page_Template
^ a b "Bear Stearns Bondholders Win Big". Seeking Alpha. March 27, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ "Weekly Market Comment: Why is Bear Stearns Trading at $6 Instead of $2". Hussman Funds. March 24, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ "Bernanke Defends Bear Stearns Bailout". CBS News. April 3, 2008. 
^ Chairman Cox Letter To Basel Committee In Support Of New Guidance On Liquidity Management (PDF), March 20, 2008, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ C&T Files Complaint and Temporary Restraining Order Challenging Bear Stearns Buyout by JPMorgan, March 24, 2008, archived from the original on May 13, 2008, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Seeking Fast Deal, JPMorgan Quintuples Bear Stearns Bid. New York Times, March 25, 2008
^ Niall Ferguson: The Ascent of Money: A Financial History of The World, Chapter 6: From Empire to Chimerica; Chimerica, p. 338
^ White, Ben (May 29, 2008), "Bear Stearns passes into Wall Street history", Financial Times 
^ Taibbi, Matt (October 2009). "Wall Street's Naked Swindle". Rolling Stone. Retrieved October 15, 2009. 
^ http://www.cfr-cologne.de/download/workingpaper/cfr-09-09.pdf
^ Wright, William (March 17, 2008). "Employees lose $5bn on Bear Stearns". Financial News.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.


Further reading[edit]

William Cohan (2010). House of Cards: A Tale of Hubris and Wretched Excess on Wall Street.

External links[edit]

JPMorgan Securities home page
FRONTLINE: Inside the Meltdown Analysis—The Bear Stearns Rescue
New York Times Timeline of Bear Stearns' history
Bloomberg: JPMorgan Chase to Buy Bear Stearns for $240 Million
J.P. Morgan Buys Bear in Fire Sale, As Fed Widens Credit to Avert Crisis - WSJ





Links to related articles











v
t
e


JPMorgan Chase



Divisions



J.P. Morgan & Co.
Chase Bank
Chase Paymentech
Chase Card Services Canada
EMC Mortgage Company
Highbridge Capital Management
J.P. Morgan Cazenove
One Equity Partners





Notable current executives



Jamie Dimon (CEO)
Matthew E. Zames
Steven Black
Jing Ulrich





Notable former executives



John Pierpont Morgan
J. P. Morgan Jr.
Junius Spencer Morgan
George Peabody
Henry Sturgis Morgan
David Rockefeller
William B. Harrison Jr.
John B. McCoy
Walter V. Shipley
Douglas A. Warner III
Temple Bowdoin
Jes Staley
Blythe Masters
James B. Lee Jr.
Thomas W. Lamont
Dennis Weatherstone
John J. McCloy
Winthrop Aldrich





Board of directors



Crandall C. Bowles
Stephen B. Burke
David M. Cote
James S. Crown
Jamie Dimon
Ellen V. Futter
William H. Gray
Laban P. Jackson Jr.
David C. Novak
Lee R. Raymond
William C. Weldon





Historical components



American Fletcher
Anchor Savings Bank
Banca Commerciale Italiana Trust Co.
Bank One Corporation
The Manhattan Company
Bank United of Texas
Bear Stearns
CenTrust Bank
Chase Manhattan Bank
Chemical Bank
Corn Exchange Bank
Dime Savings Bank of New York
First Chicago Bank
First USA Bank
Great Western Bank
Hambrecht & Quist
H. F. Ahmanson & Co.
Jardine Fleming
J.P. Morgan & Co.
Lincoln Savings
Manufacturers Hanover
National Bank of Detroit
National Park Bank
New York Trust Company
Providian
Robert Fleming & Co.
State Bank of Chicago
Texas Commerce Bank
Valley National Bank of Arizona
Washington Mutual





Buildings



125 London Wall
245 Park Avenue
25 Bank Street
270 Park Avenue
277 Park Avenue
383 Madison Avenue
Chase Field
Chase Tower (Amarillo)
Chase Tower (Chicago)
Chase Tower (Dallas)
Chase Tower (El Paso)
Chase Tower (Englewood, Colorado)
Chase Tower (Indianapolis)
Chase Tower (Milwaukee)
Chase Tower (Oklahoma City)
Chase Tower (Phoenix)
Chase Tower (Rochester)
Chater House
Indiana Michigan Power Center (Fort Wayne)
JPMorgan Chase Building (San Francisco)
JPMorgan Chase Tower (Houston)
McCoy Building
One Chase Manhattan Plaza
The Qube (Detroit)








 Category
 Commons
 Wikiversity












v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List












v
t
e


Corporate scandals






South Sea Company (1720)
Panic of 1890 (Baring crisis) (1890)
Salad Oil (1963)
Banco Ambrosiano (1982)
Carrian Group (1983)
Guinness (1986)
Polly Peck (1990)
Bank of Credit and Commerce International (1990)
Metallgesellschaft (1993)
Barings Bank (1995)
Sumitomo Corporation (1996)
Archer Daniels Midland (1997)
Long-Term Capital Management (2000)
One.Tel (2001)
Enron (2001)
Adelphia (2002)
WorldCom (2002)
Tyco (2004)
Bayou Hedge Fund Group (2005)
Société Générale (2008)
Bear Stearns (2008)
Libor (2008–2012)
Anglo Irish Bank (2008–2011)
Volkswagen emissions scandal (2008-ongoing)
Satyam (2009)
Olympus (2011)
OCZ (2012-2013)
Forex (2013–)
Tesco (2014)
Toshiba (2015)
Target Australia (2016)
Wells Fargo account fraud scandal (2016-ongoing)
Daewoo Shipbuilding & Marine Engineering (2016)












v
t
e


Great Recession



By region



Africa
Americas

United States
South America


Asia
Europe
Oceania





United States-specific



Automotive industry crisis
California budget crisis
Housing bubble
Housing market correction
Subprime mortgage crisis





Banking losses and fraud



Anglo Irish Bank hidden loans controversy
Libor scandal

Tom Hayes


Société Générale trading loss
Forex scandal
Seán FitzPatrick
Bernard Madoff
Tom Petters
Scott W. Rothstein
Allen Stanford





Government entities



Consumer Financial Protection Bureau
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Federal Home Loan Banks
Federal Housing Administration
Federal Housing Finance Agency
Federal Housing Finance Board
Federal Reserve System
Government National Mortgage Association
Irish Bank Resolution Corporation
National Asset Management Agency
Office of Federal Housing Enterprise Oversight
Office of Financial Stability
UK Financial Investments










Government policy and spending responses



Banking and finance
stability and reform



Anglo Irish Bank Corporation Act 2009
Banking (Special Provisions) Act 2008
China–Japan–South Korea trilateral summit
Commercial Paper Funding Facility
Dodd–Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act
Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008
Irish emergency budget, 2009
Irish budget, 2010
Irish budget, 2011
Irish budget, 2012
Irish budget, 2013
Temporary Liquidity Guarantee Program
Term Asset-Backed Securities Loan Facility
Troubled Asset Relief Program
2008 United Kingdom bank rescue package




Bank stress tests



EU
U.S.








Stimulus and recovery



2008 European Union stimulus plan
2008–09 Keynesian resurgence
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009
Chinese economic stimulus program
Economic Stimulus Act of 2008
Fraud Enforcement and Recovery Act of 2009
Green New Deal
Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008
National fiscal policy response to the Great Recession
Zero interest-rate policy





Government interventions,
rescues, and acquisitions



List of banks acquired or bankrupted during the Great Recession




Non-banking



Chrysler
General Motors











Securities involved
and financial markets



Auction rate securities
Collateralized debt obligations
Collateralized mortgage obligations
Credit default swaps
Mortgage-backed securities
Secondary mortgage market





Social responses



Tea Party protests (United States; c. 2009)
May Day protests (Europe, Middle East and North Africa, Asia; 2009)
Occupy movement (worldwide)





Related topics



2000s energy crisis

Central Asia: 2008


Effects on museums
Decline of newspapers
World food price crisis








European debt crisis
Financial crisis of 2007–08
List of countries by public debt














Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 147604903
LCCN: nr94015164










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Bear_Stearns&oldid=791270892"					
Categories: Bear Stearns1923 establishments in New York2000s economic history2008 acquisitions2008 disestablishments in New YorkBank failures in the United StatesBanks disestablished in 2008Banks established in 1923Companies based in New York CityFinancial services companies established in 1923Financial crisesFormer investment banksInvestment management companies of the United StatesJPMorgan ChaseHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from October 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2014Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEspañolEsperantoفارسیFrançais한국어ItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSuomiSvenskaУкраїнськаייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 19 July 2017, at 05:25.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.

























J.P. Morgan Securities | Wealth Management | Investment Strategies | Portfolio Management | Brokerage | J.P. Morgan Securities








































Skip to Main Content







Welcome to J.P. Morgan Securities |Select a Country



Chase


J.P. Morgan


Careers




 
 



Skip to main content


Overview
Wealth Planning

Transferring Wealth
Executive Services
Retirement Planning
Education Funding
Corporate Plans
Stock Plan Services


Research
Investing Solutions

Brokerage Services
Consulting Programs
Portfolio Management


Banking & Lending

Banking
Lending


Our Offices
Contact
















 


 


 


 


 











 Print
 Share (opens overlay)

Share via  Email
Share on  Facebook (opens pop-up window)
Share on  LinkedIn (opens pop-up window)
Share on  Twitter (opens pop-up window)






J.P. Morgan Securities

 

Personal attention, global resources
At J.P. Morgan Securities, you benefit from the best of both worlds: the personalized service of a boutique organization and the global resources of one of the largest and most respected financial firms in the world. Our Financial Advisors can create solutions that address your specific needs, whether you seek a strategic investment approach, professional portfolio management or a broader range of wealth management services.
Customized solutions
We will work closely with you to understand your unique needs and create solutions designed to help you meet your financial goals. Our experienced Financial Advisors excel at tailoring individual portfolios utilizing J.P. Morgan’s robust investment capabilities.
Exceptional access to industry experts
Our Financial Advisors provide access to J.P. Morgan’s industry-leading investment and trading experts as well as members of our senior executive team, all of whom actively participate in developing customized solutions for our clients. Your Financial Advisor will draw on J.P. Morgan’s award-winning research, combining it with his or her market knowledge and experience to create effective investment strategies. You can benefit from this expertise whether you seek short-term tactical investment opportunities, a disciplined portfolio management approach or a more comprehensive wealth management strategy.
Investment expertise and flexibility
J.P. Morgan Securities offers a broad array of investment products and the world’s leading investment managers. These expansive resources—the best people and products in the industry coupled with a Financial Advisor who is directly involved in the investment process—are the true benefits of working with us.
 






A link to this article will be included in your message to the recipient.   Fields with an * are required.


The e-mail addresses entered on this page will not be used to send unsolicited e-mail and will not be sold to a third party.  For additional information, view our privacy and security policy.


To  (e-mail address - use a comma between multiple addresses)*



From  (your e-mail address)*




Cancel (updates page content above)






Learn more about our firm and investment professionals through FINRA BrokerCheck.
“J.P. Morgan Securities” is a brand name for a wealth management business conducted by JPMorgan Chase & Co. and certain subsidiaries. J.P. Morgan Securities offers investment products, services, Clearing and Custody through J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, a member of FINRA and SIPC. Bank products and services are offered by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and its bank affiliates.
Bank products and services are offered through JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and its affiliates. Securities are offered by J.P. Morgan Securities   LLC and Clearing and Custody by J.P. Morgan Clearing Corp., both are   members of FINRA and SIPC. J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and J.P. Morgan Clearing Corp are affiliates of JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
Investment products: Not FDIC insured • No bank guarantee • May lose value

 
 






 


 


 


 


 


 




Skip to Global Header Content

 
 
 
 
 

Copyright © 2017 JPMorgan Chase & Co. All rights reserved.

 














Bear Stearns - Wikipedia






















 






Bear Stearns

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc.





Former type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: BSC


Industry
Investment services


Fate
acquired by JP Morgan Chase


Founded
1923


Defunct
March 2008


Headquarters
New York City, US



Key people

Alan Schwartz, former CEO
James Cayne, former Chairman & CEO


Products
Financial services
Investment banking
Investment management


Parent
JPMorgan Chase


Website
www.bear.com


The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc. was a New York-based global investment bank, securities trading and brokerage firm that failed in 2008 as part of the global financial crisis and recession, and was subsequently sold to JPMorgan Chase. Its main business areas before its failure were capital markets, investment banking, wealth management and global clearing services, and it was heavily involved in the subprime mortgage crisis.
In the years leading up to the failure, Bear Stearns was heavily involved in securitization and issued large amounts of asset-backed securities, which in the case of mortgages, were pioneered by Lewis Ranieri, "the father of mortgage securities".[1] As investor losses mounted in those markets in 2006 and 2007, the company actually increased its exposure, especially the mortgage-backed assets that were central to the subprime mortgage crisis. In March 2008, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York provided an emergency loan to try to avert a sudden collapse of the company. The company could not be saved however and was sold to JP Morgan Chase for $10 per share, a price far below its pre-crisis 52-week high of $133.20 per share, but not as low as the $2 per share originally agreed upon by Bear Stearns and JP Morgan Chase.[2]
The collapse of the company was a prelude to the risk management meltdown of the investment banking industry in the United States and elsewhere that culminated in September 2008, and the subsequent global financial crisis of 2008–2009. In January 2010, JPMorgan ceased using the Bear Stearns name.[3]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Lead-up to the failure – increasing exposure to subprime mortgages
1.2 Start of the crisis – two subprime mortgage funds fail
1.3 Fed bailout and sale to JPMorgan Chase


2 Structure prior to collapse

2.1 Managing Partners/Chief Executive Officers
2.2 Major shareholders


3 See also
4 References
5 Further reading
6 External links



History[edit]




Bear Stearns' former offices at 383 Madison Avenue


Bear Stearns was founded as an equity trading house on May Day 1923 by Joseph Ainslee Bear, Robert B. Stearns and Harold C. Mayer Sr. with $500,000 in capital. Internal tensions quickly arose among the three founders. The firm survived the Wall Street Crash of 1929 without laying off any employees and by 1933 opened its first branch office in Chicago. In 1955 the firm opened its first international office in Amsterdam.[4]
In 1985, Bear Stearns became a publicly traded company.[4] It served corporations, institutions, governments, and individuals. The company's business included corporate finance, mergers and acquisitions, institutional equities, fixed income sales & risk management, trading and research, private client services, derivatives, foreign exchange and futures sales and trading, asset management and custody services. Through Bear Stearns Securities Corp., it offered global clearing services to broker dealers, prime broker clients and other professional traders, including securities lending.[5] Bear Stearns was also known for one of the most widely read market intelligence pieces on the street, known as the "Early Look at the Market."[citation needed]
Bear Stearns' World Headquarters was located at 383 Madison Avenue, between East 46th Street and East 47th Street in Manhattan. By 2007, the company employed more than 15,500 people worldwide.[6] The firm was headquartered in New York City with offices in Atlanta, Boston, Chicago, Dallas, Denver, Houston, Los Angeles, Irvine, San Francisco, St. Louis, Whippany, New Jersey; and San Juan, Puerto Rico. Internationally the firm had offices in London, Beijing, Dublin, Frankfurt, Hong Kong, Lugano, Milan, São Paulo, Mumbai, Shanghai, Singapore and Tokyo.
In 2005–2007, Bear Stearns was recognized as the "Most Admired" securities firm in Fortune's "America's Most Admired Companies" survey, and second overall in the securities firm section.[7] The annual survey is a prestigious ranking of employee talent, quality of risk management and business innovation. This was the second time in three years that Bear Stearns had achieved this "top" distinction.
Lead-up to the failure – increasing exposure to subprime mortgages[edit]
By November 2006, the company had total capital of approximately $66.7 billion and total assets of $350.4 billion and according to the April 2005 issue of Institutional Investor magazine, Bear Stearns was the seventh-largest securities firm in terms of total capital.
A year later Bear Stearns had notional contract amounts of approximately $13.40 trillion in derivative financial instruments, of which $1.85 trillion were listed futures and option contracts. In addition, Bear Stearns was carrying more than $28 billion in 'level 3' assets on its books at the end of fiscal 2007 versus a net equity position of only $11.1 billion. This $11.1 billion supported $395 billion in assets,[8] which means a leverage ratio of 35.6 to 1. This highly leveraged balance sheet, consisting of many illiquid and potentially worthless assets, led to the rapid diminution of investor and lender confidence, which finally evaporated as Bear was forced to call the New York Federal Reserve to stave off the looming cascade of counterparty risk which would ensue from forced liquidation.
Start of the crisis – two subprime mortgage funds fail[edit]
Main article: 2007 subprime mortgage financial crisis
See also: Subprime lending and Collateralized debt obligation
On June 22, 2007, Bear Stearns pledged a collateralized loan of up to $3.2 billion to "bail out" one of its funds, the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Fund, while negotiating with other banks to loan money against collateral to another fund, the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Enhanced Leveraged Fund. Bear Stearns had originally put up just $25 million, so they were hesitant about the bailout; nonetheless, CEO James Cayne and other senior executives worried about the damage to the company's reputation.[9][10] The funds were invested in thinly traded collateralized debt obligations (CDOs). Merrill Lynch seized $850 million worth of the underlying collateral but only was able to auction $100 million of them. The incident sparked concern of contagion as Bear Stearns might be forced to liquidate its CDOs, prompting a mark-down of similar assets in other portfolios.[11][12] Richard A. Marin, a senior executive at Bear Stearns Asset Management responsible for the two hedge funds, was replaced on June 29 by Jeffrey B. Lane, a former Vice Chairman of rival investment bank, Lehman Brothers.[13]
During the week of July 16, 2007, Bear Stearns disclosed that the two subprime hedge funds had lost nearly all of their value amid a rapid decline in the market for subprime mortgages.
On August 1, 2007, investors in the two funds took action against Bear Stearns and its top board and risk management managers and officers. The law firms of Jake Zamansky & Associates and Rich & Intelisano both filed arbitration claims with the National Association of Securities Dealers alleging that Bear Stearns misled investors about its exposure to the funds. This was the first legal action made against Bear Stearns. Co-President Warren Spector was asked to resign on August 5, 2007, as a result of the collapse of two hedge funds tied to subprime mortgages. A September 21 report in the New York Times noted that Bear Stearns posted a 61 percent drop in net profits due to their hedge fund losses.[14] With Samuel Molinaro's November 15 revelation that Bear Stearns was writing down a further $1.2 billion in mortgage-related securities and would face its first loss in 83 years, Standard & Poor's downgraded the company's credit rating from AA to A.[15]
Matthew Tannin and Ralph R. Cioffi, both former managers of hedge funds at Bear Stearns Companies, were arrested June 19, 2008.[16] They faced criminal charges and were found not guilty of misleading investors about the risks involved in the subprime market. Tannin and Cioffi have also been named in lawsuits brought by Barclays Bank, which claims they were one of the many investors misled by the executives.[17][18]
They were also named in civil lawsuits brought in 2007 by investors, including Barclays Bank, who claimed they had been misled. Barclays claimed that Bear Stearns knew that certain assets in the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Strategies Enhanced Leverage Master Fund were worth much less than their professed values. The suit claimed that Bear Stearns managers devised "a plan to make more money for themselves and further to use the Enhanced Fund as a repository for risky, poor-quality investments." The lawsuit said Bear Stearns told Barclays that the enhanced fund was up almost 6% through June 2007—when "in reality, the portfolio's asset values were plummeting."[19]
Other investors in the fund included Jeffrey E. Epstein's Financial Trust Company.[20]
Fed bailout and sale to JPMorgan Chase[edit]
On March 14, 2008, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York agreed to provide a $25 billion loan to Bear Stearns collateralized by free and clear assets from Bear Stearns in order to provide Bear Stearns the liquidity for up to 28 days that the market was refusing to provide. Shortly thereafter the Federal Reserve Bank of New York had a change of heart and told Bear Stearns that the 28-day loan was unavailable to them.[21] The deal was then changed to where the NY FED would create a company to buy $30 billion worth of Bear Stearns assets. Two days later, on March 16, 2008, Bear Stearns signed a merger agreement with JP Morgan Chase in a stock swap worth $2 a share or less than 7 percent of Bear Stearns' market value just two days before.[22] This sale price represented a staggering loss as its stock had traded at $172 a share as late as January 2007, and $93 a share as late as February 2008. The new company is funded by loans of $29 billion from the New York FRB, and $1 billion from JP Morgan Chase (the junior loan), with no further recourse to JP Morgan Chase.[23] This non-recourse loan means that the loan is collateralized by mortgage debt[24] and that the government cannot seize JP Morgan Chase's assets if the mortgage debt collateral becomes insufficient to repay the loan.[24][25] Chairman of the Fed, Ben Bernanke, defended the bailout by stating that a bankruptcy of Bear Stearns would have affected the real economy[26] and could have caused a "chaotic unwinding" of investments across the US markets.[22]
On March 20, Securities and Exchange Commission Chairman Christopher Cox said the collapse of Bear Stearns was due to a lack of confidence, not a lack of capital. Cox noted that Bear Stearns's problems escalated when rumors spread about its liquidity crisis which in turn eroded investor confidence in the firm. "Notwithstanding that Bear Stearns continued to have high quality collateral to provide as security for borrowings, market counterparties became less willing to enter into collateralized funding arrangements with Bear Stearns," said Cox. Bear Stearns' liquidity pool started at $18.1 billion on March 10 and then plummeted to $2 billion on March 13. Ultimately market rumors about Bear Stearns' difficulties became self-fulfilling, Cox said.[27]
On March 24, 2008, a class action was filed on behalf of shareholders, challenging the terms of JPMorgan’s recently announced acquisition of Bear Stearns.[28] That same day, a new agreement was reached that raised JPMorgan Chase's offer to $10 a share, up from the initial $2 offer, which meant an offer of $1.2 billion.[29] The revised deal was aimed to quiet upset investors and any subsequent legal action brought against JP Morgan Chase as a result of the deal as well as to prevent employees, many of whose past compensation consisted of Bear Stearns stock, from leaving for other firms. The Bear Stearns bailout was seen as an extreme-case scenario, and continues to raise significant questions about Fed intervention. On April 8, 2008, Paul A. Volcker stated that the Fed has taken 'actions that extend to the very edge of its lawful and implied powers.' See his remarks at a Luncheon of the Economic Club of New York.[30] On May 29, Bear Stearns shareholders approved the sale to JPMorgan Chase at the $10-per-share price.[31]
An article by journalist Matt Taibbi for Rolling Stone contended that naked short selling had a role in the demise of both Bear Stearns and Lehman Brothers.[32] A study by finance researchers at the University of Oklahoma Price College of Business studied trading in financial stocks, including Bear Stearns and Lehman Brothers, and found "no evidence that stock price declines were caused by naked short selling."[33]
Structure prior to collapse[edit]
Managing Partners/Chief Executive Officers[edit]

Salim L. Lewis: 1949–1978
Alan C. Greenberg: 1978–1993
James Cayne: 1993–2008
Alan Schwartz: 2008–collapse

Major shareholders[edit]
The largest Bear Stearns shareholders as of December 2007 were:[34]

Barrow Hanley Mewhinney & Strauss – 9.73%
Joseph C. Lewis – 9.36%
Morgan Stanley – 5.37%
James Cayne – 4.94%
Legg Mason Capital Management – 4.84%
Private Capital Management – 4.49%
Barclays Global Investors – 3.10%
State Street Global Advisors – 3.01%
The Vanguard Group – 2.67%
Janus Capital Management – 2.34%

See also[edit]


New York City portal
Companies portal



Primary dealer
Bankruptcy of Lehman Brothers
Lehman Brothers
Bear Stearns Merchant Banking

References[edit]


^ Lowenstein, Roger The End Of Wall Street, Penguin Press 2010, pp.xvii,22 ISBN 978-1-59420-239-1
^ Ross, Andrew (March 17, 2008). "JP Morgan Pays $2 a Share for Bear Stearns". The New York Times.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.
^ Bear Stearns Brand Finally Fades, Two Years After Collapse
^ a b "Could Bear Stearns Do Better?". The New York Times. March 17, 2008. Retrieved March 17, 2008. 
^ "Bear Stearns Companies, Inc.", International Directory of Company Histories, Vol. 52, St. James Press, 2003 
^ Tim McLaughlin (November 28, 2007). "Bear Stearns to cut 650 jobs globally". Reuters. 
^ "America's Most Admired Companies 2007 FORTUNE". CNN. Retrieved August 23, 2011. 
^ Boyd, Roddy (March 31, 2008). "The last days of Bear Stearns". Fortune. Archived from the original on September 19, 2008.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.
^ Burrough, Bryan. "Bringing Down Bear Stearns". Vanity Fair. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ Creswell, Julie; Bajaj, Vikas (June 23, 2007), "$3.2 Billion Move by Bear Stearns to Rescue Fund", New York Times, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Siew, Walden; Yoon, Al (June 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns CDO liquidation sparks contagion fears", Reuters 
^ Pittman, Mark (June 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns Fund Collapse Sends Shock Through CDOs", Bloomberg, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Bajaj, Vikas (June 30, 2007), "Bear Stearns Shakes Up Funds Unit", New York Times, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Grynbaum, Michael M. (September 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns Profit Plunges 61% on Subprime Woes", New York Times, retrieved September 14, 2008 
^ Basar, Shanny; Ahuja, Vivek (November 15, 2007), "Bear downgraded in face of first loss in 83 years", Financial News Online, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ DealBook (June 19, 2008). "Behind the Scenes of Bear's Fund Meltdown". The New York Times. 
^ "2 Former Bear Stearns Managers Arrested". NY Times. Associated Press. June 19, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2008. 
^ Charges at Bear Stearns linked to subprime debacle Archived June 20, 2008, at the Wayback Machine. By TOM HAYS, Associated Press Writer, 6/19/08.
^ Ex-Bear Stearns managers arrested at their homes Archived June 20, 2008, at the Wayback Machine. By Tom Hays, Associated Press, 6/19/08.
^ More Bad News for Jeff Epstein? JULY 11, 2007, Dealbook, New York Times retrieved 2011 3 25
^ FRONTLINE: Inside the Meltdown – You Have a Weekend to Save Yourself Retrieved February 26, 2009
^ a b Fed Aided Bear Stearns as Firm Faced Chapter 11, Bernanke Says. Bloomberg, April 2, 2008
^ http://www.jpmorgan.com/cm/Satellite?c=JPM_Content_C&cid=1159339104093&pagename=JPM_redesign%2FJPM_Content_C%2FGeneric_Detail_Page_Template
^ a b "Bear Stearns Bondholders Win Big". Seeking Alpha. March 27, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ "Weekly Market Comment: Why is Bear Stearns Trading at $6 Instead of $2". Hussman Funds. March 24, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ "Bernanke Defends Bear Stearns Bailout". CBS News. April 3, 2008. 
^ Chairman Cox Letter To Basel Committee In Support Of New Guidance On Liquidity Management (PDF), March 20, 2008, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ C&T Files Complaint and Temporary Restraining Order Challenging Bear Stearns Buyout by JPMorgan, March 24, 2008, archived from the original on May 13, 2008, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Seeking Fast Deal, JPMorgan Quintuples Bear Stearns Bid. New York Times, March 25, 2008
^ Niall Ferguson: The Ascent of Money: A Financial History of The World, Chapter 6: From Empire to Chimerica; Chimerica, p. 338
^ White, Ben (May 29, 2008), "Bear Stearns passes into Wall Street history", Financial Times 
^ Taibbi, Matt (October 2009). "Wall Street's Naked Swindle". Rolling Stone. Retrieved October 15, 2009. 
^ http://www.cfr-cologne.de/download/workingpaper/cfr-09-09.pdf
^ Wright, William (March 17, 2008). "Employees lose $5bn on Bear Stearns". Financial News.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.


Further reading[edit]

William Cohan (2010). House of Cards: A Tale of Hubris and Wretched Excess on Wall Street.

External links[edit]

JPMorgan Securities home page
FRONTLINE: Inside the Meltdown Analysis—The Bear Stearns Rescue
New York Times Timeline of Bear Stearns' history
Bloomberg: JPMorgan Chase to Buy Bear Stearns for $240 Million
J.P. Morgan Buys Bear in Fire Sale, As Fed Widens Credit to Avert Crisis - WSJ





Links to related articles











v
t
e


JPMorgan Chase



Divisions



J.P. Morgan & Co.
Chase Bank
Chase Paymentech
Chase Card Services Canada
EMC Mortgage Company
Highbridge Capital Management
J.P. Morgan Cazenove
One Equity Partners





Notable current executives



Jamie Dimon (CEO)
Matthew E. Zames
Steven Black
Jing Ulrich





Notable former executives



John Pierpont Morgan
J. P. Morgan Jr.
Junius Spencer Morgan
George Peabody
Henry Sturgis Morgan
David Rockefeller
William B. Harrison Jr.
John B. McCoy
Walter V. Shipley
Douglas A. Warner III
Temple Bowdoin
Jes Staley
Blythe Masters
James B. Lee Jr.
Thomas W. Lamont
Dennis Weatherstone
John J. McCloy
Winthrop Aldrich





Board of directors



Crandall C. Bowles
Stephen B. Burke
David M. Cote
James S. Crown
Jamie Dimon
Ellen V. Futter
William H. Gray
Laban P. Jackson Jr.
David C. Novak
Lee R. Raymond
William C. Weldon





Historical components



American Fletcher
Anchor Savings Bank
Banca Commerciale Italiana Trust Co.
Bank One Corporation
The Manhattan Company
Bank United of Texas
Bear Stearns
CenTrust Bank
Chase Manhattan Bank
Chemical Bank
Corn Exchange Bank
Dime Savings Bank of New York
First Chicago Bank
First USA Bank
Great Western Bank
Hambrecht & Quist
H. F. Ahmanson & Co.
Jardine Fleming
J.P. Morgan & Co.
Lincoln Savings
Manufacturers Hanover
National Bank of Detroit
National Park Bank
New York Trust Company
Providian
Robert Fleming & Co.
State Bank of Chicago
Texas Commerce Bank
Valley National Bank of Arizona
Washington Mutual





Buildings



125 London Wall
245 Park Avenue
25 Bank Street
270 Park Avenue
277 Park Avenue
383 Madison Avenue
Chase Field
Chase Tower (Amarillo)
Chase Tower (Chicago)
Chase Tower (Dallas)
Chase Tower (El Paso)
Chase Tower (Englewood, Colorado)
Chase Tower (Indianapolis)
Chase Tower (Milwaukee)
Chase Tower (Oklahoma City)
Chase Tower (Phoenix)
Chase Tower (Rochester)
Chater House
Indiana Michigan Power Center (Fort Wayne)
JPMorgan Chase Building (San Francisco)
JPMorgan Chase Tower (Houston)
McCoy Building
One Chase Manhattan Plaza
The Qube (Detroit)








 Category
 Commons
 Wikiversity












v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List












v
t
e


Corporate scandals






South Sea Company (1720)
Panic of 1890 (Baring crisis) (1890)
Salad Oil (1963)
Banco Ambrosiano (1982)
Carrian Group (1983)
Guinness (1986)
Polly Peck (1990)
Bank of Credit and Commerce International (1990)
Metallgesellschaft (1993)
Barings Bank (1995)
Sumitomo Corporation (1996)
Archer Daniels Midland (1997)
Long-Term Capital Management (2000)
One.Tel (2001)
Enron (2001)
Adelphia (2002)
WorldCom (2002)
Tyco (2004)
Bayou Hedge Fund Group (2005)
Société Générale (2008)
Bear Stearns (2008)
Libor (2008–2012)
Anglo Irish Bank (2008–2011)
Volkswagen emissions scandal (2008-ongoing)
Satyam (2009)
Olympus (2011)
OCZ (2012-2013)
Forex (2013–)
Tesco (2014)
Toshiba (2015)
Target Australia (2016)
Wells Fargo account fraud scandal (2016-ongoing)
Daewoo Shipbuilding & Marine Engineering (2016)












v
t
e


Great Recession



By region



Africa
Americas

United States
South America


Asia
Europe
Oceania





United States-specific



Automotive industry crisis
California budget crisis
Housing bubble
Housing market correction
Subprime mortgage crisis





Banking losses and fraud



Anglo Irish Bank hidden loans controversy
Libor scandal

Tom Hayes


Société Générale trading loss
Forex scandal
Seán FitzPatrick
Bernard Madoff
Tom Petters
Scott W. Rothstein
Allen Stanford





Government entities



Consumer Financial Protection Bureau
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Federal Home Loan Banks
Federal Housing Administration
Federal Housing Finance Agency
Federal Housing Finance Board
Federal Reserve System
Government National Mortgage Association
Irish Bank Resolution Corporation
National Asset Management Agency
Office of Federal Housing Enterprise Oversight
Office of Financial Stability
UK Financial Investments










Government policy and spending responses



Banking and finance
stability and reform



Anglo Irish Bank Corporation Act 2009
Banking (Special Provisions) Act 2008
China–Japan–South Korea trilateral summit
Commercial Paper Funding Facility
Dodd–Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act
Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008
Irish emergency budget, 2009
Irish budget, 2010
Irish budget, 2011
Irish budget, 2012
Irish budget, 2013
Temporary Liquidity Guarantee Program
Term Asset-Backed Securities Loan Facility
Troubled Asset Relief Program
2008 United Kingdom bank rescue package




Bank stress tests



EU
U.S.








Stimulus and recovery



2008 European Union stimulus plan
2008–09 Keynesian resurgence
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009
Chinese economic stimulus program
Economic Stimulus Act of 2008
Fraud Enforcement and Recovery Act of 2009
Green New Deal
Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008
National fiscal policy response to the Great Recession
Zero interest-rate policy





Government interventions,
rescues, and acquisitions



List of banks acquired or bankrupted during the Great Recession




Non-banking



Chrysler
General Motors











Securities involved
and financial markets



Auction rate securities
Collateralized debt obligations
Collateralized mortgage obligations
Credit default swaps
Mortgage-backed securities
Secondary mortgage market





Social responses



Tea Party protests (United States; c. 2009)
May Day protests (Europe, Middle East and North Africa, Asia; 2009)
Occupy movement (worldwide)





Related topics



2000s energy crisis

Central Asia: 2008


Effects on museums
Decline of newspapers
World food price crisis








European debt crisis
Financial crisis of 2007–08
List of countries by public debt














Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 147604903
LCCN: nr94015164










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Bear_Stearns&oldid=791270892"					
Categories: Bear Stearns1923 establishments in New York2000s economic history2008 acquisitions2008 disestablishments in New YorkBank failures in the United StatesBanks disestablished in 2008Banks established in 1923Companies based in New York CityFinancial services companies established in 1923Financial crisesFormer investment banksInvestment management companies of the United StatesJPMorgan ChaseHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from October 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2014Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEspañolEsperantoفارسیFrançais한국어ItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSuomiSvenskaУкраїнськаייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 19 July 2017, at 05:25.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Bear Stearns - Wikipedia






















 






Bear Stearns

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc.





Former type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: BSC


Industry
Investment services


Fate
acquired by JP Morgan Chase


Founded
1923


Defunct
March 2008


Headquarters
New York City, US



Key people

Alan Schwartz, former CEO
James Cayne, former Chairman & CEO


Products
Financial services
Investment banking
Investment management


Parent
JPMorgan Chase


Website
www.bear.com


The Bear Stearns Companies, Inc. was a New York-based global investment bank, securities trading and brokerage firm that failed in 2008 as part of the global financial crisis and recession, and was subsequently sold to JPMorgan Chase. Its main business areas before its failure were capital markets, investment banking, wealth management and global clearing services, and it was heavily involved in the subprime mortgage crisis.
In the years leading up to the failure, Bear Stearns was heavily involved in securitization and issued large amounts of asset-backed securities, which in the case of mortgages, were pioneered by Lewis Ranieri, "the father of mortgage securities".[1] As investor losses mounted in those markets in 2006 and 2007, the company actually increased its exposure, especially the mortgage-backed assets that were central to the subprime mortgage crisis. In March 2008, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York provided an emergency loan to try to avert a sudden collapse of the company. The company could not be saved however and was sold to JP Morgan Chase for $10 per share, a price far below its pre-crisis 52-week high of $133.20 per share, but not as low as the $2 per share originally agreed upon by Bear Stearns and JP Morgan Chase.[2]
The collapse of the company was a prelude to the risk management meltdown of the investment banking industry in the United States and elsewhere that culminated in September 2008, and the subsequent global financial crisis of 2008–2009. In January 2010, JPMorgan ceased using the Bear Stearns name.[3]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Lead-up to the failure – increasing exposure to subprime mortgages
1.2 Start of the crisis – two subprime mortgage funds fail
1.3 Fed bailout and sale to JPMorgan Chase


2 Structure prior to collapse

2.1 Managing Partners/Chief Executive Officers
2.2 Major shareholders


3 See also
4 References
5 Further reading
6 External links



History[edit]




Bear Stearns' former offices at 383 Madison Avenue


Bear Stearns was founded as an equity trading house on May Day 1923 by Joseph Ainslee Bear, Robert B. Stearns and Harold C. Mayer Sr. with $500,000 in capital. Internal tensions quickly arose among the three founders. The firm survived the Wall Street Crash of 1929 without laying off any employees and by 1933 opened its first branch office in Chicago. In 1955 the firm opened its first international office in Amsterdam.[4]
In 1985, Bear Stearns became a publicly traded company.[4] It served corporations, institutions, governments, and individuals. The company's business included corporate finance, mergers and acquisitions, institutional equities, fixed income sales & risk management, trading and research, private client services, derivatives, foreign exchange and futures sales and trading, asset management and custody services. Through Bear Stearns Securities Corp., it offered global clearing services to broker dealers, prime broker clients and other professional traders, including securities lending.[5] Bear Stearns was also known for one of the most widely read market intelligence pieces on the street, known as the "Early Look at the Market."[citation needed]
Bear Stearns' World Headquarters was located at 383 Madison Avenue, between East 46th Street and East 47th Street in Manhattan. By 2007, the company employed more than 15,500 people worldwide.[6] The firm was headquartered in New York City with offices in Atlanta, Boston, Chicago, Dallas, Denver, Houston, Los Angeles, Irvine, San Francisco, St. Louis, Whippany, New Jersey; and San Juan, Puerto Rico. Internationally the firm had offices in London, Beijing, Dublin, Frankfurt, Hong Kong, Lugano, Milan, São Paulo, Mumbai, Shanghai, Singapore and Tokyo.
In 2005–2007, Bear Stearns was recognized as the "Most Admired" securities firm in Fortune's "America's Most Admired Companies" survey, and second overall in the securities firm section.[7] The annual survey is a prestigious ranking of employee talent, quality of risk management and business innovation. This was the second time in three years that Bear Stearns had achieved this "top" distinction.
Lead-up to the failure – increasing exposure to subprime mortgages[edit]
By November 2006, the company had total capital of approximately $66.7 billion and total assets of $350.4 billion and according to the April 2005 issue of Institutional Investor magazine, Bear Stearns was the seventh-largest securities firm in terms of total capital.
A year later Bear Stearns had notional contract amounts of approximately $13.40 trillion in derivative financial instruments, of which $1.85 trillion were listed futures and option contracts. In addition, Bear Stearns was carrying more than $28 billion in 'level 3' assets on its books at the end of fiscal 2007 versus a net equity position of only $11.1 billion. This $11.1 billion supported $395 billion in assets,[8] which means a leverage ratio of 35.6 to 1. This highly leveraged balance sheet, consisting of many illiquid and potentially worthless assets, led to the rapid diminution of investor and lender confidence, which finally evaporated as Bear was forced to call the New York Federal Reserve to stave off the looming cascade of counterparty risk which would ensue from forced liquidation.
Start of the crisis – two subprime mortgage funds fail[edit]
Main article: 2007 subprime mortgage financial crisis
See also: Subprime lending and Collateralized debt obligation
On June 22, 2007, Bear Stearns pledged a collateralized loan of up to $3.2 billion to "bail out" one of its funds, the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Fund, while negotiating with other banks to loan money against collateral to another fund, the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Enhanced Leveraged Fund. Bear Stearns had originally put up just $25 million, so they were hesitant about the bailout; nonetheless, CEO James Cayne and other senior executives worried about the damage to the company's reputation.[9][10] The funds were invested in thinly traded collateralized debt obligations (CDOs). Merrill Lynch seized $850 million worth of the underlying collateral but only was able to auction $100 million of them. The incident sparked concern of contagion as Bear Stearns might be forced to liquidate its CDOs, prompting a mark-down of similar assets in other portfolios.[11][12] Richard A. Marin, a senior executive at Bear Stearns Asset Management responsible for the two hedge funds, was replaced on June 29 by Jeffrey B. Lane, a former Vice Chairman of rival investment bank, Lehman Brothers.[13]
During the week of July 16, 2007, Bear Stearns disclosed that the two subprime hedge funds had lost nearly all of their value amid a rapid decline in the market for subprime mortgages.
On August 1, 2007, investors in the two funds took action against Bear Stearns and its top board and risk management managers and officers. The law firms of Jake Zamansky & Associates and Rich & Intelisano both filed arbitration claims with the National Association of Securities Dealers alleging that Bear Stearns misled investors about its exposure to the funds. This was the first legal action made against Bear Stearns. Co-President Warren Spector was asked to resign on August 5, 2007, as a result of the collapse of two hedge funds tied to subprime mortgages. A September 21 report in the New York Times noted that Bear Stearns posted a 61 percent drop in net profits due to their hedge fund losses.[14] With Samuel Molinaro's November 15 revelation that Bear Stearns was writing down a further $1.2 billion in mortgage-related securities and would face its first loss in 83 years, Standard & Poor's downgraded the company's credit rating from AA to A.[15]
Matthew Tannin and Ralph R. Cioffi, both former managers of hedge funds at Bear Stearns Companies, were arrested June 19, 2008.[16] They faced criminal charges and were found not guilty of misleading investors about the risks involved in the subprime market. Tannin and Cioffi have also been named in lawsuits brought by Barclays Bank, which claims they were one of the many investors misled by the executives.[17][18]
They were also named in civil lawsuits brought in 2007 by investors, including Barclays Bank, who claimed they had been misled. Barclays claimed that Bear Stearns knew that certain assets in the Bear Stearns High-Grade Structured Credit Strategies Enhanced Leverage Master Fund were worth much less than their professed values. The suit claimed that Bear Stearns managers devised "a plan to make more money for themselves and further to use the Enhanced Fund as a repository for risky, poor-quality investments." The lawsuit said Bear Stearns told Barclays that the enhanced fund was up almost 6% through June 2007—when "in reality, the portfolio's asset values were plummeting."[19]
Other investors in the fund included Jeffrey E. Epstein's Financial Trust Company.[20]
Fed bailout and sale to JPMorgan Chase[edit]
On March 14, 2008, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York agreed to provide a $25 billion loan to Bear Stearns collateralized by free and clear assets from Bear Stearns in order to provide Bear Stearns the liquidity for up to 28 days that the market was refusing to provide. Shortly thereafter the Federal Reserve Bank of New York had a change of heart and told Bear Stearns that the 28-day loan was unavailable to them.[21] The deal was then changed to where the NY FED would create a company to buy $30 billion worth of Bear Stearns assets. Two days later, on March 16, 2008, Bear Stearns signed a merger agreement with JP Morgan Chase in a stock swap worth $2 a share or less than 7 percent of Bear Stearns' market value just two days before.[22] This sale price represented a staggering loss as its stock had traded at $172 a share as late as January 2007, and $93 a share as late as February 2008. The new company is funded by loans of $29 billion from the New York FRB, and $1 billion from JP Morgan Chase (the junior loan), with no further recourse to JP Morgan Chase.[23] This non-recourse loan means that the loan is collateralized by mortgage debt[24] and that the government cannot seize JP Morgan Chase's assets if the mortgage debt collateral becomes insufficient to repay the loan.[24][25] Chairman of the Fed, Ben Bernanke, defended the bailout by stating that a bankruptcy of Bear Stearns would have affected the real economy[26] and could have caused a "chaotic unwinding" of investments across the US markets.[22]
On March 20, Securities and Exchange Commission Chairman Christopher Cox said the collapse of Bear Stearns was due to a lack of confidence, not a lack of capital. Cox noted that Bear Stearns's problems escalated when rumors spread about its liquidity crisis which in turn eroded investor confidence in the firm. "Notwithstanding that Bear Stearns continued to have high quality collateral to provide as security for borrowings, market counterparties became less willing to enter into collateralized funding arrangements with Bear Stearns," said Cox. Bear Stearns' liquidity pool started at $18.1 billion on March 10 and then plummeted to $2 billion on March 13. Ultimately market rumors about Bear Stearns' difficulties became self-fulfilling, Cox said.[27]
On March 24, 2008, a class action was filed on behalf of shareholders, challenging the terms of JPMorgan’s recently announced acquisition of Bear Stearns.[28] That same day, a new agreement was reached that raised JPMorgan Chase's offer to $10 a share, up from the initial $2 offer, which meant an offer of $1.2 billion.[29] The revised deal was aimed to quiet upset investors and any subsequent legal action brought against JP Morgan Chase as a result of the deal as well as to prevent employees, many of whose past compensation consisted of Bear Stearns stock, from leaving for other firms. The Bear Stearns bailout was seen as an extreme-case scenario, and continues to raise significant questions about Fed intervention. On April 8, 2008, Paul A. Volcker stated that the Fed has taken 'actions that extend to the very edge of its lawful and implied powers.' See his remarks at a Luncheon of the Economic Club of New York.[30] On May 29, Bear Stearns shareholders approved the sale to JPMorgan Chase at the $10-per-share price.[31]
An article by journalist Matt Taibbi for Rolling Stone contended that naked short selling had a role in the demise of both Bear Stearns and Lehman Brothers.[32] A study by finance researchers at the University of Oklahoma Price College of Business studied trading in financial stocks, including Bear Stearns and Lehman Brothers, and found "no evidence that stock price declines were caused by naked short selling."[33]
Structure prior to collapse[edit]
Managing Partners/Chief Executive Officers[edit]

Salim L. Lewis: 1949–1978
Alan C. Greenberg: 1978–1993
James Cayne: 1993–2008
Alan Schwartz: 2008–collapse

Major shareholders[edit]
The largest Bear Stearns shareholders as of December 2007 were:[34]

Barrow Hanley Mewhinney & Strauss – 9.73%
Joseph C. Lewis – 9.36%
Morgan Stanley – 5.37%
James Cayne – 4.94%
Legg Mason Capital Management – 4.84%
Private Capital Management – 4.49%
Barclays Global Investors – 3.10%
State Street Global Advisors – 3.01%
The Vanguard Group – 2.67%
Janus Capital Management – 2.34%

See also[edit]


New York City portal
Companies portal



Primary dealer
Bankruptcy of Lehman Brothers
Lehman Brothers
Bear Stearns Merchant Banking

References[edit]


^ Lowenstein, Roger The End Of Wall Street, Penguin Press 2010, pp.xvii,22 ISBN 978-1-59420-239-1
^ Ross, Andrew (March 17, 2008). "JP Morgan Pays $2 a Share for Bear Stearns". The New York Times.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.
^ Bear Stearns Brand Finally Fades, Two Years After Collapse
^ a b "Could Bear Stearns Do Better?". The New York Times. March 17, 2008. Retrieved March 17, 2008. 
^ "Bear Stearns Companies, Inc.", International Directory of Company Histories, Vol. 52, St. James Press, 2003 
^ Tim McLaughlin (November 28, 2007). "Bear Stearns to cut 650 jobs globally". Reuters. 
^ "America's Most Admired Companies 2007 FORTUNE". CNN. Retrieved August 23, 2011. 
^ Boyd, Roddy (March 31, 2008). "The last days of Bear Stearns". Fortune. Archived from the original on September 19, 2008.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.
^ Burrough, Bryan. "Bringing Down Bear Stearns". Vanity Fair. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ Creswell, Julie; Bajaj, Vikas (June 23, 2007), "$3.2 Billion Move by Bear Stearns to Rescue Fund", New York Times, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Siew, Walden; Yoon, Al (June 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns CDO liquidation sparks contagion fears", Reuters 
^ Pittman, Mark (June 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns Fund Collapse Sends Shock Through CDOs", Bloomberg, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Bajaj, Vikas (June 30, 2007), "Bear Stearns Shakes Up Funds Unit", New York Times, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Grynbaum, Michael M. (September 21, 2007), "Bear Stearns Profit Plunges 61% on Subprime Woes", New York Times, retrieved September 14, 2008 
^ Basar, Shanny; Ahuja, Vivek (November 15, 2007), "Bear downgraded in face of first loss in 83 years", Financial News Online, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ DealBook (June 19, 2008). "Behind the Scenes of Bear's Fund Meltdown". The New York Times. 
^ "2 Former Bear Stearns Managers Arrested". NY Times. Associated Press. June 19, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2008. 
^ Charges at Bear Stearns linked to subprime debacle Archived June 20, 2008, at the Wayback Machine. By TOM HAYS, Associated Press Writer, 6/19/08.
^ Ex-Bear Stearns managers arrested at their homes Archived June 20, 2008, at the Wayback Machine. By Tom Hays, Associated Press, 6/19/08.
^ More Bad News for Jeff Epstein? JULY 11, 2007, Dealbook, New York Times retrieved 2011 3 25
^ FRONTLINE: Inside the Meltdown – You Have a Weekend to Save Yourself Retrieved February 26, 2009
^ a b Fed Aided Bear Stearns as Firm Faced Chapter 11, Bernanke Says. Bloomberg, April 2, 2008
^ http://www.jpmorgan.com/cm/Satellite?c=JPM_Content_C&cid=1159339104093&pagename=JPM_redesign%2FJPM_Content_C%2FGeneric_Detail_Page_Template
^ a b "Bear Stearns Bondholders Win Big". Seeking Alpha. March 27, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ "Weekly Market Comment: Why is Bear Stearns Trading at $6 Instead of $2". Hussman Funds. March 24, 2008. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ "Bernanke Defends Bear Stearns Bailout". CBS News. April 3, 2008. 
^ Chairman Cox Letter To Basel Committee In Support Of New Guidance On Liquidity Management (PDF), March 20, 2008, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ C&T Files Complaint and Temporary Restraining Order Challenging Bear Stearns Buyout by JPMorgan, March 24, 2008, archived from the original on May 13, 2008, retrieved April 16, 2008 
^ Seeking Fast Deal, JPMorgan Quintuples Bear Stearns Bid. New York Times, March 25, 2008
^ Niall Ferguson: The Ascent of Money: A Financial History of The World, Chapter 6: From Empire to Chimerica; Chimerica, p. 338
^ White, Ben (May 29, 2008), "Bear Stearns passes into Wall Street history", Financial Times 
^ Taibbi, Matt (October 2009). "Wall Street's Naked Swindle". Rolling Stone. Retrieved October 15, 2009. 
^ http://www.cfr-cologne.de/download/workingpaper/cfr-09-09.pdf
^ Wright, William (March 17, 2008). "Employees lose $5bn on Bear Stearns". Financial News.  Retrieved on September 30, 2008.


Further reading[edit]

William Cohan (2010). House of Cards: A Tale of Hubris and Wretched Excess on Wall Street.

External links[edit]

JPMorgan Securities home page
FRONTLINE: Inside the Meltdown Analysis—The Bear Stearns Rescue
New York Times Timeline of Bear Stearns' history
Bloomberg: JPMorgan Chase to Buy Bear Stearns for $240 Million
J.P. Morgan Buys Bear in Fire Sale, As Fed Widens Credit to Avert Crisis - WSJ





Links to related articles











v
t
e


JPMorgan Chase



Divisions



J.P. Morgan & Co.
Chase Bank
Chase Paymentech
Chase Card Services Canada
EMC Mortgage Company
Highbridge Capital Management
J.P. Morgan Cazenove
One Equity Partners





Notable current executives



Jamie Dimon (CEO)
Matthew E. Zames
Steven Black
Jing Ulrich





Notable former executives



John Pierpont Morgan
J. P. Morgan Jr.
Junius Spencer Morgan
George Peabody
Henry Sturgis Morgan
David Rockefeller
William B. Harrison Jr.
John B. McCoy
Walter V. Shipley
Douglas A. Warner III
Temple Bowdoin
Jes Staley
Blythe Masters
James B. Lee Jr.
Thomas W. Lamont
Dennis Weatherstone
John J. McCloy
Winthrop Aldrich





Board of directors



Crandall C. Bowles
Stephen B. Burke
David M. Cote
James S. Crown
Jamie Dimon
Ellen V. Futter
William H. Gray
Laban P. Jackson Jr.
David C. Novak
Lee R. Raymond
William C. Weldon





Historical components



American Fletcher
Anchor Savings Bank
Banca Commerciale Italiana Trust Co.
Bank One Corporation
The Manhattan Company
Bank United of Texas
Bear Stearns
CenTrust Bank
Chase Manhattan Bank
Chemical Bank
Corn Exchange Bank
Dime Savings Bank of New York
First Chicago Bank
First USA Bank
Great Western Bank
Hambrecht & Quist
H. F. Ahmanson & Co.
Jardine Fleming
J.P. Morgan & Co.
Lincoln Savings
Manufacturers Hanover
National Bank of Detroit
National Park Bank
New York Trust Company
Providian
Robert Fleming & Co.
State Bank of Chicago
Texas Commerce Bank
Valley National Bank of Arizona
Washington Mutual





Buildings



125 London Wall
245 Park Avenue
25 Bank Street
270 Park Avenue
277 Park Avenue
383 Madison Avenue
Chase Field
Chase Tower (Amarillo)
Chase Tower (Chicago)
Chase Tower (Dallas)
Chase Tower (El Paso)
Chase Tower (Englewood, Colorado)
Chase Tower (Indianapolis)
Chase Tower (Milwaukee)
Chase Tower (Oklahoma City)
Chase Tower (Phoenix)
Chase Tower (Rochester)
Chater House
Indiana Michigan Power Center (Fort Wayne)
JPMorgan Chase Building (San Francisco)
JPMorgan Chase Tower (Houston)
McCoy Building
One Chase Manhattan Plaza
The Qube (Detroit)








 Category
 Commons
 Wikiversity












v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List












v
t
e


Corporate scandals






South Sea Company (1720)
Panic of 1890 (Baring crisis) (1890)
Salad Oil (1963)
Banco Ambrosiano (1982)
Carrian Group (1983)
Guinness (1986)
Polly Peck (1990)
Bank of Credit and Commerce International (1990)
Metallgesellschaft (1993)
Barings Bank (1995)
Sumitomo Corporation (1996)
Archer Daniels Midland (1997)
Long-Term Capital Management (2000)
One.Tel (2001)
Enron (2001)
Adelphia (2002)
WorldCom (2002)
Tyco (2004)
Bayou Hedge Fund Group (2005)
Société Générale (2008)
Bear Stearns (2008)
Libor (2008–2012)
Anglo Irish Bank (2008–2011)
Volkswagen emissions scandal (2008-ongoing)
Satyam (2009)
Olympus (2011)
OCZ (2012-2013)
Forex (2013–)
Tesco (2014)
Toshiba (2015)
Target Australia (2016)
Wells Fargo account fraud scandal (2016-ongoing)
Daewoo Shipbuilding & Marine Engineering (2016)












v
t
e


Great Recession



By region



Africa
Americas

United States
South America


Asia
Europe
Oceania





United States-specific



Automotive industry crisis
California budget crisis
Housing bubble
Housing market correction
Subprime mortgage crisis





Banking losses and fraud



Anglo Irish Bank hidden loans controversy
Libor scandal

Tom Hayes


Société Générale trading loss
Forex scandal
Seán FitzPatrick
Bernard Madoff
Tom Petters
Scott W. Rothstein
Allen Stanford





Government entities



Consumer Financial Protection Bureau
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Federal Home Loan Banks
Federal Housing Administration
Federal Housing Finance Agency
Federal Housing Finance Board
Federal Reserve System
Government National Mortgage Association
Irish Bank Resolution Corporation
National Asset Management Agency
Office of Federal Housing Enterprise Oversight
Office of Financial Stability
UK Financial Investments










Government policy and spending responses



Banking and finance
stability and reform



Anglo Irish Bank Corporation Act 2009
Banking (Special Provisions) Act 2008
China–Japan–South Korea trilateral summit
Commercial Paper Funding Facility
Dodd–Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act
Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008
Irish emergency budget, 2009
Irish budget, 2010
Irish budget, 2011
Irish budget, 2012
Irish budget, 2013
Temporary Liquidity Guarantee Program
Term Asset-Backed Securities Loan Facility
Troubled Asset Relief Program
2008 United Kingdom bank rescue package




Bank stress tests



EU
U.S.








Stimulus and recovery



2008 European Union stimulus plan
2008–09 Keynesian resurgence
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009
Chinese economic stimulus program
Economic Stimulus Act of 2008
Fraud Enforcement and Recovery Act of 2009
Green New Deal
Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008
National fiscal policy response to the Great Recession
Zero interest-rate policy





Government interventions,
rescues, and acquisitions



List of banks acquired or bankrupted during the Great Recession




Non-banking



Chrysler
General Motors











Securities involved
and financial markets



Auction rate securities
Collateralized debt obligations
Collateralized mortgage obligations
Credit default swaps
Mortgage-backed securities
Secondary mortgage market





Social responses



Tea Party protests (United States; c. 2009)
May Day protests (Europe, Middle East and North Africa, Asia; 2009)
Occupy movement (worldwide)





Related topics



2000s energy crisis

Central Asia: 2008


Effects on museums
Decline of newspapers
World food price crisis








European debt crisis
Financial crisis of 2007–08
List of countries by public debt














Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 147604903
LCCN: nr94015164










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Bear_Stearns&oldid=791270892"					
Categories: Bear Stearns1923 establishments in New York2000s economic history2008 acquisitions2008 disestablishments in New YorkBank failures in the United StatesBanks disestablished in 2008Banks established in 1923Companies based in New York CityFinancial services companies established in 1923Financial crisesFormer investment banksInvestment management companies of the United StatesJPMorgan ChaseHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from October 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2014Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEspañolEsperantoفارسیFrançais한국어ItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSuomiSvenskaУкраїнськаייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 19 July 2017, at 05:25.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      
